	The Land: Forging



	By

	Dr. Aleron Kong





This book is dedicated to my friend James who put a book of blank pages into my hand, and told me to write. I absolutely love that you will be naming your new child after me! Aleron totally works for either a boy or a girl!

	P.S. – Alerondra has been getting some traction.





Contents

	THE LIGHT COURT

	CHAPTER 1

	CHAPTER 2

	CHAPTER 3

	CHAPTER 4

	CHAPTER 5

	CHAPTER 6

	CHAPTER 7

	CHAPTER 8

	CHAPTER 9

	CHAPTER 10

	CHAPTER 11

	CHAPTER 12

	CHAPTER 13

	CHAPTER 14

	CHAPTER 16

	CHAPTER 17

	CHAPTER 18

	CHAPTER 18

	CHAPTER 19

	CHAPTER 20

	CHAPTER 21

	CHAPTER 22

	CHAPTER 23

	CHAPTER 24

	CHAPTER 25

	CHAPTER 26

	CHAPTER 27

	Index





THE LIGHT COURT


	Figures moved at a stately pace along a white marbled floor inlaid with veins of diamond. Others stood in their assigned places. The same places where they always stood. There did not need to be any concern for someone stepping out of place in the Light Court. Those roles had been established eons before, and it had not changed. It would never change.

	Three bells chimed to announce the arrival of a new figure to the Light Court. In practiced measure, everyone in the court turned to acknowledge the High Chancellor. The tall figure stood dressed in raiment of spun platinum. He took exactly seven short steps forward in honor of the seven higher planes and stood quietly. His movement had placed him the center of a stylized golden sun set into the floor.

	The Chancellor stood for the predetermined amount of time that all entrants to the Court had to wait. No one knew exactly why that amount of time was required, but that didn’t matter. It was simply the way things were done. That was enough for all present. And if it wasn’t… well then they had all learned to make it appear that it was enough. No one spoke, and no one moved.

	Two bells chimed, and the Chancellor bowed deeply once. He then walked seven times seven steps forward into the Court. His precise stride brought him exactly to the center of another sun set into the pristine white marble. Once he stopped, the Chancellor bent into an elaborate bow, his head bent down. This one was created from the red crystal heart of a dying sun. The period of waiting began again. None spoke. The Light Court was the heart of power for the armies of Light. It had the pristine cleanliness of an operating room and the solemn gravity of a vigil.

	After a period of time, a third bell tolled. The High Chancellor straightened and looked at his leader. The King of Light sat on his raised throne. The ivory chair was carved from the skull of a dragon god. It was well known that the King had enjoyed a good hunt before the Exile. His trophies festooned the walls of the Court. To the left of the throne was the tattered banner from the capital city that had once spanned several galaxies. To the right was the massive spiraled horn of an evolved unicorn. One urn that sat on a pedestal behind the King’s throne was rumored to be a stasis pod that contained the ashes of a phoenix that had heated a planet’s core. No one ever discussed how the King had reached the phoenix. It was also never discussed why, instead of a planet, there was now only an asteroid belt.

	In a stately and regal voice, the King spoke, “The High Chancellor is welcomed back to the one and true Court. When last we spoke, I tasked you with discovering the source of the disturbances I have felt in The Land. I trust you have not come back without an answer.” The King’s voice did not change at all while speaking, but the threat of horror and agony was understood. In an unspoken law, more immutable that gravity, no one disappointed the King of Light. At least, no one did it twice.

	The High Chancellor bowed once again. His arms flowed out to his sides in a slow flourish. When he stood, he brought his hands together in a steeple over his chest. “Indeed, my King. Since I was tasked with this assignment, I have turned my sole attention to The Land. At first, I detected nothing out of the ordinary. There were no changes or realignments of ley line energy. There were also no significant alterations in the Deep Magics. It was only when I began scanning for Higher Energies that I found something.”

	The King spoke again, “Are you telling this Court that a denizen of The Land has discovered how to manipulate Chaos or Gravity?” The King did not even breath into existence that one of the specks of life that inhabited The Land could have stumbled upon the ability to use any of the stronger Higher Energies, let alone the strongest, Time.

	“Not exactly, my King,” the Chancellor replied. Seeing the King’s expression tighten slightly in impatience, he quickly continued. “There have been no spells cast or manipulations of the Higher Energies that I could detect. What I did sense, however, were trace amounts of raw Chaos in various locations around the world. The Land, of course, has various amounts of every magic in existence, but as you know, Chaos cannot remain in a stable form without a massive containment spell. So when I detected these sparks of energy and saw that they did not change in character, I was curious to say the least. As I watched the location where I had detected the Chaotic energies, I noticed that there had been changes in the status quo permeating most of those regions. Nothing large enough to disturb our plans, but changes nonetheless.”

	The King’s nostrils flared ever so slightly. The Chancellor hastily corrected himself, “Of course I mean your plans, my King.” He wasted no more time moving past his faux pas. “Despite the changes in The Land being minor, I found it concerning that your majesty detected disturbances at the same time I have found these emanations of Higher Energy.”

	“Where are these motes of Chaos coming from?”

	“I have not yet discovered that, my King.”

	“Have you not found anything else,” the King asked. The leader of the Light Court did not seem pleased with the Chancellor’s progress.

	If the platinum clad being were mortal, he would have started sweating. As it was, he still felt a twinge of fear. “I will continue to study these areas, my Lord. I will divine more information, but something happened that I believed you should be made aware of immediately. A pixie chrysalis has been found. More than that, it has made its way into the hands of a Sprite Life Master.”

	The King absorbed the information in silence.

	“None of our agents are in the area. It is in a small section of The Land called the River Peninsula. At your order, I can start moving assets towards the region,” the High Chancellor continued.

	The King just stared at him. The other members of the court looked at the High Chancellor, more than a few silently hoping for his death. Removal of someone from a position of power always opened the possibility for advancement after all. The Chancellor pretended to ignore the attention, not daring to look away from the dais. There was no movement for a long period of time, then a white-robed figure leaned forward and whispered into the King’s ear.

	The Royal Chamberlain was the only other entity allowed near the throne. No one knew anything about him except that he was a close advisor to the King. His white robes and deep hood hid any clear view of his face or body. He was smaller than most other members of the Light Court, but that didn’t mean he wasn’t dangerous. Those who opposed the Chamberlain often found themselves on the wrong side of the King’s favor. Death was the best result that could be expected after that. If there was one other figure in the Court that the High Chancellor feared, it was the secretive figure in white.

	The Chamberlain finished giving his advice, and then stepped back behind the throne once more. The King nodded to himself, lost in thought. When he looked at the High Chancellor again, he just thanked him for his service and bid him to continue watching The Land closely. The Chancellor bowed again and walked out of the Court. If his steps were not quite as slow and measured as before, no one watching would blame him.

	The King had dismissed the weakling Chancellor from his mind and from the Court simultaneously. His thoughts were instead focused on an order he had given long ago. An order that he had pondered the utility of in the years since. Self-reflection and doubt were not feelings the King were accustomed to, but it did not change the fact that his decision to unleash a plague that wiped the entire pixie race from the face of The Land had seemed… wasteful.





CHAPTER 1




	“Be welcome at the Hearth Tree, Richter of the Mist Village,” Hisako said with a smile. “And welcome home my son, I see you have grown in strength, hopefully in wisdom as well,” the last said with a wry arch of her eyebrow.

	“Thank you, mother. Yes, I have learned much, and found a good friend and ally,” Sion replied with a smile.

	Richter walked forward and took her hand, “Hearth Mother, thank you. Sion is more than a friend to me, he is a brother. There is no way I could have accomplished what I have accomplished without him. I formally extend the friendship and welcome of the Mist Village to you and your people. I sincerely hope that you will ask me for any help that you might need.”

	A serious look came over her face, “I was hoping that you would say that. There have been small camps of goblins and bugbears seen in the forest between here and the Fire Tip Mountains to the east. They are slaughtering all of the local wildlife and despoiling the Forest. We need to clear them out and learn why they are making inroads into the Forest. I will not stand by and watch the Forest of Nadria become like the Whisper Woods, overrun with evil creatures. The Forest will be protected, no matter how many battles it takes. Will you help?”

	You have been offered a Quest: Protect the Forest I. Bugbears and goblins have invaded the Forest of Nadria and are disrupting nature’s balance. The Hearth Mother is asking your help. You must destroy an enemy camp. Optional: Find out why the invaders are coming into the Forest. Reward: Unknown. Yes or No?

	“Ready to take out some more bad guys,” Richter asked smiling.

	Sion looked back with that happy bloodthirsty grin of his, “Oh yes brother! That’s what we do!”

	“Yeah man! Now like we practiced.” Richter stuck his palm out, which Sion slapped with his own. Immediately, they slapped the backs of their hands together, then made fists, bumped them, drew their fists back opening them slowly, closed them again, bumped them again, twisted their fists to lock it, then opened their hands quickly and both said, “BOOM!”

	Hisako just stared at them with wide eyes and her mouth ajar, “What are you doing?”

	“That is called giving ‘dap’ mother. You wouldn’t understand,” Sion said with a laugh that was echoed by Richter. Shaking her head, she just turned around and walked to the Hearth Tree. The two of them followed, still chuckling.

	They left the golden glade of the wood sprites the next morning. Their armor was left behind as well. Their adventures so far had left holes, gouges and dents in the gear. Unfortunately, the magical armor could not be repaired by a normal smith. The sprite magicians promised they would make it whole, but it would take several days. They decided to use the time to walk to Richter’s concealed glade.

	Besides wanting to see Hisako, the other reason they had left the village was to collect water from the Pool of Clarity. The magical waters gave a 25% bonus to any experience earned over the course of a day. Richter had taken the waters for granted at first. He had later discovered that a Potion of Clarity normally sold for two to three gold pieces, however, or the equivalent of three to four months’ wages for most people in The Land. This wonderful little pond was going to be the cash cow that helped him grow the Mist Village as quickly as possible. Hisako had offered to send guards with them in light of the encroachment of bugbears into the forest, but despite the fact that they were now basically allies, he didn’t feel comfortable disclosing such sensitive information, i.e., where his glade was. Having guards come along would have been as good as drawing a map.

	The two Companions set out just as the forest was coming alive. The birdsong that Richter had first heard when coming to The Land had grown more complex as the weather got warmer and more birds made the forest their home. The trip was relaxed and easy. Going without armor for the first time in weeks was also a freeing experience. Though invaluable, his Light Armor did decrease his movement speed. According to Ulinde, a journeyman of Light Armor who had decided to join Richter’s village, the decrease was about 3% per piece at his current skill rank. That meant when he was wearing the entire suit, he moved about 18% slower than he otherwise would have. Apparently when he became an Initiate, the penalty decreased to 2%, then 1% at Apprentice rank. Journeyman and on, the speed penalty would disappear completely. Richter was really looking forward to that! Medium and heavy armor had even worse penalties to speed. Dodge, casting, and several other things were affected by heavier armor as well. These were all reasons that casters, rogues, or fighters specializing in ranged combat, typically wore light armor.

	Despite the short distance between the Hearth Tree and the glade, finding their destination would normally not have been easy. It might have been near impossible in fact, but the Traveler’s map Richter had bought let him retrace his steps exactly. Anywhere he had been showed up brightly on the map. While locations he had not visited personally, but the map maker had, were in greyscale. Everything else was pure black. It was interactive so he could track his location, and find his way unerringly to anywhere he had already been. Even so, when the two friends approached the entrance to the small glade, there was nothing to indicate its presence except the rocks Richter had strewn around which would only be significant to him. The entry looked like nothing more than a stand of trees against a cliff face. Richter decided to test what Xuetrix the imp had told him when he had first awoken in the Land. When they were directly in front of the entrance, he turned to his Companion.

	“Sion, walk in.”

	“Walk in where,” the sprite replied. “There is nothing in front of us except for trees and cliff face.”

	“Trust me,” Richter said. “Just start walking forward.”

	Sion looked at him in disbelief, but did as he was asked. He put both hands out in front of him and tried to push past the trees. He didn’t go more than two feet when he stopped. It was clear that he was leaning on some sort of barrier. The sprite moved several feet to his left and tried again. This time his shoulder’s bunched as he pushed against whatever was in front of him.

	“Are you having a laugh at my expense Richter? You are never really funny, but if so, then this is just pathetic!”

	“Calm down! I was just testing something! When I first got here, an imp told me that no one else should be able to enter the glade. Looks like he was right.”

	“An imp? You should not be interacting with those things! They are always causing mischief and problems!”

	“He wasn’t so bad,” Richter said. “He gave me some good advice and information when I got here.”

	“Trust me when I tell you that you were lucky! EVERYONE knows not to trust them. At least you don’t owe it a favor!”

	Errrrrr, yeahhhh, Richter thought. He decided not to bring up that the imp HAD, in fact, tricked him into owing it a favor. No use talking about it now. Besides, what’s the worst that could happen?

	“Well, like I said, the imp was useful. The point is that the entrance is right in front of you, it’s just that an enchantment is keeping you out. So come with me. I’ll walk you in.” Richter held his hand out.

	Sion’s face lost all expression, “What do you think you’re doing?”

	“Well, you can’t get in by yourself obviously. So come hold my hand.”

	Sion’s sword materialized.

	Richter held his hands up. “You can always wait out here, but there are a large number of herbs that grow inside. I haven’t seen most of them anywhere else I’ve traveled so far, so they’re probably pretty rare. Like I said, it’s up to you, though...”

	Sion’s face screwed up in a pained expression. Richter could practically hear the sprite’s teeth grinding. He shoved the sword back into its sheath with his uncannily fast attack speed. The next words were said with deadly intensity, “If you tell N-E-ONE about this. I will make you pay for it!”

	Richter nodded innocently. With a look of complete understanding on his face he extended his hand again. Muttering under his breath in the wood sprite home tongue, Sion clasped his hand without making eye contact. The two of them walked forward together, and after only a few feet Richter felt the light tingle over his skin that denoted when he entered the boundaries of the glade. Turning to Sion he said, “Now see there little buddy, that wasn’t so – Argggh! You bastard!”

	Sion apparently did not appreciate Richter’s attempt at gentle ribbing. He had drawn his sword and slapped the flat of it across the back of Richter’s thighs. He didn’t even have the good grace to say anything, merely sheathing his sword again and walking forward into the glen. Muttering about angry little Napoleons, Richter massaged the back of his legs and glared at his Companion. Deciding nothing constructive would come from dragging the moment out, he let it go and examined a prompt that had come up.

	You have brought a Companion to your hidden enclave. Do you wish to this person allow access in the future? Yes or No?

	Selecting ‘Yes,’ he took in his surroundings. The small grassy area looked just as he remembered. Sunlight shone down through a break in the cliff face illuminating a pool of water surrounded by a small meadow. Colorful flowers and herbs were strewn about the grass. The ache in his legs quickly fled his mind. Richter had forgotten the wonderful serenity of this place, and he took a few minutes to just appreciate the beauty around him. Coming back to himself, he walked with the slightest of hobbles over to the Pool of Clarity.

	After he had filled first vial, he held it up to his eye. Richter was able to see motes of light floating through the crystal clear water; a detail he had missed previously. After filling the pinky sized vial, he placed it into the Bag of Holding and withdrew another empty vial with the same motion. While he was collecting the precious liquid, Sion seemed to be fascinated by the varied plant life. Richter heard him mutter, “Dragon’s Tongue, Bloodwort, Star Lily, Amarintha Cap, …” The sprite’s attention was so enthralled by the varied plant life in the glen, that they ended up spending the night there. Their day was spent carefully gathering plants. They finished their herb collection for the night and Sion’s breathing was deep and regular in slumber. Richter was about to follow his Companion’s example when he noticed a faint glow coming from the pool. Moonlight was falling directly upon it, and a blue light was shining up from the bottom, illuminating the water.

	Richter quietly got up from his sleep roll. He waded out until he was knee-deep, and reached his hand into the pool. The blue gleam was coming from the floor of the pond. He scraped the mud and muck aside dirtying the water. When it cleared, he saw a glowing blue rock. A prompt came up:

	Glade of Serenity. This secret glade was the home of Karim the Knowledgeable. He was of a long-lived species, the Hanketsu, that were typically prone to quick anger and judgement. He turned from this path, however and devoted his life to the study of the natural world. It was his belief that through the proper application of knowledge, one could create a society of just and fair laws. Feeling his death was near, he laid down by this simple pool and breathed his last. His death transformed it into a Pool of Clarity. The bones of the Hanketsu glow blue in the moonlight.

	Richter realized then that he wasn’t touching a rock. It was a skull. The skull of Karim the Knowledgeable. Standing in the slightly too cool waters of the Pool, Richter bowed his head and stood silently. He would never know who this man was, but he honored him. He stood silent vigil over the bones of a man who had dedicated his life to a worthy cause, and he quietly thanked him for the help the Pool provided. When he was done, he left the water and laid down for sleep.

	The next morning, Sion enlisted Richter’s help again to pick every remaining plant and herb that could be useful, and then place them in his Bag. One wonderful trait of the Bag of Holding that Richter hadn’t been aware of initially was that it either stopped or severely slowed decay. Food that was placed in the Bag, and then removed days later, did not lose any of its freshness. The Bag was not a form of cryogenic freezing, unfortunately. A simple experiment had proven that. A live fish fresh from the river had been placed inside. It was most definitely not alive when he pulled it back out even a few seconds later, though. On the plus side, it was still tasty!

	They set out that afternoon, the glade almost stripped bare of herbs. A bonus of the time they spent was that Richter’s Herb Lore skill had increased. They would have been done faster, but Sion spread seeds of the collected plants in the glen and then watered them. He was planning to do the same at the Mist Village. The meadow above the village proper had already shown itself to be naturally fertile ground for rare plants. The Bag of Holding would keep everything viable until they got back home.

	They walked back to the Hearth Tree enjoying the warm day. Spring was present now in full effect and everywhere Richter looked, small animals were scurrying about. The Hearth Tree was less than a day’s walk from the hidden glade, so they took their time. Richter examined his status. It was remarkable how far he had come in such a short time.

	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 10, 11%

Health: 290 Mana: 250 Stamina: 170

Strength: 15

Agility: 17

Dexterity: 30

Constitution: 17

Endurance: 17

Intelligence: 23

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 21

Luck: 14

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 5; 36% to next level, 100% affinity

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level, 100% affinity

Analyze Lvl 5; 17% to next level, 100% affinity

Stealth Lvl 4; 76% to next level, 100% affinity

Archery Lvl 7; 78% to next level, 100% affinity

Imbue Arrow Lvl 4; 94% to next level, 100% affinity

Focus Lvl 2; 60% to next level, 100% affinity

Double Shot Lvl 3; 20% to next level, 100% affinity

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 28% to next level, 100% affinity

Swordsmanship Lvl 1; 88% to next level, 100% affinity

Small Blades Lvl 1; 11% to next level, 100% affinity

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level, 100% affinity

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level, 100% affinity

Light Armor Lvl 6; 59% to next level, 100% affinity

Grace in Combat Lvl 2; 42% to next level, 100% affinity

Air Magic Lvl 3; 51% to next level, 100% affinity

Life Magic Lvl 1; 49% to next level, 100% affinity

Earth Magic Lvl 2; 98% to next level, 100% affinity

Water Magic Lvl 1; 19% to next level, 100% affinity

Dark Magic Lvl 3; 31% to next level, 100% affinity

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 2; 27% to next level, 100% affinity

Marks

Master of Mist Village

Resistances:

Air 50%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 2 “I think I know that guy!”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





	They were met at the edge of the glade by a female sprite.

	“Well met, Sionavar,” she said.

	“Well met, Daniella,” Sion responded sounding annoyed. “I have told you to call me Sion.”

	She simply laughed, “The Hearth Mother wants the two of you to come to the Tree. Follow me.”

	The three of them started walking towards the massive tree. Richter was able to successfully fight the impulse for all of ten seconds, “So Sionavar, huh?”

	“I DON’T want to talk about it!”

	“Hahaha, whatever you say… Sionavar!”

	Sion half drew his sword again and pointedly looked at Richter’s legs. The laughter trailed off into a bout of coughing.

	When they arrived in front of the Hearth Tree, Hisako was standing with three other older sprites. “Welcome back, Richter of the Mist Village. Welcome back, my son. Were you able to retrieve the supplies you needed?”

	Richter smiled and said, “Yes. In fact, I would like to give you a small gift.” He pulled ten Potions of Clarity from his bag. One he placed in her hand, and the other he laid at her feet.

	When she saw the motes of light in the vials, her own eyes began to sparkle, “This is a wonderful gift! Thank you!”

	“It is a small token of appreciation for what you have given me. I am sure you have many wonders associated with your Place of Power Hisako. I would like it if, in addition to helping each other with defense, we could become trading partners as well. I know we could both profit from this arrangement.”

	The sparkle in her eyes was replaced with a crafty gleam, “I am sure we can come to some arrangement in the future. I’m not sure our relationship is quite strong enough for a standing trade agreement right now, however. Perhaps if you employ an experience trader we can discuss it again. If we do become trading partners, do not expect special treatment, just because you are friends with my son!”

	Richter was confused by her refusal, but then a prompt came up.

	Know This! Both parties involved in making a trade agreement must either be a minimum skill level of Initiate or employ a trader with that level. The stronger the relationship between two civilizations, the lower the level of trader required.

	Richter nodded to himself, the rebuttal now making more sense. Not wanting to make the situation awkward, he gave a small laugh and answered, “I wouldn’t have it any other way, Hearth Mother. I wouldn’t have it any other way.”

	She gave a laugh of her own, “Well enough talk of state. We have repaired your armor, and made a few, ahem, improvements.” The tired looking elders moved out of the way. What was behind them took his breath away.

	You have found: Sprite Helmet of Mana. Defense +7. Durability 30/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Type: Light Armor. Weight 1.3 kg. Mana +50.

	You have found: Sprite Breastplate of Brawn. Defense +12. Durability 60/60. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Type: Light armor. Weight: 6.1 kg. Strength +8

	You have found: Hardened Sprite Bracers. Defense +10. Durability 30/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Type: Light armor. Weight: 3.0 kg. Dexterity +7.

	You have found: Studded Sprite Gauntlets. Defense +7. Durability 40/40. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Type: Light Armor. Weight 2.2 kg. Increased climbing +10.

	You have found: Greaves of the Wood Sprite. Defense +9. Durability 45/45. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Type: Light armor. Weight: 2.8 kg. Movement speed increased by 10%.

	You have found: Reinforced Sprite Boots. Defense +8. Durability 35/35. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Type: Light armor. Weight: 1.8 kg. Silence +15.

	Congratulations! You have obtained an entire set of matched armor: Enhanced Sprite Armor. Defense given by each piece increased by 25%. Special Bonus: 50% less noise made while moving through forest. Special Bonus: +20% Earth Resistance.

	Hisako looked at him and chuckled, “Close your mouth, Richter. That’s how you catch flies.”

	“Hisako, this is too much!”

	“This is well within my power Richter. My son is wearing an almost identical set of enhanced armor. The resistances are different, and there are one or two other small variations, but otherwise you are now wearing the armor of a sprite warrior. We fight for the good of the Forest of Nadria, and you have proven that you do as well. The least that I can do is to give you better protection.”

	Richter looked at Sion, “You have been wearing enhanced armor? And I was the one that had to run from the giant skeeling?”

	“What giant skeeling,” Hisako asked confused. Sion looked at the ground and kicked it with his foot.

	Richter looked at the stats of the gauntlets, “And increased climbing? Is that how you always make it into the trees so easily? When I asked, you said I just needed to apply myself!” Richter’s voice was getting louder.

	Sion looked up with a smirk on his face.

	“And your Strength? I asked you how you were so strong when you were so much smaller than me! You told me it was because of ‘secret sprite exercises!’ You had me do all of those pushups!” Richter’s hands leapt out to choke the little man who was now cackling with abandon. Richter was sure he heard chuckles from behind him too, but he stayed focused on manipulative leprecaun in front of him.

	Violence would most definitely have ensued if Hisako had not placed herself between the two of them. “Peace, Richter, peace! My son has a lot of growing up to do! I am sure he is sorry!”

	Sion kept laughing and shook his head. Richter glared at his Companion. Tears were coming out of the bastard’s eyes now!

	“Ignore him, Richter! Look what else we have for you!”

	Richter exhaled heavily, “Okay Hisako. You’re still a dick, Sion!”

	“Sion! That was not funny,” she half-heartedly admonished. Was that a note of suppressed laughter in voice? When Richter looked at her, all he saw was her normal serene mask so he couldn’t be sure. Still not quite trusting her calm exterior, he decided to let the matter drop. For now, anyway. He would be getting even with Sion at some point, though.

	Hisako looked to one of the older sprites who nodded back. He went inside of the Hearth Tree and came immediately back out. His arms were holding… something. When he shook out his burden, though, Richter whistled softly in appreciation.

	You have found: Cloak of Concealment. Defense +4. Durability 30/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 0.9 kg. Increased Concealment all terrains +25.

	Richter placed his hand on the cloak and felt the fabric. The smooth cloth molded to his skin. It almost seemed to anticipate his movements. Putting it on completely, he found that it reached down past his calves. The molding quality of the cloak kept it close to his body as he moved. At the same time, it was light as a feather, and when he extended his arms, it easily fell away. It would be perfect for either stealth or battle.

	“Once again I am overwhelmed by your generosity,” Richter said his irritation forgotten as he played with his new and latest toy.

	“Fight well Richter. Enjoy our gifts,” a wry expression found its way onto the Hearth Mother’s face.

	Richter smiled back, “Thank you again. There were one or two other things I would like to discuss. Master to Master so to speak.”

	Hisako nodded, “Daniella, take Sion to his armor. The rest of you, thank you for your help. I will speak with Lord Richter alone.”

	Everyone began to shuffle away. Sion and Daniella appeared to be arguing good-naturedly as soon as they started walking together. In a short period of time, Hisako and Richter were alone in the see of golden grasses. They walked leisurely through the meadow. The grasses reacted to the Hearth Mother’s presence, both bending out of her way and also caressing her outstretched hands.

	“So what did you want to discuss,” she asked.

	“First, I’m guessing from your surprise about hearing about the giant skeeling, Sion did not tell you about that battle?”

	“No, I had no knowledge of this. I have never heard of a skeeling any larger than a raccoon.”

	“Well, to make a long story short, we found an Offshoot. Sion said it was a baby Hearth Tree or something like that. The Seed Core was still active, and a skeeling had been feeding off of its energy. It had grown to the size of a bear. We killed it and skinned it. Once it was dead, we were able to recover the Seed Core.”

	“Now I’m sure there is still a lot I don’t know about it,” Richter continued, “but Sion told me that if could grow any number of magical trees. He also told me that you would not mind me planting it in my village. Now I can only imagine what an amazing asset it could be for my village. Whatever benefits the tree might provide however, your friendship is more important to me. The Seed Core seems like a relic of your people. I will give it to you if you want.” Richter pulled the brown sphere from his bag. The green veins pulsed with light. Once more, he was filled with a feeling of contentment, and the smell of warm rain on grass filled his nose.

	“My son was correct. If the Forest led you to the Seed Core, then it belongs with you. But,” a speculative look crossed her timeless features, “perhaps we can help one another. Your Mist Village is the physical manifestation of your Place of Power, much as the Hearth Tree is the physical manifestation of mine. I am guessing that your village is still at level 1, however. I have access to certain high-level spells that you do not yet. Both of our Places of Power share a Life ley line. As long as the spell is of that school there shouldn’t be any… unforeseen consequences.”

	“Okay, you lost me. What do you mean consequences,” Richter asked.

	“It is never a good idea to recklessly blend magic of different types. It can cause short or long term effects that might be good or ill. To fully explain would take years of study, but an example is casting Heal on a zombie. A spell of Life cast upon a creature of Death can have the opposite effect. In this case, casting Heal actually harms the zombie because it is undead. The same spell would might heal a vampire, though, because it is living dead. As you can see the details can get quite frustrating and irritating. It is best not to imbue an already powerful relic with a blessing that just might negatively react with the massive Powers your village is built upon.”

	“Makes sense,” Richter said. “So what blessing did you have in mind?”

	“There are several, but what I suggest is the Life Blessing of Growth. Seed Cores grow much quicker than other trees, but it would still take years for even a level 1 tree to develop. I can advance the growth one level, which would equate to ten to fifteen years of growth. The Blessing of Growth is also the best because we do not know what type of tree will be made. I don’t know if Sion explained, but Seed Cores create whichever type of tree best serves the needs of the lives around it. We can almost be assured it will be a strong tree, though if you plant it at your Place of Power.”

	“I will trust your judgement. The growth blessing sounds wonderful, but you mentioned that I could help you as well. What can I do?”

	“I am sure you remembered the chrysalis from the staff?” Richter nodded. “Unfortunately, we have been unable to revive the Royal Pixie inside. I can only deduce that the pixie has been in stasis for too long. That, coupled with the chrysalis being used to fuel that evil weapon, must have made its life spark flicker dangerously low. We need an infusion of Life energy to safely extract it from the chrysalis. A Seed Core is the purest expression of Life Magic that I know. Unfortunately, the Hearth Tree will not make another for at least one hundred years. That is why I need your help. When a Seed Core is planted, it releases an amazing amount of Life energy. You can save the pixie trapped in the chrysalis. Will you help?

	You have been offered a Quest: Resurgence of Light I. The pixie race was destroyed many years ago by a magical plague. One chrysalis has been recovered. One last light has been preserved. When you plant the Seed Core at the Mist Village, will you help Hisako birth the Royal Pixie Chrysalis. Reward: Unknown. Yes or No?

	Richter nodded at Hisako, “Of course I will help.”

	She breathed a sigh of relief, “Thank you. The ceremony for the blessing will take place at tomorrow morning. I will need to use all the mana that can be generated by my Place of Power, and I have already used a large amount to enhance your armor. My stores will replenish by the morning. As long as we get the Seed Core planted within a week, the Blessing will last. While you wait today, I have a suggestion. You should work with Yoshi. He is an adept in swordsmanship. He can teach you how to use that sword on your back.”

	“Thank you. I would be honored,” Richter said somewhat surprised. It never occurred to him that the diminutive sprites would have a high-level swordsman. Before he let Hisako slip away, there was one last piece of business to address, “Do you know where the bugbear and goblin camp is yet?”

	Hisako sighed, “We are looking, but so far we have found nothing. We must be cautious, though. The bugbears have been sending out patrols of their own. We have already had several skirmishes. Thankfully none of my people have been seriously wounded yet. Don’t worry, we know they are to the east, so there are only so many places they can hide. We will let you know soon.”

	Richter nodded and the two of them walked back through the tall grasses. Once they reached the Hearth Tree, Hisako took her leave. As she was walking away, she called out to another sprite to bring the sword adept. She also looked back and said, “Don’t worry about returning your old armor. I have a feeling it might come in handy for you to have a spare set. Also,” she paused, “you might want to put on your new armor now.” The last was said with what could only be described as a devilish grin on her face. With that parting rejoinder, she walked away.

	A little confused as to why he would need stronger armor in the heart of the wood sprites’ defenses, he still took her advice. Once that was done, he stowed his old armor in his Bag of Holding. It took up a ridiculous amount of slots in the 20x20 grid. He would have to unload it in the vault as soon as he got back to his village. Once that was done, he drew his long sword and took several practice swings with it. The tall gold grass bent out of his way whenever the sword came near. At first he thought it was a trick of the wind, but when he intentionally tried to hit the grass, it still avoided the strike. He started a bit of a game, fencing with the grass which continually dodged out the way. Despite his efforts, he got nowhere near cutting even one of the tall gold blades of grass. He jumped back with his sword extended, and one arm thrown in the air behind him and shouted, “En garde!”

	“Don’t play with it son,” a gruff voice said. “That’s how you go blind!”

	Confused, Richter turned towards the voice. He was surprised by who stood before him. The sprite was taller than most. Hisako was the tallest he had seen at four feet. This man was closer to five. He also lacked the smooth, childlike quality to his face that the other sprites possessed. That may have just been due to the scar that pulled the left corner of his mouth down into a slight perpetual frown, but Richter didn’t think so. His ears were also more pointed and his skin a slightly darker hue. Richter decided to use his Analyze skill.

	Name: Yoshi. Half-Sprite, Half-Human. Level 26. Health 520. Mana 200. Stamina 290. Racial blends are erratic in their disposition. They can end up with some or none of any of their parent races characteristics. Profession: Warrior.

	Level 26! And he had a profession! This was not someone to take lightly! Richter nodded at him. “So you are the sword adept?”

	“That I am. Hisako asked me to help you. Is there a reason you’re staring at me like that?”

	Richter had been closely examining the man. He had never seen a mix of the races before. When Yoshi asked the question, though, he jumped, not realizing he had been so obvious with his observation.

	“I’m sorry, I’ve just never met someone who was born of two races before.”

	“And? Do you have a problem with it,” Yoshi asked with raw ire in his voice.

	“Not at all! I did not mean to offend you! I am truly appreciative of any help I could receive from an adept like yourself.” Richter raised both hands in a mollifying gesture.

	Yoshi gave a loud ‘hmpf.’ “Well enough then. We might as well get started. Hold onto that crowbar you call a sword if you can!” Yoshi picked up a bundle of thick sticks he had next to him and walked over to Richter. He dropped the bundle when he was a few steps away from Richter and drew a four-foot long piece of wood from the collection. It was a thumb width in size and bare patches showed where smaller twigs had been torn off.

	“Now attack me,” Yoshi said.

	Richter looked at him with uncertainty, “You’re not going to use a sword?”

	“No, I’m going to use these branches.”

	“Why? I don’t want to hurt y-. Owww!”

	As Richter was talking, Yoshi had leisurely raised his stick and then there was a blur. Richter hadn’t seen the man move, but he felt the stick strike him in the side of the head. He grabbed the spot that was throbbing, taking a step back. When he looked up again, Yoshi was standing in the same place with a calm expression on his face.

	“I am using this stick for several reasons. You have just discovered one of them. It allows me to instruct you without the risk of immediate and irreparable injury. When I give you a command, I expect it to be followed. You may always ask questions, but only after, or time permitting, during, the completion of my command. Now come face me and attack.”

	Richter rubbed his head and glared at the man. He wanted to be attacked? Fine! Richter would give Yoshi a little scar to remember him by. He stomped up to the smaller man. With no hesitation he lunged forward, sword positioned to scrap the man’s ribs. That was the intention anyway. What actually happened, was Richter began to move forward, Yoshi did something, and then he was lying on his back. The sword was no longer in his hand and now his right wrist, both temples, chest and left leg were all throbbing. It was now very clear why Hisako had told him to put on his enhanced armor. Even wearing it and with Yoshi using only a stick, this was incredibly painful!

	Richter heard a long suffering sigh come from Yoshi. “Banished gods, why have I been sent such a hopeless case? Well, get back up human. We have a lot of work to do.”

	Richter’s only answer was the combination of a slow exhale and a groan.





CHAPTER 2




	The rest of the day was a study in abuse. The strikes with the stick didn’t remove more than one health at the most. The worst injury Richter received was actually when he tripped over his own feet and landed on a rock. The minor loss of health did not translate to the pain he felt, though! Yoshi was a true sadist. Richter was convinced that the man had methodically beaten every square inch of his body. After hours of torment, with no lunch break, Richter might add, Yoshi said it was time to stop. That was only because the sun was going down.

	After Yoshi called it quits for the day, he just picked up his bundle of sticks and walked away without another word. The reason for the large number of sticks became clear after Yoshi had broken the first one against Richter’s thigh. The point was further illustrated when the second stick broke across Richter’s back. By the third break, Richter stopped thinking about it. That was partly because when that particular branch broke, it was across the back of his head. It was nice having a pause in the training, even if it was because he had been knocked unconscious for a short period of time.

	Richter slowly stumbled after the sword adept/sadist, his entire body screaming in protest. He just wanted to lay down and stop existing, but he refused to give Yoshi the satisfaction. The entire time they had been “training” Yoshi had taunted him. ‘All you need to do is walk away’ ‘This is not fun for me either’ ‘Well its kinda fun’ ‘Only sissies vomit…’ ‘Well I guess I am looking at a sissy.’ Richter was kept upright through the day out of pure spite. He had pride, and would not be broken! Who cares if it now took twenty minutes to walk a hundred yards? That’s not the point!

	The sprites were gathered at the base of the Hearth Tree for their evening meal. Sion was sitting at the center table next to Hisako, and Yoshi was sitting next to him. An empty seat was at Hisako’s side reserved for Richter. When Sion saw Richter’s pathetic appearance, he started laughing loudly until Yoshi jabbed a quick finger into his throat. After that, his so-called friend was more focused on breathing than mocking him.

	Richter sat down with a pained noise, and Hisako just looked at him with a sympathetic expression. Was she smirking right before he had turned to look at her? He had to keep his eye on this woman. She might not be too different from her son in terms of twisted humor! All such unworthy thoughts fled, however, with what she did next.

	Hisako reached out her hand and laid it atop of his. With a few muttered words a gold light enveloped her hand and spread up his arm and then over the rest of his body. It alleviated his aches and pains and left him with a refreshed feeling. He sighed in relief. Then he looked at Sion still struggling to breathe. Richter took an exaggerated deep breath while looking his Companion in the eye and then exhaled overly loud. Sion glared daggers back.

	“Thank you, Hisako. Your sword adept was… very energetic in his lesson!”

	Yoshi looked up, “Are you complaining, son?”

	“Not at all, Yoshi. Who doesn’t like being beaten with a rod for twelve hours?”

	The half man laughed, “Happy to oblige then. We will do more when we leave tomorrow.”

	“We,” Richter asked, with a sick feeling in his stomach.

	“Yes, of course. The Hearth Mother is leaving the protection of the glade for the first time in over a century. Her protection is paramount.”

	“Ahem, yes,” Hisako said. “I was going to speak with you about this tonight Richter. I would like to be there personally for the planting. If you are okay with that.”

	“I would be honored,” Richter said.

	“Well that settles it,” Yoshi said. “We will train each morning, a bit over lunch and for two hours when we stop each night. Right now your sword work looks like a gnome having a seizure. I shouldn’t have to say this, but that is NOT what you should be striving for. It’s important to remember…”

	Yoshi continued to drone on, and Richter just sat back with a sour expression on his face. His appetite had fled for some reason.

	The next morning, countless sprites were gathered in the golden grasses around the Hearth Tree. They were arrayed in an expanding spiral with Hisako in the center. Each sprite held hands with the sprite to either side. They had gathered while it was still dark. As the sky began to lighten, they sang. Their already musical voices rose and fell in soft counterpoint. There was no direction or guidance, they simply coordinated as if being led by an orchestra conductor. The music grew as the sky lightened, and a golden glow began to infuse all of the tall grasses. The glow built in intensity, matching the tone of the sprites’ voices as the first rays of the sun shone down into the glade of the wood sprites. Hisako raised her own voice, and her soprano rang clear. The Seed Core was in her hands and she raised it above her head. The aura of magic permeating the glade flared, focusing upon Hisako. Pure golden light shot into the sky like a spot light and then went out. The sprites voices subsided at the same time.

	Hisako was left standing in the center of her people with the Seed Core still above her head. The green veins of light glowed much brighter than before and small cracks in the shell of the Seed leaked golden light. Richter expected Hisako to look exhausted, but instead she seemed exhilarated. She handed him the Seed with a broad grin on her face.

	“Everything went wonderfully! The spell might have yielded a result even be more powerful than I had hoped! Let’s not waste any time. I think it is time that I saw your home.” She turned in a circle looking out at her people. “My fellow sprites, I travel now with our friend Lord Richter of the Mist Village. We will plant a Seed Core and bring life to a tree of magic!” The wood sprites cheered her pronouncement. “I will miss you all, and will return soon. Follow the wisdom of the elders, who will lead in my absence. Thank you for your help this day, and, as always stay true to the Forest!”

	Another cheer sounded, and then all of the sprites broke up into various smaller groups and went on about their days. Hisako turned to Yoshi, who was flanked by twenty other armored sprites. “Are we ready to go, sword adept Yoshi?”

	“We are, Hearth Mother. In addition to the guard we have arranged, Daniella requests to accompany us.”

	Sion who had been standing quietly at his mother’s side until that moment decided to chime in, “I don’t really think that is necessary. A smaller group is less likely to attract attention. Especially with bugbears and goblins roaming the woods.”

	Daniella was walking as up he spoke, “Thinking Sion? Never really your strong suit. I would like to see the home of our new neighbors. If it is okay with Lord Richter, that is?”

	Richter looked at the female sprite and then looked at his friend Sion. The beseeching gaze on his Companion’s face was almost pitiful. But what are best friends for, if not to gain a cheap laugh at your expense. He plastered a huge smile on his face, “I would be honored to have you join us, Daniella. In fact! You are welcome as long as you like.” He gave his best impression of a courtly bow, and dipped his head toward the pretty sprite who laughed delightedly and clapped her hands. When he picked his head back up, he looked at Sion whose face was screwed up in silent anger. Richter simply smiled even bigger and mouthed the word ‘pushups.’ Oh yes, he thought dramatically, you will learn the truth of this old Tarantino proverb, Revenge is a dish best served cold! And it looked like it would be a cold day in hell before Daniella gave Sion a moment’s peace.

	“Well that settles that,” Hisako said. Turning to Richter, she said, “I did have a thought last night. I do not want to infringe upon your hospitality, but you would you do me the favor of hosting one of our elders?” She beckoned forward an older sprite who had been standing several paces behind her. “This is Sumiko. Her counsel has guided me through many difficult decisions. I would ask that you accept her as an ambassador between our two peoples. She is also a Master of Life Magic. I believe you would find her aid invaluable.”

	This wasn’t Richter doing Hisako a favor, which she clearly knew. He had very little Life magic at his disposal other than his Charm spell. It was not the kind of spell he could practice with often. Having a Life Master to teach him spells and speed his leveling would be incredible. He looked at Sumiko and said, “I would be honored to have you join us for as long as you are willing. Your presence will be a gift, and I will treat it as such.” Man, he was really getting good at this grownup talk!

	Yoshi looked at them all and shouldered his pack, “Well, the sun slows for no one. Let’s get going.”

	They started walking, but paused at the edge of the golden glade while Hisako took a long look at the Hearth Tree. Then she turned away, squared her shoulders, and kept walking forward. The sword adept set a brisk pace. Yoshi said he wanted to limit the time spent out in the open. Richter used the time they were walking to speak with Sumiko. The older sprite was only a few inches above three feet, but was spry enough to keep pace. She had an easy smile and short cropped black hair. Her skin was a touch lighter than the normal olive complexion of the other sprites. Her face was a bit rounder as well. Richter spent the first day just discussing the strengths of Life Magic with her. She was every bit as pleasant as she looked. Sumiko promised to teach him a spell in the morning.

	His interactions with Yoshi were somewhat surprising. At the lunch break, the sword adept walked over with a stick. Richter groaned internally, but stood and raised his sword none the less. The man simply shook his head and told Richter to sheath the blade. Rather than beat Richter pillar to post, Yoshi instead showed him a sequence of movements called a “form.” The first form was named, “The Forest Wind.” It focused on shoulder length sweeps of Richter’s blade for attack. The second was called, “Willow in the Storm.” He was made to move through a series of motions that bent him at odd angles, keeping his sword between him and the anticipated “attack.” For both, Yoshi focused a great amount of attention on Richter’s stance. Each movement required him to be both flexible and balanced. They went through the same series of movements for the half hour allotted for lunch each day. When it was time to move again, Yoshi just corrected his stance a final time by gently prodding one leg, grunted and then walked away.

	Richter was certainly not disappointed that he didn’t need healing again, but the man’s demeanor was so different that it was a bit a mystery. He wasn’t about to complain, though. He shouldered his bag and walked on with everyone else, resuming his conversation with Sumiko.

	The next several days followed the same pattern. Walking with Sumiko, and during their rests, training the forms with Yoshi. He would steal a little time in between to read the lore books he had bought from Leandra. At the end of the second night, Yoshi stood opposite him again holding a small branch. The sprite attacked from a high guard. Richter responded with Willow in the Storm and flowed out of the path of the attack. It somehow left him in the perfect position to attack with The Forest Wind form. The two of them flowed through the movements, their two sticks clattering together. Richter saw now how the two forms he had been practicing naturally complemented each other. The kept up this exchange for almost an hour. When they finished a final rapid exchange, Yoshi stepped back and grunted.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Swordsmanship. Damage +2%. Chance to cause bleed status +0.5%.

	The sprite was turning to leave when Richter called out, “I really appreciate you teaching me, but I’m not exactly sure what I am supposed to be learning. When I studied with other Masters, I leveled up several times, but I my swordsmanship skill seems only to raise when we spar. Why don’t we spar the whole time?”

	“I am teaching you the art of the blade, not how to increase your level. You could bash away at a monster all day long with your sword. It would raise your level, but you would learn nothing. To you, a sword would still just be a club with edges. If you go that route, anyone with a bit of training will still kill you no matter how high your level is,” Yoshi replied.

	That made sense. If there was one thing he had found about The Land, is was that the proper application of force was just as, if not more important than, brute force alone. “I understand. Thank you again, Master Yoshi,” Richter said with a slight bow of his head. The sprite was turning away again when a thought occurred to Richter. “Master Yoshi!” The sprite turned back. “If you are meaning to teach me the art of sword fighting, why did you just beat me with sticks the first day?”

	Yoshi looked at him for a moment, then a rueful expression crossed his face. “To be completely honest, I was nursing a massive hangover when they told me Hisako wanted me to meet you. I was in a foul mood. Beating you with rods seemed like a great way to vent my frustration. That might not have been fair, but if it helps, it did put me in a better mood.” With that shameless comment, the sprite walked away. Richter just stared after him with his mouth hanging open.





CHAPTER 3




	The party arrived at the edge of the Confusing Mist enchantment mid-morning on the third day. Richter gave the entire party immunity, and they continued on. Over the past several days, Yoshi had taught Richter a third form, Cat Swatting at Mouse. It focused on quick stabbing attacks while keeping his center of gravity low. Yoshi drilled him in all three, randomly calling out the name of a form. The goal was to have Richter’s body respond without thinking. Yoshi made sure that Richter knew he had a long, long way to go.

	Richter’s time with Sumiko had not been wasted either as shown by the prompts he had accumulated.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Life Magic. New spells are now available.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Slow Heal! Restore 30 missing health over 60 seconds upon casting. This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost 40 mana. Duration: 6 seconds. Range: Touch. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 1 min.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Cure! Remove minor poison effects! This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost 50 mana. Duration: 1 second. Range: Touch. Cast time: 2 seconds. Cool down: 30 seconds.

	Neither spell was exceptionally powerful, but Sumiko assured him that as his level increased the spells increased in usefulness drastically.

	A few hours passed as they walked through the mists, and suddenly the village was before them. Richter and Sion had been gone a little over a week. The village was showing the same hustle and bustle that had been there when they left. There were also a few welcome developments. The framework for a wooden cradle had been started by the river, presumably for ship building. Work had also been started on the forge, three walls already having been erected. Also, the crude earthwork walls at the inner edge of the moat surrounding the village had been leveled in long stretches. It would let people stand on the walls to see a greater distance. Richter wondered who had taken the initiative to do that. He certainly approved. As always, Futen met Richter at the boundaries of the village.

	“Hey you sexy beast,” Richter greeted the remnant. Futen was the fragment of an ancient magician’s soul. He had been tied to this Place of Power and was meant to serve whomever was the current Master of the Mist Village. He looked like a grey floating sphere with a white light in the center.

	The orb just pulsed slowly hovering several feet in the air.

	“Well don’t go getting all mushy on me,” Richter laughed. “Okay then, what’s been happening since I’ve been gone?”

	“Would you like a full report, my Lord?” Futen’s deadpan voice was no longer strange to Richter. It was even comforting after a fashion. Like the unique sounds and smells of your grandmother’s house, Futen’s voice just served to remind him on a visceral level that he had come home.

	“No, just anything that requires my immediate attention.”

	“All events can wait until you are settled then, my Lord.”

	“Good! No news is good news. Futen, this is Lady Hisako, the Master of the Hearth Tree, and leader of the wood sprites. She and all members of her party are honored guests. Extend them every courtesy and respond to their questions when asked. Now please go ahead of us, and have some accommodations prepared for them. The men can bunk in the barracks. Lady Hisako and Daniella,” he indicated the other female sprite, “will stay in my room.”

	“Richter that isn’t necessary,” Hisako protested.

	“I won’t have it any other way Hisako. I do not have much hospitality to offer yet, but what I do have is yours. Now please come see my village.”

	The party continued walking forward, and the various new settlers of the Mist Village looked up as they passed. Whatever tasks they were attending to were forgotten. How could carrying water compete with the Master of their new home being accompanied by a squad of armed sprite warriors? By the time they had walked to the foot of the hill leading to the first floor of the catacombs, more than a hundred villagers had gathered. Richter partly climbed the hill and then turned to look out at his people.

	“I was planning on gathering everyone later, but enough of you are here now. This is Lady Hisako, the leader of the wood sprites. They are our friends, and we are lucky to have them. This is the first time she has graced us with her presence, but I look forward to a warm and profitable relationship between our two peoples for many years to come. The benefits of our friendship start for us today. The Hearth Mother has come with a blessing. We will be planting an enchanted tree, and the blessing will make sure that it grows strong.” The people nodded and smiled. It wasn’t exactly a resounding cheer, but it seemed they were on board, so Richter would take it. He hadn’t really thought about the logistics of keeping close to three hundred people happy when he had recruited them, but he had a feeling that morale wasn’t something he just wanted to ignore.

	Richter looked at Hisako, “When should we do this?”

	“I see no reason to wait,” she said. “The weather is clear now, but there are clouds on the horizon. We can do the ceremony before the weather breaks.”

	Futen floated towards them from the entrance to the catacombs. “My Lord, am I correct in assuming that you plan to plant a Seed Core in the village?”

	Richter was somewhat surprised that the remnant knew what the Seed Core was. Futen had been around for tens of thousands of years, but his memory was fragmented. “That is what I’m planning. What do you know about the Seed Cores?”

	“Only that they are powerful relics, and that several previous Masters have attempted to obtain one but had no success. They always lamented that the sprites would not provide one.”

	Hmmmm, the remnant’s memory seemed to be improving, Richter thought. “Do you remember anything else?”

	“No, my Lord, many specific details still remain beyond my grasp. I would offer a suggestion, however. I heard the sprite Mother suggest planting the Seed now, but I believe tonight would be better.”

	“Why do you say this,” Hisako asked. She was looking at the remnant with curiosity, but also with caution. Richter didn’t understand why she looked so pensive.

	“I believe you are operating as if you were at your own Place of Power, Master Hisako. I can sense that you are a Master of Light, Life and Earth. Were we planting the Seed at your seat of power, then this would be the perfect time. The Mist Village, however, is built upon a nexus of Life, Dark, Water, and Air. The most auspicious time would be when the environment compliments those Powers. I suggest that we wait until nightfall. That will coincide with our Dark Power. The presence of the storm will fulfill the obligation of the Air and Water Powers. The Seed Core itself is Life magic. I believe that waiting will provide the highest chance to obtain a powerful tree.”

	Richter looked at Hisako, “What do you think?”

	“His reasoning is sound. When I advised to plant the Core now, I admit that in the back of my mind I was applying reasoning that would be best for the Hearth Tree. The blessing will easily last until tonight. It will also let me find the best place to plant the Seed Core.”

	“Okay then,” Richter said. I will let you all explore and relax after our trip. If you need anything, just ask. I’m going to check in with my people.” He looked over at Sion, who, as usual, had not been able to shed Daniella’s company. His Companion looked at him with hope in his eyes, expecting to be asked along. Richter smiled toothily, “Sion, why don’t you show Daniella around. I won’t need you until the ceremony tonight.” He then turned and walked to greet his people. Sion’s glare washed over him with the all of the comforting warmth of a sunlight.

	Richter’s first stop was to check in at the half constructed smithy. He was greeted by his wood elf carpenter Roswan. The elf was a gruff six-foot tall man, with a somewhat terse manner. What made him truly stand apart was his hair style. Most elves had long straight hair that they wore loose or plaited. Roswan cut his hair short and wore it high and tight with a large part on the left. He was also one of the few elves with facial hair, and he sported a thick brown mustache.

	“Hello Roswan,” Richter said.

	Roswan just made a half mmmm, half growl, and kept working on his current project.

	Richter gave a sigh. The cantankerous man was not the easiest person to work with. If only he wasn’t so good at his job! “So how are we looking for the forge?” The framework was up, as were the several walls he had seen upon coming back to the village. They had apparently also laid the floor, using slate as opposed to wood. Probably a good idea seeing as how there would be countless sparks and embers from the forge.

	The elf gave the same response he had given before when Richter had asked for a progress report, “It’s being built.”

	Richter waited for any more information, but as per usual, nothing more was forthcoming. “I love our little talks Roswan.” Grrmmm was the only response. Richter gave a half sigh, “Where are Hilda and the other dwarves?” Hilda was one of the dwarf elders that had initially agreed to come to the village.

	“Grrmmm, they are poking around in the mountain,” he said gesturing to the foothills and mountains north of the village. “Might be back tonight for dinner.”

	“Well is there anything you need,” Richter asked.

	“More wood… more help… more bacon and eggs,” the elf said without looking up.

	Richter just shook his head at the man. Not even a “grrmmmm” that time. Richter walked on. He tried to say hello to everyone. Most just gave a polite smile or wave, and then went on about their business. Luckily, his Analyze skill let him know everyone’s names, or he would have had no clue as to most. His skill did require mana, though, which wasn’t limitless, so there was a fair amount of “Looking good!” and “My man!” thrown into his greetings as well.

	Richter walked past the walls of the village, out into the newly cultivated farmland. Dozens of people were planting various crops. He had bought corn, wheat, potatoes, some soy like plant called ifiz, tomatoes, and a host of others. There were no citrus or other fruit trees, unfortunately. One of the things Richter planned to buy from Hafiz was a series of fruit trees. He had bought several barrels of apples and a type of large citrus fruit that tasted like a mix between passion fruit and limes, but with no refrigeration, they would not last long. Richter had wondered about getting a balanced diet. Of course, he might be worrying for nothing. After all, who knew how his body here matched up with his old Earth body. It would be the bone head move of all time, though, to become a powerful warrior and mage, and then develop scurvy.

	All of his impromptu farmers seemed to be on task and happy, so Richter didn’t rock the boat. He was not one to micromanage people who knew their job better than he did. It was a well-stressed point during his upbringing, that a smart leader found people smarter than himself, and then put them to work. Richter had seen no reason to think he had chosen his new villagers poorly. He spent an hour walking among the farmers and speaking with the guards who patrolled the edges of the forest.

	It had never been far from Richter’s mind that though the mists were an effective deterrent against most humanoids, wild animals, and certain monsters would not be affected. Luckily, the guards said there had been no incursions close to the village. They also reported though, that the hunters had spied several cave bears to the north, and a pack of wolves had been close enough to hear their howls a few days ago. Richter decided to start organizing larger hunting parties. The site the village was being built upon had been wild and untouched land for hundreds of years. There was no overestimating the dangers that lurked nearby, and he swore to himself that he would not forget that.

	After walking through the fields, Richter then walked to the river that was to the west of village. His destination was the wooden cradle that had been set up to start building the village’s first ship. The closest hub of trade was the Kingdom of Yves. On foot, the journey took almost three weeks. With a ship to navigate the countless rivers in this part of the world, the journey could be accomplished in a fraction of the time. If trade was to become a regular part of life, the ship was of paramount importance.

	Richter had been lucky enough that a high elf adept shipbuilder and her two apprentices had agreed to come to the village. Skill ranks were not arbitrary in The Land. Novice was skill level one through nine. Ten through twenty-four granted initiate level, and levels twenty-five through fourty-four meant you were an apprentice. Journeymen were levels forty-five to sixty-nine, adepts were seventy to ninety-nine, and masters had achieved skill level one hundred and above. What the ranks meant seemed to vary from skill to skill as far as Richter could tell. Magic masters and adepts could teach spells without spell books, and training with someone of a higher rank than you would increase the rate that someone leveled their skills. Other than that, Richter really didn’t have an understanding of how the ranks impacted anything.

	“Ho the ship,” Richter called out.

	“Very funny, my Lord,” the ship builder said. Shivona was short for a high elf at five and a half feet. She had long black hair plaited to her waist, a petite figure and broad hips. Rather broad and round actually… Richter had noticed that she switched when she walked in a… very distracting way. Richter liked her for her confident attitude and competent manner. When they had first come to the village, she had caught him staring a time or two. She never seemed angry, though, she just gave him a challenging little smile and then stared right back. He decided to forgo that this morning, speaking up before she noticed him.

	“I’m glad to see that you’ve started on the ship.” The ribbing was well on the way to being completed as far as Richter could tell. “Is there anything you need from me?”

	“Things are moving well, but if I could have one of those Mist Workers allocated to me, then things would move a good deal faster,” she said.

	“Done,” Richter said promptly. Mist Workers were magical constructs that Richter could summon. They lacked any real intelligence, but they were strong and had good reserves of stamina. They couldn’t be trusted with complicated tasks, but were perfectly suited for manual labor. Unfortunately, he could only summon so many per day, the amount dictated by the 1,000 mana limit on the village’s mana pool. It did regenerate every hour, but only so much. When the villagers had found out about the magical beasts of burden, they all decided they had to have one. Needless to say, demand was high. Ship construction was a priority for Richter, though. There were no internet or telecoms in The Land. The only way for his village to be connected to the rest of world was to physically travel to neighboring towns and settlements. He had arranged for one of the ships that had brought the settlers to the Mist Village to return to the boundaries of the Confusing Mist spell in several weeks’ time. The cost of arranging that had been several gold coins paid upfront. That amounted to several hundred US dollars that were eating into his potential profits!

	“How long until the ship will be ready,” Richter asked.

	“She should be river ready in three months,” Shivona said with certainty.

	Richter widened his eyes, “That soon? I was expecting it to take the better part of a year!”

	“Ha,” she scoffed. “Maybe it would take that long for ham-fisted humans…,” she looked up with a stricken look when she remembered the lord of her new village was human. Richter just gestured for her to keep going with an amused expression on his face. She nodded gratefully and continued, “As I was saying, high elves are the finest ship builders in The Land. Each of us are proficient with a certain type of magic as well. I have affinity for Water and Earth magic, both at apprentice skill level. My aides have affinities to Water and Air magic respectively.”

	“So you cast spells to make the work go faster,” Richter asked.

	“That is part of it, but also, we just maintain a low level of ambient mana when we are working.” Seeing that Richter wasn’t following, she explained further, “You can cast different types of spells, correct? I am sure you have noticed that right before casting spells of different types of magic, there is a recognizable feeling. For myself, casting Water spells feels different than casting Earth spells.”

	Richter nodded, his Earth magic spells made him feel ‘solid’ for lack of a better description. Water magic gave him a cool “fluid” feeling, and his Ice Dagger spell made his hands feel cold right before casting, though that may have been specific to that spell.

	“Well my Lord, we focus on that feeling while we work, not actually using mana, just accessing it. We have found that the ships will ultimately be stronger and faster by infusing mana while we work. That’s one of the reasons high elves are such excellent craftsmen. In addition to having a high shipbuilding skill, we increase our skill level in magic as well. Of course, this ship won’t be as strong as enchanted ships and won’t have anywhere near the power of kytachi vessels.”

	“Just call me Richter,” he said absently. It wasn’t often his Gift of Tongues ability didn’t automatically translate every word. It seemed only to happen when the word expressed a concept he wasn’t fully familiar with. Kytachi seemed to translate as ‘caught souls.’

	“I don’t understand,” Richter said. “Are you saying you can make the ship stronger? Why don’t you?”

	Seeing his confusion, Shivona explained further, “A jewel can be infused with a spell and attached to the ship. An example would be the Earth spell Durability. The spell could be infused into a jewel and then attached to the ship. The ship’s structure would be stronger. The size of the ship usually means that several jewels need to be strategically placed in key positions, though. Otherwise, you have one part of the ship much stronger than the others. It might not seem important, but the boards of a ship need to swell and shrink together. If one area is much stronger than the others, it creates a stress point that might snap the ship in two. I’m sure you can see that using several jewels for one effect, while beneficial to the ship, would be very costly.”

	Richter nodded his understanding. He wasn’t completely disregarding the possibility, though. He still had many jewels in his inventory, and it might be worth using a few to enchant the ship. “What about a kytachi?”

	“A kytachi vessel is something else entirely, my L-, Richter. It requires that a soul stone that has been invested with a spirit to be irreversibly bonded to a ship. The stronger the spirit, the stronger the vessel. It is not an exact process, though,” she cautioned. “Over time, the vessel takes on the characteristics of the spirit. I’ll give you an example. There is a monster called a water dancer that skips over the tops of rivers and lakes on long thin legs. It spreads its weight out so each point of contact only dimples the water, but never actually penetrates the surface. Dancers are detestable creatures, and will use a paralytic poison to stun you. While you’re immobilized, they insert a thin proboscis into your body and drink your blood.” She shuddered for a second before continuing. “As horrible a creature as it is however, if its spirit was caught in a soul stone and then bonded to a ship, that ship would skip over the waves and move faster through the water than almost any others.”

	“So if I got you a soul stone filled with the right type of sould, you could bond it to the ship,” Richter asked.

	“Well that takes a shipmaster who is also at least a Journeyman in the subskill kyatchi bonding,” she said regretfully. Richter’s hopes fell.

	“Lucky for you, I am just that amazing,” Shivona said with a smug look on her face.

	Richter smiled back at the saucy elf, “Really? Oh, I could kiss you!”

	“Settle down, Richter, it’s not that kind of party!” She was still smiling, though.

	“How do I get a soul stone,” he asked.

	“Now that is outside of my realm of expertise,” she said, “but some of the other mages here should have some ideas.”

	“Fair enough,” he said delighted. “Then I will let you get back to work. Futen, send over a Mist Worker daily from here on out. Instruct it to follow the instructions of Shivona and her apprentices.”

	“Yes, my Lord,” the remnant said.

	Richter started walking back towards the village. He needed to talk to Randolphus. As he was entering the walls, he was greeted by his Companion Terrod. “Hello my friend,” Ricther said clasping wrists with the former innkeeper.

	Terrod had large bags under his eyes and a harried look. Barely two weeks ago, the man had carried the dead body of his best friend in a desperate escape from Law, the capital city of Yves. That loss, coupled with trying to be pillar of support for his psychologically damaged love, Isabel, was clearly wearing the man down. Richter felt a bit of guilt over having left his Companion in charge for the last week. Terrod needed more time to recover. He would speak to the carpenters about building a small private cottage for Isabel and his friend as soon as there was time.

	“Hello back,” Terrod said with a tired smile. “Did you accomplish everything you needed to on your trip?”

	“I did. I’m not sure if you know, but the leader of the wood sprites has come back to perform a ceremony for us.”

	“I had heard a contingent of sprites had come back with you, but I wasn’t sure why.”

	“Well, either way, it is good to see you. Is there anything I should know about that happened over the past week,” Richter asked.

	“Some predator animals were seen by hunters, but none came close to the village. As you can see, all the villagers are settling in well. Randolphus has been amazing in forseeing problems before they arise.”

	“I’m glad to hear that. It brings up the other topic I wanted to talk with you about,” Richter said. He looked the man in the eye, and spoke softly but firmly, “I think you should have some private time with Isabel. You don’t need to do anything else for a while. Just let me know when you’re ready.”

	“That isn’t necessary,” Terrod protested. “I can pull my weight!”

	Richter continued to look at him with a serious expression, “I know you can Terrod. Look around you. None of the people you see would be here if it wasn’t for your efforts. You are the one that included me in the raid with the Night Daggers. You are the one that organized for me to speak with the five elders. And you are the one who introduced me to Mama.” Richter paused before continuing, “You have already done more than I could ever ask. Now I need you to focus on just one thing. Be there for Isabel. Help her heal and heal yourself as well. I have a feeling there will be many trials in the days to come. I will need you at your best.”

	Terrod looked at Richter a few more seconds, and then reached out and squeezed his friend’s shoulder. “Thank you. I will take a few days to be with Isabel, and will be ready when you need me.”

	Richter smiled, “Good! Now walk with me for a moment, until I find Randy.”

	Terrod smiled back, “You know he hates being called that.” Randy, or Randolphus as was his proper name, was a wonderful aide but was also a bit stuffy.

	“Why do you think I do it,” Richter asked with a laugh.





CHAPTER 4




	The two Companions walked slowly through the village talking about this and that. Richter sent Futen ahead to look for Randolphus, and then report back. As he was talking with Terrod, he realized that he had not taken a look at his latest Companion status page. Letting his vision relax, Richter’s interface came up. He focused on the small icon of Terrod’s face that was floating next to Sion’s.

	 		 			 Name: Terrod

Age: 46

Level: 7, 41% to next level

Health: 190 Mana: 120 Stamina: 140

Strength: 16

Agility: 12

Dexterity: 14

Constitution: 19

Endurance: 14

Intelligence: 12

Wisdom: 10

Charisma: 19

Luck: 14

Abilities:

Comradery

Skills:

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 67% to next level, 87% affinity

Shields Lvl 4; 82% to next level, 98% affinity

Cooking Lvl 8; 13% to next level, 96% affinity

Horsemanship Lvl 9; 32% to next level; 83% affinity

Repair Lvl 4; 64% to next level; 54% affinity

Repair Armor Lvl 3; 13% to next level; 52% affinity

Repair Weapon Lvl 4; 18% to next level; 52% affinity

Marks:

None

Resistances:

None

Race: Human

Reputation: Lvl 1 “Who are you again?”

Alignment: 0

Language: Common Tongue





	Richter looked at his Companion. “Have you noticed that since we have become Companions you can see my status page?” Terrod nodded. “Well, I just looked at yours for the first time. You have a strange mix of skills.”

	Terrod gave a small chuckle, “Yes, I know. I didn’t serve in the army if that’s what you were thinking. At least not in a traditional way. I come from a very minor noble line several times removed from power. My mother convinced a cousin to take me on as a page when I was a child. He was a knight in Yves’s army. I followed his patrol for two years. That’s why I have some martial skills. One of the main responsibilities of a page is caring for his knight’s armor. If you have seen my status, then you’ve also seen that I was piss poor at that. What I was good at however, was making dinner each night and caring for the horses. I seemed to have a real connection with the animals. I also have good affinity for sword and shield, but riding was my true passion. That is what saved my life. My skill in Horsemanship was noticed, and I was promoted from page to mounted messenger. While I was away from the rest of my squad, delivering dispatches, they were attacked by a tribe of gnolls from the Whisper Woods. They were wiped out to the last man.”

	Terrod stopped talking for a second. “I was the one who found them. The gnolls had taken their scalps as trophies, and the battle hounds they train had savaged the rest of the remains. I could even tell which of the bodies was my cousin. That was it for me. I had already been debating whether or not I should leave. I never could get used to being ordered around. When I saw their bodies though… I still remember the way they looked, and I still remember the smell of the blood and entrails…”

	Terrod shook himself slightly as if to be rid of the bad memories. “Well, that’s why I have the strange collection of skills. I came back to Law and took on odd jobs til I landed at the Laughing Imp. Ten years later, I owned the inn. My Comradery Ability made things easier. It makes it more likely for people to enjoy my company, and want to work with me. As abilities go, it certainly helped me in life. And on more than a few dates, if you catch my meaning,” he laughed.

	Richter laughed as well. He was glad that the shadow that had been cast over his friend’s mood with the telling of his story was gone again. He hadn’t expected to be digging up such painful memories with his question. Despite the discomfort, it seemed to have caused, Richter was pleased that his Companion felt comfortable enough to share those personal details. He tried to further lighten the mood.

	“So you’re saying that if it wasn’t for your Ability, then you would be completely annoying and not just the pain in the neck that you are now,” Richter asked.

	Terrod chuckled, “Shut up.”

	“You got it,” Richter said. The remnant was gliding back towards them. “Futen, where is Randy?”

	“He is in the catacombs, my Lord. The chamberlain appropriated one of the side rooms as an office.”

	“Lead the way.”

	The remnant led them to the inclined entrance leading to the chamber of the Great Seal. Terrod split off saying he was going to find Isabel. Richter entered the tunnel and came out into the large chamber that housed the mosaic. The four spirals constituting the four Powers of the nexus of ley lines the village was built upon were much the same as he remembered. Each spiral represented on of the four Powers he could master. So far only one spiral showed signs of life. The clear crystal indicating Air Magic glowed with an inner light and depicted a cyclone in two dimensions. The other spirals for Dark Magic, Life magic and Water Magic remained only cold tile.

	There was one other change that made Richter smile. Someone had hung one of the larger paintings and the rug that Richter had stolen from Count Stonuck. They actually made pretty nice wall hangings, he thought. None of the smaller paintings were anywhere to be seen. Randolphus had told him previously he would see them hung as soon as the carpenters had time to make frames.

	Futen continued across the Great Seal and into one of the side rooms. Richter followed him, sparing only a bit of time to look at the stairs leading downward through another arch set into the wall. It led to the next level of the catacombs. Richter had not gone there yet due to Futen’s warning that it was populated with monsters. He would have to conquer the lower levels at some point if he ever wanted his village to progress to level two. It was one of the requirements Futen had told him about. He wasn’t sure what it meant to move on to level two exactly, but Richter was sure that he wanted it to happen!

	Richter also peeked into his room before following Futen, but Hisako was apparently occupied elsewhere. He continued on to speak with his chamberlain. Randy was sitting at a rough-hewn table bent over a stack of papers scribbling. Richter had not bought much paper and ink from Hafiz, he would have to remember to negotiate for more. “Hey Randy,” he said in a loud, boisterous voice.

	The man gave a clear sigh before looking up, “Welcome back, my Lord. I trust your trip went well.” He really didn’t like that name, Ricther thought with a silent chuckle. Randolphus, as was his full name, had been the chamberlin for the late king of Yves. The rules of proper decorum were heavily entrenched within him. So even though the shortening of Randolphus’s name clearly frustrated him, the man was too enamored of the proper rules of conduct to correct his liege. That kind of circular logic trap was exactly why Richter just spoke his mind. Being PC all the time took way too much effort and needless complicated things.

	“It did, thank you for asking. I’m guessing there are some things that require my attention?” Richter looked pointedly at the stack of papers on the desk.

	“Yes sir, there are.” Randolphus reached under the table and pulled out a previously hidden, and much larger stack of papers. He set them on the table top and picked up the first page, “Item one…”

	Richter gave a sigh of his own as he sat at the table. Was that a smirk on Randy’s face?!?

	Richter wasn’t able to escape Randy’s grasp for hours. Food was brought, but they kept grinding away. They covered topics ranging from resource management, defenses, the need to allocate people to key positions like trade master and captain of the guard, requests of the new villagers and items that needed to be bought during the next trip to Leaf’s Crossing. Unsurprisingly, the man had already included paper and ink in that list. As painful as the hours of book keeping were, there was no denying that Randolphus was thorough and indispensable.

	Richter stood and stretched. There were more items to be discussed according to his chamberlain, but he just couldn’t sit still any longer. When Randy had pulled a list of all the new villagers and wanted to go through each person’s qualifications and skills, he thought, enough! It was probably a few more hours until full night. Richter had more to accomplish before the planting ceremony. He was leaving the room when a thought occurred. He walked back to Randolphus and reached into his Bag of Holding. He withdrew the stack of papers he had taken from Count Stonuk’s private safe. The count was involved in nonhuman slavery in the Kingdom of Yves. He was also the reason that Terrod’s love, Isabel, had suffered so much emotional trauma.

	“Do you know Count Stonuk,” Richter asked.

	A look of distaste crossed Randolphus’s face, “Yes I do. One of the new king’s inner circle. A distasteful man that would not have been tolerated at court in the days of his father.”

	“Well, I was able to… procure, these papers from his private safe. They were well hidden so I’m assuming they are important. I’ve only glanced at them, but there are references that I don’t understand. It seems to be in code as well. Do you think you could make sense of them?”

	“I had many duties under the old King, my Lord. Part of that was to monitor the correspondence of less desirable types in court. Count Stonuk never struck me as overly bright. I have an ability called Code Breaking. I am sure that I can decipher these papers given time.”

	“Code Breaking,” Richter asked incedulously. Just who was Randolphus? All Mama had told him was that Randolphus had been a chamberlain. Richter wasn’t 100% up on his Ye Olde English terms, but he was pretty sure a chamberlain was kind of like a supped up butler. Now he was finding out that the man was 007! Analyze didn’t reveal much, however. Like Terrod, his level was a bit higher than other humans, but it was nothing to write home about. Richter didn’t know why he hadn’t analyzed the man before.

	Name: Randolphus. Human Level 9. Health 170. Mana 120. Stamina 140. Disposition: Friendly. Humans are one of the shortest lived, but most prolific breeders in the Land. Humans have a broader affinity for skills than other races. No special bonuses to race. Humans get four points to distribute per level.

	“Yes, my Lord,” Randolphus answered.

	“Just ‘yes’?”

	“Yes, my Lord,” he said with just a touch more force.

	Richter was silent for a moment. Who would be born with an ability in Code Breaking. How often could that come up? It seemed very coincidental that the former King of Yves’ chamberlain had such a useful and appropriate ability. Then again, Richter thought, maybe that was one of the reasons that Randolphus had risen to power.

	“Well, no rush. I truly appreciate you help.” Every man was entitled to his own secrets, Richter thought. It didn’t seem like he was getting the whole story though, and so he resolved to pay a little closer attention to his chamberlain in the future.

	“It is my pleasure to serve, my Lord.”

	Richter left the room with Futen floating along behind him. He stopped at the Great Seal. When he had searched his inventory for the count’s paper, he had seen two other items that required his attention. The first was also from the count’s safe. It was a blue wand tipped with a white jewel. Richter had no Lore to speak of yet, despite finding snippets of time to read Leandra’s book, and had no identification spells. When he looked at it, the prompt simply said, “Magic wand.” Luckily, Futen had an ability to identify items.

	He held the wand up, “Futen if you would be so kind.”

	A white light flared from the center of the glowing remnant.

	You have found: Wand of Magic Illumination. Durability 30/30. Item class: Common. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.3 kg. Sends out a beam of blue light that illuminates the darkness. Magic seen in this light will glow white. Twelve hours of illumination per day.

	Well, that could be useful, Richter thought. He resolved to play with this latest toy as soon as possible.

	The second item he had retrieved from a thief. To be more specific, he had stolen it from a den of thieves right before burning their house down. Richter wasn’t one to dwell on details, though. He held the book out and Futen pulsed again. The light in the remnant built for several seconds before subsiding this time. That’s strange, Richter thought, it had never taken more than a split second for the remnant to identify an object before.

	“You have found an item of exceptional power, my Lord.”

	You have found: Tome of Soul’s Familiar. Durability 500/500. Item Class: Epic. Quality: Masterwork. Weight 0.5 kg. Let’s you cast: Summon Soul Familiar. Tome destroyed upon casting. Requirements: Master of a school of magic. Intelligence 20. Cost: 1200 mana. Do you wish to use the Tome? Yes or No?

	Twelve hundred mana?! That was more expensive than any other spell Richter had even seen! The most costly spell he had cast was Confusing Mist, and that was an enchantment that protected the entire village! It had only cost eight hundred! Why was this spell so expensive? Despite the prohibitive cost, that was probably the reason that he was holding the Tome at all, he realized. The thieves probably didn’t know what to do with it. Also8, Masters of magic didn’t exactly grow on trees. The book was almost priceless, so finding a buyer would have been difficult, but for the same reason they certainly couldn’t just give it away. So it had sat collecting dust until Richter had come along and ‘freed’ it. None of that mattered, though because Richter came to a profound realization. He wanted a familiar!

	In games and old stories, familiars always lent their masters awesome powers! He could get a mouse that gave a bonus to lock picking checks or a falcon that would let him see through its eyes. Maybe a cat that he could have pithy banter with. No matter what, it would be awesome. Most gamers would sell a kidney to get an item like what he had here!

	There were, he realized practical things to consider, though. The village generated a thousand mana per day. That clearly wasn’t enough.

	“Futen, can I combine my mana with the village mana to cast this spell?”

	“Yes, my Lord. At the time of casting, simply focus upon how you wish to allocate the mana expenditure. The spell will use it accordingly.”

	Okay, one problem solved. So if he combined the village and his personal capacity, it would give him the grand total of thirteen hundred to use. That didn’t take into account the mana upkeep for Confusing Mist, though. The spell required a hefty four hundred mana smackeroos each day or the mists would fade away.

	“Futen, what time is the upkeep for Confusing Mist paid?”

	“At midnight, my Lord.”

	“What happens if the village doesn’t have enough mana to pay the upkeep,” Richter asked.

	“The spell would dissipate at midnight, my Lord. It would have to be cast again at the full cost of 800 mana.”

	 Hmmm, Richter thought. He needed 1200 mana to cast the spell. The village reserves were full now so he had access to the 1000 maximum. If he used his personal mana and took the rest from reserves, it would leave 100. The village recharge rate was determined by the total mana the village could have divided by hours in the day. Put another way 1000/24 gave 41.67 mana regen per hour. So he just needed to know…

	“Futen, how many hours until the upkeep is due?”

	“Four hours and thirty-seven minutes, my Lord.”

	Richter stared at the remnant in surprise for a moment, not having expected such a specific answer. It was useful information, though. It meant that if he cast the spell now, the village would only regenerate 192 mana by the time the upkeep was due. It would leave him more than a hundred mana short of the upkeep!

	He stood in silence for a while. He understood the importance of the defenses around the village. The Confusing Mist enchantment was definitely important. On the other hand, the hunters had not seen anything dangerous coming too near the village. They also had the trench and the sprite warriors if something randomly made its way close. He did a few more quick calculations.

	The cost to recast the enchantment was 800 mana. His own mana would refill at about 12 points a minute so his 300 would be full well before the village’s had replenished. Counting his own 300, only 500 more mana would be needed. That would take… just 12 hours. He made his decision, the risk was negligible. It was time to get a familiar! He chose ‘Yes’ on the prompt hovering in his vision.

	Suddenly, there was a complete absence of sound. Richter blinked, then snapped his fingers, but still heard nothing. The Great Seal changed. The spiral of black became a hole devoid of all light. The edges of the hole distorted space, causing the floor to ripple and bend. The spiral of gold tile was replaced by an arched doorway standing ten feet tall. A gentle radiance spilled into the room and a shining gold tree could be seen through the portal, waving in an otherworldly wind. The blue spiral was replaced by a swirling pool of water. The spiral of Air became an actual ten foot tall swirling maelstrom, lightning crackling across it. Each transformation was independent and silent. In the center of it all stood Richter. He was amazed at the power around him. He could not have left the Great Seal if he wanted to. The boundary of each transformation touched the next, leaving free only the grey diamond in the center of Great Seal.

	The silence was sundered by a horrific tearing sound. A small black rent appeared in the space above Richter’s head. It started small, no larger than his forearm, but quickly widened to the height of a man. The sound intensified proportionally to the size of the tear. It kept growing until it reached all the way to the top of the vaulted chamber and stretched from one wall to the other, bisecting the room. On one side was Richter and the transformed Great Seal. On the other side was a white sky. Black clouds were lit with orange bolts of lightning. Beneath that alien sky, was canyon formed of midnight blue rock. The surface of the rocks was multifaceted like the inside of a geode, and each streak of lightning lit the canyon with reflection. At the end of the crevasse were massive trees festooned with thick vines. As Richter watched, a monstrous reptilian head poked through a break in the grove. It looked about with copper colored eyes, scanning for the source of the noise that had drawn its attention. Two large slits were at the end of the snout and as Richter watched, a forked tongue sampled the air.

	Instinct took over, and Richter froze in place hoping that the wormhole, or whatever he was standing in front of, acted like a one-way mirror. He did not want this THING to see him! That hoped faded as the bus-sized head oriented on him and the jaw dropped open. The monster stared at him with a sadistic leer. The steel colored fangs were each the size of short swords and it rolled its beet colored tongue around in its horrific mouth. With a graceful step that shouldn’t have been possible in such a monstrosity, it moved more of its large body into the rocky dell. A clawed hand attached to an arm the size of an ancient oak shook the ground with an impact tremor. It brought its other arm forward, and continued making its way towards him. The head moved closer and closer. Richter looked around, but there was no escape! The four Powers still hemmed him. He drew his high steel sword, but knew it would be like attacking a bull with a toothpick! Either way, he would go down fighting! He just REALLY did NOT want to be eaten again!

	The monster’s mouth was only a dozen yards away from the tear in space now. Richter could see rotting flesh in between its fangs, and the nauseating smell of decomposing flesh washed over him with its exhale. Richter held his sword up, preparing for his pointless last stand, but all of a sudden there was a resounding boom! The portal slammed shut, and a wave of force emanated from the rapidly closed rift. It blew Richter down off of his feet. He struck his head on the ground and was momentarily dazed. When he picked his head up a few moments later, the Great Seal had returned to its previous appearance. Silence once again reigned in the chamber, but it was a natural silence, filled with tiny, almost imperceptible sounds.

	Richter’s heart was pounding wildly in his chest. As the monster had approached the portal, he had been playing out various scenarios. In the rosiest one, the dragon thing had swallowed him whole and killed him in the process. The next scenario was decided less pleasant, and it taking a big enough bite that arms or legs were left behind. He would still be alive when he was eaten, but blood loss should make his death relatively quick. The worst case is he was swallowed whole and screamed all the way down the beasts gullet just before he was digested for one thousand years in the equivalent of the pit of Sarlaac… None of those options were very attractive, but the last would most definitely not be on fleep, or whatever that stupid phrase the kids were saying these days!

	His mood wasn’t great, to say the least. He had used a massive amount of mana and almost been eaten for his trouble. And there was still no familiar! His temper was not helped by the bachelor party sized headache that was triggered by the depletion of his mana. If he wasn’t already on the floor, he would have fallen. His head felt like it was full of cotton. This was probably a good thing since it also felt like someone was hammering on the outside of his skull!

	“Futen!”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	“What the hell?”

	“My Lord, are you all right,” a voice shouted. Randolphus was standing just inside of the doorway of the room he had been working in.

	“I’m fine Randy. The danger has passed. I’m sorry, I should have warned you I was going to cast a spell. Please go back to work.” The man stared at Richter for a few seconds before turning around. He was shaking his head as he walked back to his desk.

	Richter returned his attention to the source of his ire, “Well Futen? I’m waiting!”

	“I do not believe that was a lower plane of existence.”

	“What,” Richter asked exasperated and confused.

	“You asked what type of hell that was. It was not a hell. It was simply an alternate dimension.”

	Richter ground his teeth. The lack of idioms in this new world was going to kill him! This stupid conversation was not helping the headache that had barely started to subside. Through gritted teeth he said, “I wasn’t asking if that was a hell or an underworld. I was asking you why I was almost eaten by a dinosaur on steroids when I was trying to summon a familiar. Was that thing it?”

	“Ah, thank you for clarifying, my Lord. As you know, my memory is still fragmented, but I have no recollection of a familiar trying to eat its master. Except for perhaps a demon familiar. As we have already established, however, that portal did not go to a netherworld.”

	Futen’s inane babble was driving him crazy, “So what was that thing?!” Richter felt like he was shouting. Was he shouting? He couldn’t be sure. His ears were still ringing from clunking his noggin.

	“I believe that ‘thing’ was a monster intent on eating you, my Lord.”

	Richter just started his silent mantra, ‘Don’t kill him, Don’t shoot him, Don’t see if you can light him on fire. Don’t kill him, Don’t shoot him, Don’t see if you can light him on fire.” By his fifth iteration, he was calm again and opened his eyes. In a tranquil voice, he said, “Futen.”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	“Then where is my familiar.”

	“Behind you, my Lord.”

	“What,” Richter asked as he twisted in the sitting position he still occupied. He turned almost all the way around and locked eyes with the small creature on the ground behind him. His world changed forever.

	Know this! You have summoned your soul’s familiar. Every living being is born incomplete. Connecting with others is the only way to move beyond this limitation. You have cast the spell: Summon Soul Familiar. The spell has reached across all timelines, dimensions, realities and fractal causalities to find another piece of your fragmented soul. You and your familiar are bound until this Universe ends and all souls are once again returned to the True Essence.

	Know this! Unlike the paltry connection of most mages and familiars, the Soul Bond between you and your soul familiar has unlimited benefits. You will have to discover these over time, but the first is perhaps the most powerful. Abilities are bound to the soul. As such you will have access to some of your familiar’s abilities. Increasing your familiar’s strength and level will unlock further abilities for you to access.

	Congratulations! You have been granted the Ability: Psi Bond. Thoughts can be shared with another being that has the ability Psi Bond. A connection can only be completed by both parties being willing to participate.

	Congratulations! You have bonded your soul familiar. You’re familiar is a Psi Dragonling.

	Know this! You have summoned your soul familiar at the center of your Place of Power. As you level your Place of Power, your familiar will evolve. As Master of a Place of Power, your familiar has the ability to cast spells in any Power you unlock, and the associated resistances. You’re familiar has access to: Air magic.

	The psi dragonling was about a foot and a half long. Its tail was another foot long and was a deep black. The body was long and sleek. The diamond-shaped scales on its appendages and back were slate grey, like the color of a storm in late afternoon. No light reflected off of its hide. The lack of shine didn’t make it look boring or dingy, however. It looked beautiful. Two wings were folded against its sides. They were the same color as the body. It sat up with its two back haunches folded and its two front legs extended. The dragonling stared up into Richter’s eyes. He didn’t know what to do with this new creature which was bound to him, for eternity it sounded like. He was about to reach out to touch it when he heard a small voice.

	*Hungry!*

	Richter was confused for a moment. The voice was different than anything it had ever heard. It was slightly high pitched and definitely insistent. It didn’t seem to come from any direction, however. Had the familiar spoken?

	“Say that again,” he said.

	*Meat!*

	Richter pulled his head back slightly. He narrowed his eyes and shook his head lightly. He focused on the small dragon and thought at it, *Did you just say you were hungry?*

	*MEAT!*

	The dragonling blew a small but strong burst of air into Richter’s face. It felt like being whacked in the forehead with a chicken leg. His head jolted back slightly, and he looked at his new life long companion with an amused grin. Well, Richter thought, I guess I don’t like stupid questions either.

	“Come on little guy. Let’s get some food.”

	Another gust of air struck Richter in the eye.

	“Gah! What was that for?”

	The dragonling just stared at him and extended its neck to full extension, head cocked slightly to the side.

	“Girl,” Richter asked with a questioning note in his voice. The dragonling relaxed and purred slightly. “Okay girl, let’s go get some food.”

	He stood up and then turned to face his familiar. He was about to reach down and pick her up when dragonling hunched her body and with a powerful jump, launched into the air. One flap of her wings allowed her to gain altitude. Soon the familiar was gliding lazily above Richter’s head. Fair enough, Richter thought.

	He started walking to the exit. Before he got to the tunnel, a slight weight settled onto him. The dragonling had landed on his shoulders, draped across him like a mink stole. She wrapped her tail around his arm to secure her position. Her weight was in no way troublesome. He had expected a reptile to be cool or slimy, but she radiated a gentle heat. Shaking his head in disbelief of how his life had changed in the last few minutes, he continued into the tunnel.

	Soooo, my soul familiar is a demanding female who rejects offered affection but later clings to me in a way that everyone can see… There is probably a lesson in all of this…, Richter thought. Then Alma jumped off of him and dug her claws into one of the wall draperies, and all he said, “Oh shit, my rug!”





CHAPTER 5




	Richter walked outside and looked out over his village. His people moved about with purpose and with smiles on their faces. He was witnessing the beginning of something special, he realized. Building this village was a cause worth devoting his new life to.

	Apparently none of the events in the chamber of the Great Seal had registered on the people outside. He looked farther out over the surrounding land to see the translucent mists. When they disappeared later, it might cause a bit of an uproar. He decided to make an announcement before people panicked. Cupping his hands to his mouth, he shouted.

	“Everyone! Everyone! Please give me your attention.” His familiar shuffled a bit on his shoulders at his shout.

	A few people heard him, who then nudged others to give their attention. After a minute, everyone within sight had stopped what they were doing and were looking up at him. “Again, I am so happy to see all of you again! We are already transforming this place. It is no longer the blank slate that we saw when we got off the ships! It has become fields for food, hearths for warmth, and roofs for shelter. It is becoming a home!” There were cheers from all around.

	“I want to spend more time with each and every one of you, but first I wanted to tell you a few things. One, the mists ringing the town will dissipate through the night. They will be back tomorrow morning, but for now, no one should go out past the moat ringing the town. For that reason, we will be withdrawing the logs that serve as our bridge across the moat. We will also be shutting the gate until the protective enchantment is back in place.”

	Richter made eye contact with one of the men who was serving as a guard in the village, “Gather all of the other guards, and make sure no one is beyond the walls. I see that everyone working the fields looks to have come back in for the night, but I want to know without a doubt. Please do that now. I want the gates closed in twenty minutes.” The man gave a salute and ran off.

	Turning his head to address the crowd again Richter said, “The next announcement concerns what many of you seem to be pointing at. This is my new familiar. She is a psi dragonling. She won’t hurt anyone, but you will be seeing her around so please don’t be alarmed.”

	He thought at her quickly, *You won’t hurt anyone, right?* She just gave an uninterested sniff. Taking that as affirmation, Richter continued.

	“Lastly, I’m sure you have all seen our friends the Wood Sprites throughout the village. Some of you may have been here earlier, but I’ll repeat for those of you who were not. Tonight we will be planting a Seed Core. It will grow a magical tree that will greatly benefit us. The Hearth Mother has done us the great favor of placing a blessing upon the Seed that will let it grow much quicker than otherwise possible. We are truly lucky to have such good friends!” Richter looked up at the darkening sky. The color was not just due to the setting sun, but also because it was heavy with storm clouds. Richter gave a laugh, “All are welcome to attend the ceremony if you’re willing to brave a little rain.”

	The people laughed good-naturedly along with him. A sympathy laugh, Richter thought, but I’ll take it. Richter raised his hand to signal that he was done speaking. The people dispersed and he walked down the slope that led from the tunnel to the village below. One of the sprites met him at the bottom. The green clad warrior stared at Richter’s familiar before speaking.

	“The Hearth Mother is at the lake in the hills north of the village. She asks that you join her. She says that there is no rush, but to please come before sunset.”

	“Please tell her I’ll be there soon.” He would have gone straight there, but a stream of air into his ear reminded him of his responsibilities.

	He turned his head to look at the dragonling, “Don’t go getting fresh.” His familiar didn’t deign to reply. A quick question to a passing villager pointed him in the direction of the makeshift store houses for their food. He walked up to the small series of sheds. He was about to open the first door when his familiar jumped off his shoulders with a shriek. She glided through the air and landed on a deer that a hunter was dressing with a broad-bladed knife. The man stumbled back with a startled cry and raised his dagger. The dragonling hissed at the man, then turned back to the deer. She stuck her face into the bloody haunch, and then began tearing off bloody chunks and swallowing them whole.

	Richter took in the scene and recognized it for what it truly was, a calamity in the making. There would be no bloodshed right now because he was here to intervene. In the future, however, that was not necessarily a sure thing. He needed to deal with this now. Better to establish boundaries early. He walked up to the dragonling, and said, “Stop.”

	His familiar ignored him. He repeated himself only louder but had the same result. Having had enough, he reached out and yanked the deer to the ground. *STOP!*

	The dragonling grabbed hold of the wooden frame that the deer had been hanging from. She twisted her sinuous neck to stare at Richter. She let loose a harsh hiss and bared her fangs at him.

	Richter didn’t move. He just looked into his familiar’s eyes and waited for whatever would happen. He knew two things. One, in every pack there was an alpha. Two, that alpha was him. They stared at each other for long minutes, the dragonling’s back arched as she hissed at him intermittently. After a time, she stopped baring her teeth, though her wings remained flared.

	*Mine,* she thought at him defiantly projecting an image of the deer carcass

	He had a feeling that a well-reasoned argument would not convince his familiar. Instead, he thought of the image of her sitting on his shoulders, and communicated the thought, *Family*. Then he thought of looking at all of the people who had listened to his announcement. He projected *family* again, but with less intensity. Then he thought of the hunter and repeated *family* at the same level. Finally, he projected the image of the deer carcass back to her, *Ours.*

	The dragonling kept her eyes lidded, but relaxed her stance and loosened her neck from full extension. She turned to look at the hunter who was still standing nearby, looking confused at Richer and the psi dragonling. Not surprising seeing as how the man could not hear the silent communication between the two of them. She looked back at Richter and thought, *Hungry!* The thought had much less animosity in it, though.

	Richter relaxed his stare as well and put a smile onto his face. He extended his arm and projected, *Trust me.* She gathered herself and gave a small jump. She left the wooden post and clambered up onto his shoulders. He addressed the hunter.

	“I’m sorry about that. I know it must have been startling to have her jump out at you like that. She is going to live here, though. Apparently she prefers fresh meat, a fact I learned at exactly the same time as you. I have told her it was wrong that she almost attacked you.”

	“You told her, my Lord?” The hunter still hadn’t completely calmed his stance, not that Richter could blame him.

	“Yes,” Richter said. “We are able to communicate without words. Mind to mind. The point is, she is my familiar, and she is here to stay. I doubt this is the last time that she will greet you or the other hunters looking for a morsel. If she comes around, I would appreciate it if you would cut off a large piece meat and set it aside for her.”

	The man looked at the other hunters who indicated with small gestures and head shakes that they would not be the ones to fee Richter’s vicious little friend. After a long sigh, the man walked forward towards the deer, but his gaze never left the dragonling. Even when he started cutting the meat, he kept looking back and forth. This was why he almost cut one of his fingers off. He was able to avoid disaster though, and he quickly removed a two-pound piece of meat. That was as far as he was willing to go. It was clear to Richter that he had no intention of getting any closer.

	“Place it on the rock please,” Richter said, indicating a low to the ground piece of stone. The man complied and then walked several yards away. Richter turned his head to look at the dragonling. He sent several more thoughts. One was of his mother feeding him, *Family*. Then a second of Richter and the dragonling in the Great Seal chamber, *Family*. Last, an image of what was happening right now, Richter, the hunters and her, *family*. After that he said, “Go eat love.”

	She flew from his shoulders and settled onto the meat. In no time at all, she was attacking it again and eating with abandon. Richter looked at the hunters. “I have to go. I have no idea how much she will need to eat. It would probably be a good idea, that if it looks like she is still hungry, just to give her more meat.” The hunters nodded vigorously. Richter didn’t really want to leave her so early, but he needed to go see Hisako. Despite the small battle of wills he had just won, he realized she was a wild creature. He couldn’t watch over her all of the time hoping she didn’t fly away. He decided to put faith in their soul bond.

	*Come find me when you are done.* She didn’t give an indication that she had heard. He decided not to push the issue. He realized that he was lucky to have survived even one instance of getting between a hungry woman and her meal. He wasn’t stupid enough to try it a second time.

	He started walking toward the lake in the hills above the village. The sun had just fallen behind the trees. No rain had fallen yet, but the first peals of thunder could be heard in the distance. Walking through the village, he couldn’t help but feel pleased at the gentle industry taking place around him. All of these people, human and nonhuman, were working together to create a meaningful home. He felt lucky to be a part of it.

	It didn’t take long to reach the foot of hill. The hilltop was several dozen yards in elevation above the village. It was an easy climb if approached by the slope that was about ten yards across, the base of the slope being within the walls of the village. There was no other way to easily ascend. To the left of the slope was a steep escarpment that quickly became a sheer cliff. The lake above drained down the cliff forming a small waterfall. The waterfall in turn made a small river that joined another minor river that came from the base of the cliff. The resulting larger river flowed west into the forest.

	Hisako, Yoshi, and the other sprites were waiting at the top of the hill, speaking softly. Mostly talking softly, Richter corrected himself. It brought a faint smile to his face to see Sion’s beleaguered expression as Daniella continued to express her latest opinion of his Companion’s faults. Richter looked past the sprites out over the meadow he now stood in. It was the first time he had ever come up here, he realized. It was a beautiful sight.

	The grassy field was more than a mile long, probably closer to between two or three. The southern boundary of the meadow curved outward slightly, the edge defined by the sharp drop off of the cliff. Along the edge, several rows of tall trees grew. They acted like a screen, blocking visualization of much of what was past the drop off. The northern and eastern borders were sharp cliffs of white stone. Grey lines traced through the rock and it sparkled slightly. Randolphus had told him the stone was called marbled quartz. It was the same stone that the Mist Workers had been collecting from the nearby quarry. It was apparently extremely strong. That coupled with its attractive appearance, made the quartz a highly sought after building material, at least according to his new chamberlain. The western edge of the meadow was a stand of tall trees that perched above another drop-off. The only easy entrance was the slope Richter had just walked up.

	The western end of the hilltop was dominated by a lake. It was easily a quarter of a mile across. A waterfall came from the northern cliff face falling into the lake. A phosphorescent green algae hugged the lake bed, making it glow slightly in the fading light. The undulation of the glowing plants gave the appearance of slow movement beneath the surface of the water. The southern edge of the lake drained down the escarpment creating the second waterfall that fell to the level of the village. The entire rest of the meadow was a riot of color. Countless flowers and vibrant plants dotted the grassy surface, and even in the fading light it was beautiful.

	“Thank you for coming, Richter,” Hisako said. “This is an amazing the place. Some of the herbs and plants that are numerous in this meadow are actually quite rare.”

	“Sion had mentioned that,” Richter replied.

	“I asked you up here because this is the perfect spot for planting the Seed Core. The land is obviously fertile, and the tree would be protected by the landscape. We will do the ceremony in the northeast corner if you have no objections.”

	“I don’t, and thank you again Hisako. This means a great deal to me. When should we start?”

	“The storm is almost here and night has almost fallen. In a few hours the conditions should be perfect.”

	“Which is just enough time of us to get some training in,” Yoshi said with a sly grin. He held up a length of wood and waggled it slightly.

	Richter’s face did not have a grin on it.





CHAPTER 6




	Richter went through his forms for the next two hours. At some point, the rain broke, but that did not slow Yoshi down. He kept drilling with Richter, correcting each improper stance with a whack of his stick. The villagers came up to watch the show. They began to shout out, “Keep your head up!”, “Don’t let your sword drop!”, “Oooh, that one look like it hurt!”

	Richter didn’t mind the good natured ribbing. These people had been working hard, and it wasn’t the worst thing in the world for them to see him sweating and enduring hardship as well. During the training, Yoshi introduced a third form, Dancing Fireflies, and a fourth, Rain on Hot Stone. He was starting on a fifth, when Hisako called a stop.

	“People of the Mist Village! Please douse your torches. The ceremony will proceed best in darkness. Follow me.” She started walking toward the northeast corner of the meadow. The Seed Core was held high above her head. The tracings of green veins cast a small but distinctive light, so following her was easy despite the rain and darkness. They walked until they were only a few hundred yards from the northern cliff face. She turned and faced Richter and the other villagers. The only light was from the green glow of the Seed Core, the soft white light from Futen and the phosphorescent lake in the distance.

	“Richter please come stand beside me.” He moved to comply, and she handed him the Seed Core. He looked at her questioningly. He had assumed Hisako would do the actual planting. She just shook her head with that gentle smile she always had. “It needs to be you,” she said quietly. “Simply focus on the Seed Core, and you will know what to do.”

	Richter turned his gaze from the Hearth Mother to the object in his hands. Being so close to the Seed Core brought its wondrous scent to his nose. This time, the smell was of pine, clean wood burning, and food baking in the oven. He was overtaken by a memory. He had been playing football in the front yard with his older brother. His brother had teased him about a bad throw, but did it with love and warmth in his voice, so it was alright. They had been out front for about an hour. Initially, they had been sent to the yard to rake the leaves up. Football had been a master plan to stay out of the way of their mother, and thereby avoid being assigned any other chores.

	That morning, his brother showed him again and again how to throw a perfect spiral. Unfortunately, it was also something he failed at again and again. But then, he finally got it right! When they finally were called inside by their father, cheeks tingling with the cold, James was still riding a wave of elation. The warmth from inside the house competed with the wonderful smells coming from the kitchen to capture his attention. It had been a perfect day.

	Richter came back to himself. Other nearby villagers seemed to have been caught in their own remembrances, and all had smiles on their faces. Not wasting any more time, Richter raised the Seed Core above his head with both hands. The rain fell down on him, and he had to blink the water clear. “Thank you all for coming up here and braving this weather. Those of you near me caught a taste of this object’s power. You have felt its goodness. It is not just an object of power, but also a symbol of what we are trying to create here. We will care for this tree, and it will care for us. That is how we will live.” The next words that he said seemed to come from somewhere else. It was if something was speaking through him.

	“Through service, ascendance. Through dedication, transcendance!”

	You have created the motto of your village! These words and the ideals they embody will find seed within the heart of all who embrace the Mist Village as their true home. Loyalty of all villagers increased by +100.

	DING!

	The Loyalty of your village has increased from Neutral to Dependable. You have shown yourself to be a capable leader and exemplify ideals they believe in. Your people are not just a collection of individuals anymore, they have a common goal. +25% to Productivity.

	Richter read the prompt twice. There was still so much he didn’t know about this new world. Looking out over the sea of faces in front of him, he saw only joy and encouragement. The people stood a bit taller and waited for him patiently. He focused on the Seed Core.

	Do you wish to plant the Seed Core at this location? Yes or No?

	He was about to finish the quest, and then he realized he was missing an opportunity. He quickly withdrew a Potion of Clarity from his Bag, and drank it. Choosing ‘Yes’, he stood, arms above his head with rain pouring down over him. Then the Core began to vibrate. The vibrations grew, and the Seed began turning in his hands. The rotation was slow at first. As it picked up speed, the green veins on the outside glowed brighter and brighter. The Core was moving so fast that the friction burned Richter’s hands and he dropped it. The Seed didn’t fall, though. It continued spinning in midair. The green light was now bright enough to clearly see everyone in the Meadow. All of a sudden, the Core fell to the ground. Plummeted would have been a better description. It shot down, but was spinning so fast that only the barest ripple was felt in the feet of those standing around the impact site. A clean hole could be seen in the ground with the green light shining straight up onto the clouds like a spotlight.

	Richter, Hisako, Yoshi and Sion stood directly at the impact site. Hisako thrust her hand into the light. Richter started to reach out to stop her, but she stood there calmly with no ill effects so he stopped himself. The beam of light lasted for about thirty seconds, and then vanished, leaving a column-shaped afterimage in everyone’s vision. All was quiet and then a white light could be seen from the depths of the hole. That was when the rumbling began. It built in volume and was soon accompanied by vibrations in the earth. Richter felt like he was standing on the back of some huge awakening beast. It occurred to him that standing right next to this particular hole might no longer be the best idea. He picked his head up to share his sentiments with the others, but couldn’t. Of course the only reason that he couldn’t, was because everyone else had already backing away. He quickly followed their example.

	Before he had moved twenty yards away, a silver tendril shot up from the hole. That metallic fiber was only the tip of the spear. The growth continued moving upwards and was joined by others. They all ascended until they were each one hundred feet in the air. Then they began to interweave into a complex braid. When each tendril finished weaving, only half the length of each had been used. The remaining segments arched upward and then bent outward. More branches sprouted from the original eight columns. Each branch gave birth to another smaller generation. Dozens at first, then hundreds, then even more. In the rain and darkness of night, the amount grew into an uncountable lattice of silver branches, weakly reflecting Futen’s light and the occasional flash of lightning.

	It occurred to Richter that standing in the middle of a lightning storm by a tree that very well could be composed of metal could perhaps be a bad idea. It also occurred to him that he couldn’t be seen as the only person running away from what was basically a miracle. He’d look like a punk!

	Apparently oblivious to the potential danger, Hisako cast a quick spell that sent a golden ball of light into the air above their heads. The shine was strong enough to illuminate the entire glade like the sun. As soon as the light fell upon the tree, she gasped in shock, “A Quickening!”

	You have completed the Quest: Tree of Power I. The Seed Core has been planted within the boundaries of your domain.

	Reward: 25,000 (base 20,000) experience points.

	Congratulations! You have advanced to level 6 in Herb Lore. Herbs are 3% more effective. Increased chance of finding higher level herbs.

	Congratulations! You have advanced to level 7 in Herb Lore. Herbs are 3% more effective. Increased chance of finding higher level herbs.

	Congratulations! You have advanced to level 8 in Herb Lore. Herbs are 3% more effective. Increased chance of finding higher level herbs.

	…

	Congratulations! You have advanced to level 38 in Herb Lore. Herbs are 3% more effective. Increased chance of finding higher level herbs.

	You have received 2,500 (base 2,000) bonus experience for reaching level 10 in the skill: Herb Lore.

	You have received 5,000 (base 4,000) bonus experience for reaching level 20 in the skill: Herb Lore.

	You have received 7,500 (base 6,000) bonus experience for reaching level 30 in the skill: Herb Lore.

	 Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Herb Lore. You can detect two effects from picked herbs. Can negate one negative effect from ingested herbs.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Initiate to Apprentice in: Herb Lore. You can detect three effects from picked herbs. Can negate two negative effect from ingested herbs.

	Bonus Reward: 20,000 experience points for all of your Companions.

	Bonus Reward: 5,000 experience points for all members of your village.

	Reward: A Quickening.

	Know This! You have successfully grown a Quickening. This is a celestial tree normally seen only in higher planes of existence. Many scholars attribute the overall greater powers and health of higher planes denizens to this tree. It bears fruit that, when eaten, helps to unlock the hidden potential of the imbiber. Your people will surpass their previous potential! Affinities for all skills increased by consumption of fruit of the Quickening.

	Know This! Your Quickening has been built on a Place of Power. Consequently, it is infused with the Dark, Life, Water and Air magic. Consuming the fruit of the Quickening now has a specifically increased chance of increasing affinity for learning these branches of magic in addition to increasing affinities as a whole.

	Know This! All present at the sprouting of a Quickening will have an increase in random affinities.

	Congratulations! Your Quickening has reached level 1!

	Congratulations! Your Quickening has reached level 2!

	Know This! The Blessing of Growth cast by the Hearth Mother of the Wood Sprites has combined with the Life magic of your Place of Power! The strength of the Blessing has been magnified. Your Quickening has advanced to Level 2!

	Know This! It is well known that the fruit of the Quickening can unlock the potential of individuals. The tree can do much more, however. At level 2, it will awaken the potential of your lands. All resources in surrounding area improved in yield by 25%. 25% greater chance to find rare resources!

	TRING!

	You have reached level 11! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed, you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	TRING!

	You have reached level 12! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed, you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	TRING!

	You have reached level 13! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed, you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	You have either characteristic points or skill percentage points to allocate from the previous level. Now that you have progressed again, you must allocate your points within the next week or they will randomly be assigned for you.

	You have unlocked the Quest: Tree of Power II. The emergence of a celestial tree on this plane will not have gone unnoticed! The tree requires care to cultivate it and strength to protect it! Will you protect it and assign caretakers to your Quickening? Yes or No?

	These prompts crowded his vision one after another. He was barely able to glance at each before the next came. He quickly read through each… WHAATTTT?!? He had no idea that you got experience from progressing in your skills! He made a mental note to ask Randy exactly how that worked later. He kept going through his prompts and accepted the quest. When he cleared his vision, he looked at all of his villagers. He hadn’t expected them to receive experience from his quest, but he was sure glad of it!

	From the expressions on their faces, they were stunned too. Some of them were only level one or two. Most people did not advance farther since the two main ways of receiving experience were battle, quests and apparently skill leveling. The last depended heavily on your inherent ability for a skill and how much time you could invest into practicing it. Richter took his fast leveling for granted, but he had the boon of his Fast Learner ability. He had primarily been in combat for most of his time in The Land, and as such his magic and combat skills had leveled quickly. Not too many bakers were fighting, and not too many glass blowers were pursuing large quests. There were always small quests associated here and there Richter had been told, but apparently the experience earned was modest. As such, most nonfighters did not advance their level past two or three.

	The point was, the 5,000 experience points would bump his lower level villagers up one or two levels all at once. Richter just hoped the parents would guide their children to wise point allocation. He didn’t need a bunch of super strong toddlers knocking down walls!

	Randolphus was at the front of the crowd. He looked at Richter with an unreadable expression. Wiping rain off of his face he asked, “Is this experience because of you, my Lord?”

	“Yes,” Richter replied. “It is a bonus reward for planting the Seed Core.”

	A chorus of ‘Thank you’ and ‘Hooray for Lord Richter’ issued from the crowd.

	Your efforts have aided the development of your people! Morale increased +300. Loyalty increased by +150.

	DING!

	The Morale of your village has increased from Neutral to Happy. Your guidance has made the general mood of your village increase! +10% to Population Growth. +10% to Productivity. +10% to Fighting Spirit.

	“Thank you, my Lord,” Randolphus said with his head bowed. Richter just smiled at him and nodded his head. He turned back and took in the sight of the Quickening illuminated by Hisako’s golden light.

	The tree truly did belong in heaven, Richter thought. The base was about fifty feet across, each of the eight tendrils about five feet in diameter. Gaps could be seen in the trunk, the tendrils forming an octuple helix. It wasn’t the width of the trunk that was remarkable, however. The tree had the shine of polished silver. Every surface was smooth without the ridges that were normally seen in bark. Instead, intricate tracings ran across the trunk in smooth whirls. The branches exhibited the graceful bowing limbs of a willow tree, and the tips were only five feet above the ground.

	It was the forming leaves that made the tree truly breathtaking. Each was about the size of Richter’s hand and were a soft white in color. The leaves’ thick velvet appearance made them appear heavy, but they easily shifted in the wind, showing their silver underbellies for just a moment before again presenting the creamy white smoothness of their tops. The effect was mesmerizing. Hisako was walking under the boughs of the tree with her hands cupped to her chest. Just before passing under the canopy she looked back, and then motioned with her head for him to follow.

	Richter and the rest of the villagers walked forward to shelter under the tree. The broad leaves formed a thick canopy which effectively kept all rain off of them. Hisako cast another globe of light that made a cheery atmosphere under the protection of the trees limbs. As Richter joined her, she gave him a brilliant smile with tears flowing freely down here face. Her words were so soft they seemed like an exhale, “We did it.”

	She had been holding her cupped hands to her chest. She slowly and carefully lowered them to show all what she had been holding. An opalescent orb was resting in her hands. As he watched it grew more and more clear until it was gone all together. In its place was a small figure curled up in the fetal position. The creature was wrapped in clear wings that had an iridescent shine. They unfurled and the diminutive person stood, using Hisako’s hands as a platform.

	She, because despite being only six inches tall there was no doubt as to her femininity, was clad in white cloth that looked like a woman’s slip. Her skin was a pale blue that contrasted with the jet black hair. Her eyes were still closed when she tilted her head back, opened her mouth and began to sing.

	There were no words. There didn’t need to be. Images came clear to the minds of all present, produced from the pure light of her voice. She sang of love and family. Of a people dedicated to life and the cultivation of forests. Then the song became melancholy, and imparted a story of death and loss. The melody spoke of an entire people dying out. The music pulled sorrow out of Richter’s soul and he wept.

	The tone became frantic as the survivors struggled to stay ahead of the plague that had savaged her people. The complexity of the song had decreased as the pixie sang, and all present realized that the loss of each tone it represented the loss of a life. Suddenly there were only two tones left from the entire tapestry of beauty they had initially heard. The incalculable loss tore at the hearts of everyone present. It was enough to bring Richter to his knees.

	Out of despair, though, came one note of hope. A hope for a people to one day be reborn. The light and younger tone… a daughter, was overjoyed by the news. The queen mother sang once again of love, and then then sacrifice. A life consumed by a spell to halt time. The two tones became one, and the remaining tone was once again overcome with sorrow and grief. And the then the song ended, not tapering away, but abruptly shut off, as if the remaining life was walled away from the world.

	Richter continued to weep on his knees, but with the ending of the song was able to collect himself once again. He looked around and saw everyone present was weeping freely, many laying down, completely overcome. A warmth wrapped around his shoulders, his familiar drawn to comfort him in his sorrow. Even Yoshi’s gruff exterior was overcome, and tears trailed down his cheeks. Richter’s eyes ached from expressed sorrow, but he could see the prompt clearly.

	HARK AND REJOICE! The pixie that emerged from the Royal Pixie Chrysalis was none other than a queen! Her mother sacrificed her life to keep her daughter in stasis until the plague had died out. The pixie race can be reborn!

	Congratulations! You have won +3,000 fame points! You have brought back the lost race of Royal Pixies!

	CHIME!

	Congratulations! You have advanced to Reputation Level 3! “You seem like someone I should listen to” New quests and opportunities will become available to you!

	You have completed the Quest: Resurgence of Light I. Reward: 6,250 (base 5,000) experience

	You have unlocked the Quest: Resurgence of Light II. Witness the following interaction between Hisako and the pixie queen to learn more.

	Hisako was the only one in the glade that had stayed on her feet. She looked at the small pixie in her hands and said, “Your mother’s sacrifice was not in vain. Hope still exists while you are here. Sprites still exist in many places in The Land, and we will all fight and die for you. You are home my queen!”

	The pixie opened her eyes and looked at Hisako. Each sclera was cornflower blue, but her irises were an intense violent, that glowed in the night. With a flap of her wings she flew up and hovered in front of the Hearth Mother’s face. Her voice was the piping notes of a piccolo, “But I am all alone! I have no one!” The sorrow in those two short sentences was heart wrenching.

	“You are not alone, little one,” Hisako said. Her voice was full with sympathy and comfort. “Though you and your people have been absent from the land for long centuries, you have not been forgotten. We have kept your memory alive through the old stories. Every sprite living has grown hearing the stories of your people’s beauty and goodness. The deeds of great pixies live on in our stories. We well remember the valor of Petanu, the pixie general who held back the gremlin army. We laughed at the stories Eniola, the pixie trickster. And we will remember your mother, little one, if you would only tell us her name.”

	The pixie hovered in the air looking at Hisako. When she spoke, she did so softly, “Her name was Alexandrella.”

	“Ahhh,” Hisako said, “and so we shall remember Queen Alexandrella the Loving. We will revere her for eternity, and share the story of how her sacrifice brought light back into the world. The only question now little one, is will you honor her sacrifice? Will you bring the beauty and wonder of the pixie race back into The Land?”

	Again, the pixie hovered silently before replying. After a few moments, though, her slouched posture straightened. When she spoke, the self-pity was gone from her voice. Though her voice still quavered with sadness, it also had the practiced tones of royalty, “I will. I give thanks to the Wood Sprites for their faith and love through the long years.” She then turned to Richter, “I also give thanks to you. I feel in my heart that you played a large part in releasing me from my chrysalis.”

	Your relationship with Royal Pixie Queen has improved from neutral to friendly.

	“I will happily do my duty and honor my queen’s sacrifice,” she continued. “Will you help me, Hearth Mother? I need protection and a suitable tree to foster my children. It will be several months before my first children are born. Is there a Steelborn Oak or a Silver Elm that you know of?”

	Hisako simply looked at Richter.

	Know this! The life cycle of pixies is intrinsically tied to nature. Male and female pixies exist, but that is not how they reproduce. Male pixie are larger and stronger than their female counterparts, but are sterile. Any female pixie can create more pixies, by binding their spirit to a tree. A cocoon is created that adheres to the tree and after a time, two pixies are born of this union. The offspring have unique attributes that are determined by the type of tree they are born from. Pixie females can only bind their spirit to a tree once per year. A queen pixie is special in that she can generate a great deal more mana, and so each binding will create one hundred pixies. She can also bind her spirit to a tree twice per year. Be aware, the binding between pixie and tree is unto death. Both benefit from the binding, but if one dies the other may as well.

	Update on Quest: Resurgence of Light II. The Royal Pixie queen needs a tree to “foster” her progeny. Will you accept responsibility for this task? Reward: Increased regard of Royal Pixie queen. Yes or no?

	Richter had to read the first prompt three times to make sure he understood. When he dismissed it and minimized the second, he looked back at Hisako. The pixie queen was still hovering in the same place. He thought he understood what the Hearth Mother was trying to silently communicate. Would he allow the pixie to bind to his new celestial tree? On the one hand, if the pixies would truly gain properties of the tree they bound to, it would mean a great boon for the queen. Her progeny might be powerful, and therefore better able to protect themselves. It could also mean another ally for his village. Pixies could even be considered caretakers, couldn’t they?

	The other argument, though, was that if the queen died, the Quickening could be destroyed with her. He hadn’t known what tree would grow out of the Seed Core, but now that he did, could he risk it? The Quickening would make his people, and the very land his village was built on more powerful! Was it right to risk the future of his people on a very small new life, basically alone in this large and dangerous world?

	More thoughts for and against went through Richter’s mind quick as lightning. He felt like he was drowning in calculations and moral obligations, both to his people and his conscience. Ultimately, he based this decision on a decision he had made early in his life. Many years ago he had decided that when all things were equal, he would act on what he hoped to be true, rather than on what he feared to be true. His hope was that his village would grow to be a force of positive change in The Land. Bringing a peaceful species back from the brink of extinction… well that was exactly the type of change he imagined.

	“What is your name, my queen,” Richter asked.

	“I am Elora, my Lord,” she said with a bow of her tiny head and a midair curtsy.

	Richter consciously accessed his Gift of Tongues ability, rather than passively let it translate for him. In the pixie language, Elora meant ‘hope.’ Well if ever there was a sign you’d made the right choice, he thought. He pulled up his minimized prompt and selected ‘Yes.’

	“Elora, I would like to make a deal with you. I will protect you and help you in whatever way I can to further the rebirth of your race, and in return…”

	“Yes,” she asked in her small voice.

	“You have to call me Richer,” he said with a small smirk.

	She flew from her position near Hisako to hover before his face. He was able to make out the small details of her tiny expressions. She ranged from confusion to curiosity as she searched his face, then she gave a small smile and said, “I accept your terms.” She held out her small hand to shake.

	Richter gave a laugh that was echoed by everyone present. Elora was speaking in the pixie tongue, so his people most likely had no idea what she was saying. The sight of a tiny flying woman shaking hands with the Master of their village was amusing all by itself, though. He raised his hand and extended his pinky to touch her hand. He bent his finger once slightly up and down, and everyone cheered.

	“Thank you, Richter! Oh, thank you! What tree do you have for me? I promise that I will make it grow tall and strong.”

	“I believe you, Elora. And to answer your question, look up.”

	A confused expression on her face, the pixie looked up as requested. She looked around for a second, searching. Then she faced him, her eyes round and wide with comprehension. “But I can’t, my Lord! This is a celestial tree! I could not be so bold as to bind myself to such a wonderful and vast spirit! I am not worthy of this!”

	Richter held up a finger, “Now we just shook on the agreement, so I don’t want to hear ‘my Lord’ coming from you again!” Elora’s distress was so cute he was struggling not to laugh. “Now more importantly, you are unique in The Land, just the way this tree is. If even half of what I hear from the wood sprites is true, your return is a great boon to all of us. Not only are you worthy, but I believe this tree has grown for the purpose of being your home.”

	Hisako had walked closer while he was talking. “Elora, I understand your hesitance. I am in awe of seeing a Quickening in The Land as well, but it is not our place to question the will of the forest. You belong here. Will you stay?”

	The pixie looked back and forth between the two Masters. She settled on Richter, “Are you sure?” He could see the excitement on her face.

	“Of course,” he said. “Welcome home.”

	“Thank youuu!” Elora leaned in and placed a kiss on his nose, and then disappeared.

	You have gifted with Kiss of the Royal Pixie Queen. +3 Charisma.

	You have completed the Quest: Resurgence of Light II. Binding to a celestial tree will accelerate the pixie life cycle. Because of the choice of tree, you have gone far beyond the requirements of the quest. You will be rewarded proportionally. Reward: Elora has increased regard for you. Bonus Reward: A new Companion. Reward: 1,250 (base 1,000) experience. Bonus Reward: 5,250 (base 4,000) experience.

	Your relationship with Elora, the Royal Pixie Queen, has improved from friendly to loyal.

	Elora, the Royal Pixie, has become you Companion. Companions will stay with you only as long your goals align.

	You have completed the Quest: Tree of Power II. You have found the perfect caretakers of your Quickening. Pixies are the bound to the fabric of The Land. All trees thrive under a pixie’s care. Reward: 5,250 (base 4,000) experience.

	TRING!

	You have reached level 14! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed, you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	You have either characteristic points or skill percentage points to allocate from the previous level. Now that you have progressed again, you must allocate your points within the next week or they will randomly be assigned for you.

	You have unlocked the Quest: Resurgence of Light III. It will take one month for her first children to be born. Will you protect the Royal Pixie Queen until new pixies are brought into the world? Reward: Unknown. Yes or No?

	You have unlocked the Quest: Tree of Power III. Grow the Quickening to Level 3. The Quickening is a force of good in this world. Help it to thrive and protect it as it grows. Reward: Unknown. Yes or No?

	Accepting both quests, Richter smiled broadly. He almost broke his arm patting himself on the back. His thoughts ran something like, ‘I love it when a plans come together! Now where’s my cigar! I’m the man! I piss excellence BEFORE I wake up!’

	Narcissism aside, he now saw exactly why Potions of Clarity were so prized. If you could coincide it with a boss fight or quest completion, you could shave years off of the time it would take to level.

	After he finished stroking his ego, he tried to figure out where his newest Companion had gotten off to. Richter looked at Hisako, “She can turn invisible?”

	The Hearth Mother just laughed, “Not that I know of, but there is one common theme to all of the stories about pixies. They are FAST!” Then she did something unexpected. She embraced him. “Thank you for this. You found the evil weapon that imprisoned the chrysalis. You provided the magic to finally release her. Now you have given her a home, and risked the most powerful object in your realm to do it.”

	Richter tensed, feeling a bit of shame that she had deduced his thought process and hesitance to allow the pixie to bind to the Quickening. She released him from the hug, but didn’t fully let go, keeping her hands on his forearms and holding him at arm’s length.

	“Do not feel shame,” she said. “You are a Master of a Place of Power, and the Lord of a village. Your decisions carry great weight, and deserve to be considered from all angles. I might like an innocent saint, but I would not trust him with the wellbeing of the only pixie in existence. A man who has the ability to think selfish thoughts, however, but then chooses a finer path... That is a man who I would fight side by side with. That is a man I would trust.

	Your relationship with Hisako has improved to Ally.

	The relationship of the Wood Sprites of Nadria to the Mist Village has improved to Ally.

	Richter looked at her with surprise. She simply nodded and said, “May our two peoples rise together, and if necessary, fall together.” Richter had no words and so simply embraced her again.

	When they broke apart, Richter saw all of the villagers and the sprites staring at the two of them. Raising his voice, he said, “The people of the Mist Village and the wood sprites of the Forest of Nadria are allies! May we rise together!”

	First one person took up the shout, then another, then everyone present was repeating the same phrase with passion.

	Under the canopy of a heavenly tree, in the wake of the rebirth of an ancient race, two groups celebrated their friendship and hope for the future, “May we rise together! May we rise together!”





CHAPTER 7




	The good times kept rolling. Even Yoshi loosened up. Some of the dwarves brought a cask of ale up from the village stores, and they all enjoyed each other’s company for hours. The rain eased at about midnight, and people meandered down to the longhouse as they got tired. Many decided to just rest under the limbs of the Quickening, however. Shiovana had cast a spell to drive the water in the ground away from the surface, leaving a perfect campground.

	It was a wonderful chance for the sprites and the villagers to mix. Even Richter’s familiar also got in on the fun. She swooped around blowing gusts of air into people’s hair. There was also a spirited game of “catch the dragonling,” played by all of the village children. Their shrieks of delight allayed the parent’s fears, and soon the dragonling was apparently accepted by everyone present. After hours of play, all of the children were put to bed, and Richter and his familiar sat against the base of the tree. Some people still laughed and sang, but most had settled down to rest. Sion sat next to him.

	“You have made a wonderful home here,” Sion said, still laughing over some of the antics he had seen through the night.

	“Yes,” Richter said, smiling back.

	“You know you’ve said almost nothing about your old home. Do you have family or friends that you miss?”

	“Yes,” Richter said, a bit of the joy fading from his face. “I do.”

	“Then why don’t you ever talk about them,” Sion asked.

	“I was raised to focus on what’s in front of me, and to accept the reality of a situation. The reality is that I’m in The Land now, and I probably will be forever. Thinking of the people I left behind doesn’t help, so it doesn’t matter. I choose to focus my energy on what does matter,” Richter said, still looking at the die-hard partiers, who were drinking and sharing stories.

	“Come on,” Sion wheedled, “just tell me something.”

	“I don’t really want to talk about it! It doesn’t matter who I was! All that matters is that I’m Richter!” He was shouting at the end. He didn’t look at Sion. He just kept gazing at his people.

	Sion looked at him with a shocked face. Anger also made its way across the sprite’s features briefly, but it fled when he realized his questions much have scratched at a buried hurt. So he just sat back against the trunk of the Quickening, and shared his troubled friend’s company in silence.

	They both watched the laughing villagers. Richter let his anger extinguish in the soothing tones of his people’s joy. Then he started talking softly. “My mother is a strong woman. My father is kind. My brother has the biggest heart of anyone I know. My sisters devote themselves to helping those in need. I have nieces and nephews, who are the most brilliant and beautiful creatures in any world. I was training as a healer. What my people called a doctor.” He stopped talking. They sat in silence again.

	“How can you be okay leaving all of that behind,” Sion asked when Richter didn’t start talking again.

	 “I would have them here with me if I could,” Richter said, “but they would all encourage me to listen to my heart. And as much as I loved looking up at a Georgia sky, I have always wanted an existence of magic and wonder. I had an amazing life there, and yes, there are people I left behind that I miss dearly. The Land is my home now, though,” he said firmly. “My mother always said, ‘Indecision causes confusion, confusion causes accidents, and accidents cause death.’ I won’t be indecisive.”

	Sion nodded in appreciation. He too had a strong mother who was had both wisdom and an inability to not share it.

	“Of course,” Richter continued, “she also said that every time I masturbated, god killed a kitten… So her advice was all over the map.” Richter’s voice lowered conspiratorially, “Just so you know, that was the day I started actively making a world without cats.” Sion chuckled and Richter smiled. “Like you said, I am making something wonderful here. I feel truly blessed to have you as a part of it, my friend.”

	The sprite looked at him, and they shared a quiet moment of friendship. That was short-lived, however. It ended when Daniella shouted, “Sion. Quit loafing around and come over here!”

	Seeing the sprite wince, Richter chuckled, “You better get over there before her voice hits a higher octave.”

	 He waved his friend away, and then looked at the psi dragonling that was lying across his lap. Richter was convinced she just viewed him as a walking pillow. His hand rested on her warms scales, slowly stroking her. She purred at the attention. “What do I call you,” he said. She gave no response except to continue enjoying the attention. He had learned that if he stopped stroking her, he would earn a hiss in response.

	“Well if you don’t care, then I will name you myself.” He ran through dozens of names until one found a special resonance. “Alma. What do you think of that?” She raised her head, and then sniffed before settling back down. He chuckled, “I’ll take that as agreement.”

	Richter spent more time just looking out over his people and the sprites. This was a perfect moment. He was smiling as he drifted off to sleep.

	*Danger!*

	*Wake!*

	*DANGER!*

	That was the first thing he heard even though it was only in his own mind. The next thing he heard were distant screams.

	When he opened his eyes, the only light was a faint radiance from the silver trunk of the Quickening. Not enough to make out details when he was facing away, but it gave him an orientation. He ran away from the trunk. The shouts and bellows getting louder as he sprinted toward the edge of the meadow. When he was able to see over the escarpment, his heart sank. The longhouse was on fire! He cast Night Vision on himself. What had been a black canvas with one spot of light was now a world of green and black. He almost wished he couldn’t see it.

	His village was being attacked! Large humanoids had made their way across the trench. He couldn’t tell what they were, but he could tell they were big! There were bodies on the ground! The invaders seemed to be trying to break into the longhouse. What had happened to the guards? He could see that there were dozens inside the village, but Richter could see an even larger second wave of attackers approaching! How had they gotten in? One attacker was hanging by the gate… Yes, there! The bastards had made a crude bridge with several trees lashed together. An advance team must have hacked down the gate. The rest were going to get in!

	Hisako and the other sprites came close. The villagers that had passed the night under the Quickening were right behind them. Cries of panic arose from the group. He felt the panic himself. They were being attacked! He froze in disbelief at what was happening. Then he heard Sion.

	“Richter, look at me.” He turned his head to look at his Companion. The sprite just said, “We’re here with you. We will save them.”

	The solidity of his friend broke him out of his immobility. “Right! You, you, you and you,” he said pointing at four sprites. “Hold this line. You are to protect the children and nonfighters. Don’t let anyone past you!”

	“Yoshi!” Richter cast Night Vision on the sword adept. “Can you see the second wave of attackers? We can’t let them get into the village. Go to the bridge that they made. I need you and the other sprites to destroy it!” He nodded once and then started giving orders to the sprite warriors.

	Richter looked out at the villagers, “We are being attacked. Those of you who do not know how to fight need to stay here. But anyone that can wield a sword or swing an axe, I need you to come with me. I need you to do it now! Our people have barricaded themselves in the long house, but these attackers have set it on fire. They don’t have long until they will be forced to open the doors. We need to kill whoever this is before that happens! Now who will fight?!”

	He had been afraid that his speech would not rouse anyone, but he was wrong. Thirty men and woman stepped forward. One dwarf woman held onto her man begging him not to go, but he gently disengaged and stepped forward. Richter was ashamed that he didn’t remember his name. “We are with you, my Lord. But we have no weapons. What can we do?”

	Hisako stepped forward with a fierce expression on her face, “We take them from their dead hands! You four, guard this hill, like Lord Richter ordered.” She pointed at Daniella and Sion, “You two come with me. The rest go with Yoshi and hold the line of the village to make sure no more get in. Mages, you have one minute to cast whatever buffs you can. It’s time for battle!”

	“I have some extra weapons,” Richter said handing out the short sword and two daggers he had in his inventory. Then Richter gave a bloodthirsty grin, “These stupid bastards have made the mistake of invading our home! They will NOT live to regret it! We are life takers and heart breakers! Let’s go!”

	You have made a Call to Action: Kill the majority of your attackers to be awarded the skill: War Leader. Failure to so give you the trait, Fool in War: -50 Fighting Spirit to those near you.

	Richter just nodded to himself. It’s not like failure was an option anyway. It did remind him about the boost in Morale providing a boost in Fighting Spirit as well. He quickly checked his village status page, and saw that the entire village should get a 10% increase to their ability to deal damage. He prayed it would be enough.

	He cast Barkskin on himself, unfortunately, the range was only ‘self’ so he couldn’t buff anyone else. He then cast Haste on himself and the sprites that would be in his group. The spell was prohibitively expensive at twenty-five mana per cast. Each cast only affected one target, so he could not extend the buff to all of the villagers and sprites. Sion cast Haste on Yoshi and several of the other sprites.

	As they had been preparing, Alma had been circling above them.

	*Fight,* she thought to him.

	*Stay here,* he thought back. He didn’t not want his little familiar to be harmed. He had no idea if she could be reborn like he could.

	*Fight,* she thought again with determination. Then he felt something surprising. Alma cast Haste. The dragonling zipped through the air. She was so fast that he couldn’t follow her grey body in against the night sky despite having cast Night Vision.

	The last thing Richter did was to hand out Potions of Clarity from his Bag of Holding. Those attackers were going to die tonight. There was no point in wasting the experience. He himself drank two precious mana potions from his limited stores. If his village survived this fight, potion making needed to be a priority!

	They all streamed down the hill, with the armed fighters in front. At the bottom, Yoshi’s group broke off and move quickly toward the bridge. Richter, Hisako, Sion and Daniella ran towards the long house. It wasn’t long before they could see enemies in front of them. Just before they were upon them, Hisako warned them to look away, then gave a shout and thrust her hand up. A ball of golden light ten times as large as what she summoned earlier that night flew from her hand, and up into the sky. Even though he was looking in another direction it seemed like he was staring into the sun! He quickly dismissed Night Vision and opened his eyes, everything was bleached white, and he noticed a blinking icon of an eye that was clouded over. A number beside it counted down from three, and when it reached zero the icon disappeared and his vision was again normal. He was immediately thankful for Hisako’s warning. With his increased light perception, he might have been blinded for the whole fight!

	Luckily, his momentary disorientation hadn’t cost him. The light caught the attackers, on the other hand, completely by surprise. They cried out in pain, vainly trying to cover their eyes. The ball of golden light didn’t just make it easier to see, it also immediately made Richter feel stronger!

	You are in the aura of Blessed Light. All creatures of neutral or positive alignment gain +10% to physical attack and defense. All creatures of negative alignment suffer -10% to physical attack and defense.

	Hisako followed her first spell with another shouted incantation. One of her hands contorted through a series of gestures in quick succession, while words in a tongue that not even Richter could decipher poured from her lips. She formed her other hand into a claw with her palm face up, and swiftly lifted it. Five different rock spikes, each six inches wide, shot up from the earth and impaled one of the attackers! Two spikes pierced one arm and one leg. The other three spikes tore through the invader’s torso, and left the dead body suspended in the air. That opening salvo brought the attention of three nearby enemy fighters. Richter was given his first up-close look at the creatures that had ruined the peace of his home. He used Analyze.

	Name: Krin’ak. Bugbear Level 8. Health 220. Mana 100. Stamina 190. Disposition: Enmity. Bugbears are the result of sorcerous experimentation blending cave bears with goblins. The race is naturally strong and hardy. They are adept at hiding. Warlike to a fault, it takes a strong leader to control them. Well known to incorporate other races in their war parties. Bugbears get one point to distribute per level, and each level gives +1 to strength, +1 to Constitution, +1 to Dexterity, +1 to Endurance.

	The bugbears! They had found the village! But how, the mist was only down for… the Quickening! The beam of light that had shot into the sky would have acted like a beacon! Then once the defenses had fallen, it had led the bugbears straight to them. Then it would have been a simple matter of making a bridge to cross the trench. This was his fault!

	The time for recriminations was not now, though. That point was made clear when the bugbears roared, and then rushed forward to attack. The first ran forward to attack the Hearth Mother. At six feet tall, the burly goblinoid must have thought that Hisako’s diminutive four feet would make her easy prey. He was wrong.

	Without breaking her stride, she threw her hands out to the side, more magical words pouring from her throat. Two vertical panels of gold light appeared. Each was 5x10 feet, and hung a few feet off of the ground. The shields separated the three attackers in front of them, creating a hallway that flared out towards Hisako. It both left her only one enemy to directly confront, while simultaneously impeding the forward progress of the others. The bugbears on either side of the shields struck with axe and mace, but their strikes couldn’t penetrate the shield.

	The middle attacker moved forward undaunted with a buckler raised and his sword poised to stab. Before he could make his lunge, though, she shouted and slapped both wrists together, fingers outstretched and separate. A bar of white light shot from between her fingers and struck the buckler. In an instant, the beam was gone, and only the afterimage of the light remained in Richter’s vision. Looking at the bugbear, though, Richter realized that a square hole six inches in diameter was missing from the buckler… and from the chest of the bugbear that had been holding it. It dropped to the ground in a clatter of armor. Holy shit! Was that a Kamehameha?!?

	The other two struck the gold panels again, and a web of cracks appeared on the left panel. The two sprites ducked low and each shot an imbued arrow into one of the bugbears’ legs. Neither were wearing medium or heavy armor over their legs, and the strikes savaged their limbs. Both fell face first into the gold panels screaming, their furred hands scrabbling for purchase. You wouldn’t have expected such high-pitched noises from such big guys, Richter thought. Hisako swept her right arm down quickly, and both shields vanished. The bugbears collapsed to the ground. Before they could even try to roll over, a pair of swords stabbed into each neck and they lay still. Hisako and the sprites had killed four attackers in the space of ten seconds! He was glad they were allies!

	The villagers behind him were in shock as well! Most were simple craftsmen or workers. Even the casters probably hadn’t been in combat before. The wood sprites, however, fought constantly to protect the forest from invaders and monsters. When faced with the fighting prowess of the sprites, the villagers were dumfounded. A feeling Richter could well understand. Despite having fought beside Sion, he had never seen the sprites working as a group before. His village had a long way to go if this was an indication of the level of battle that they would need to operate at.

	He clapped his hands to break his people out of their reverie. If enemies hadn’t heard the short, but fierce battle then his clap wouldn’t alert them. And if they had heard the fight, then the element of surprise was gone anyway. “Grab their weapons!” He pointed to one of the villagers that he remembered was an Air caster. “Take the shield. Support our fighters! Those of you without weapons yet, stay in the center of the group!”

	The better armed group continued to move toward the burning longhouse. The screams were getting louder and smoke was thick in the air. More than half of the roof was covered in flames. The goal of Richter’s group was to get to the doors of the longhouse. Ten bugbears were still hammering at the doors. If his people were going to survive, they would have to be dealt with.

	A series of loud booms came from far ahead of them, heralding Yoshi’s arrival at the bridge. A fold in the land coupled with the distance and darkness kept Richter from seeing exactly what was happening, but the night was lit with blue flares of color. They provided brief moments of illumination, like a storm on the horizon. No time at all passed between the sprite’s initial attack and the responding roars of defiance from the bugbears. In the resulting clash, at least one scream ripped itself from a sprite throat.

	Hisako looked at him upon hearing the pain of her people. Richter thought she would immediately run to their aid, but the only expression on her face was one of steely resolve. “We will finish our task and save your people. My warriors will last until we can join them.”

	Richter just nodded back, “Onward!”

	They hadn’t made it another one hundred yards when the next attack came. The bugbears had indeed heard their attack on their comrades, and they had prepared. The group of defenders was making their way to the longhouse when Richter heard Alma’s voice in his head, *Danger!*

	Suddenly the air in front of them… rippled. There was shriek of pain, and whereas before there had been nothing but open space in front of them, they could now see bugbears arranged in broad horseshoe pattern no more than ten yards ahead. Directly in front of Richter’s group, at the tip of the arch formation, was a tall figure wearing black robes. The hood was thrown back showing a mostly bald head with a top knot tied in a bun on top. The face was green and the lower jaw protruded, two large fangs extended upward in place of incisors. At that moment, the robed figure’s face was screwed up into a rictus of pain, and both hands were slapped to the sides of his head. The wail of pain was tearing itself from his throat.

	Richter looked in shock at the force arrayed against them. The bugbears had gotten so close! If the defenders had walked forward for only a few more seconds, they would have been hemmed in on three sides, and most likely slaughtered to the last man! Suddenly, he knew had happened. At least he knew part of it.

	Alma had been flying above Richter and the others. Then she had felt the thought patterns of the hostile group in front of them. She could not read thoughts, but she had been unable to miss the clustered minds in front of Richter and his group. She had flown ahead, and as soon as she passed the veil of Dark magic, she saw the ambushers. She then dove and used a psi blast to distract the caster. The attack made him loose concentration and the ongoing enchantment was interrupted. The spell backlash coupled with the psi attack, had caused the shriek of pain that alerted them!

	Richter had no time to wonder about how he instantly had this information. The dark veil had apparently protected the bugbears from the effects of Hisako’s spell. The removal of the concealment spell, however, made them shy from the light the same as the first three. That was probably the only reason that Richter’s group had not been immediately overwhelmed once the caster was distracted. Despite not being in the perfect position for them to spring their ambush, the fifteen or so skirmishers in front of them were still more than enough to cause serious damage.

	“Shoot,” Richter shouted! His own target was the caster in front of him. The mage was the first enemy magic user Richter had seen so far, and he well knew that this battle could hinge on removing the caster from play. He imbued his arrow and shot, not taking much time to channel his mana. The pure gold aura around arrow made an after image in his sight as it sped towards the helpless mage. At the last moment, though, a large bugbear with a kite shield jumped in the path of arrow. The projectile struck the shield with a loud bang! The contact did knock the off balance bugbear backwards, but the mage was spared.

	At the same time that Richter shot, Sion and Daniella both unloaded arrows into the closest bugbears. Both were critical hits, one to the face and another to the knee, shearing off the lower part of the creature’s leg. Even if they weren’t immediate kill shots, the attackers wouldn’t be back in the fight anytime soon.

	Hisako looked around at the enemies arrayed against them, and then fell to one knee. Both of her hands reached out at shoulder height, and then circled opposite each other until they were vertically in line with her sternum. Her finger tips touched in three complex hand configurations. Then her hands shot back out to shoulder height a second time, and she once again started circling them back. She looked off in the distance, completely focused on her casting, her lips forming words in an unbroken chant. Richter had no idea what spell she was casting, but it clearly that required more than a one second casting time. It was also clear that she was vulnerable while she cast it. She had to be protected. He turned to the villagers with weapons, “Protect her at all costs! Whoever is unarmed, stay back!”

	The other bugbears had started moving forward. The sprites’ fiendishly high Dexterity let them loose one more imbued arrow each, but only Daniella’s shot knocked an enemy down. Sion’s shot was blocked by a hasty side swipe of his target’s buckler. The arrow skewed past and detonated harmlessly on the ground twenty yards away. Richter knew that if the attackers made it to them, they would be torn apart. He did the first thing he could think of. He cast Grease.

	The spell summoned a slippery substance coating the ground in a 10x10 area. The two enemies in front of him fell. Unfortunately, his aim was off, and he was inside of AoE (area of effect) as well. He fell as the two attackers continued to slide towards him. One had fallen forward and she raised her half- moon axe to chop down into Richter as soon as she got close.

	Two of the villagers stood with Sion, fighting hand to hand against the goblinoids. Daniella had backed up several feet and continued to fire arrows past the defenders into the mass of enemies. In such close quarters however, imbuing her arrows would harm both friend and foe, so she relied on skill alone to make her kills. The remaining armed villagers and the Air mage holding the shield stood in front of Hisako who was still chanting her spell. The rest of the villagers remained in the background, throwing small rocks they found on the ground. It served as little more than a nuisance, however. The battle was joined!

	The bugbear’s slide in the grease had ended only a few feet from Richter’s prone body. If she had slid the entire way, then he was sure that her axe would either be either battering at his armor or buried in his body. Even so, she was up on both legs and one arm. The other arm still held her axe aloft and was about to slam it down onto him. Praying that the spell was strong enough, he cast Charm.

	The axe had already descending towards him when he finished the one-second cast. They made eye contact as the blade passed the halfway point. A brutal smile broke out over her face, and then she twisted her body like a corkscrew. She rolled over completely, and struck the bugbear to her right in the shoulder. The blade bit, but the thick leather armor her former comrade was wearing stopped any serious damage. He snarled and grappled with his traitorous ally. Though wounded, he was putting up a large fight, and her axe was useless in such close quarters. Richter rolled out of the AoE of his Grease spell. Carefully standing on his feet, he didn’t see how he could help his charmed fighter without risking damage to her as well. They were rolling around too fast for him to risk an arrow. He turned his attention to the rest of the fight.

	Sion, Daniella and two armed villagers were facing off against five bugbears. Sion was holding his own, but the villagers were hard pressed. If it wasn’t for Daniella taking shots of opportunity the two would be dead already. The large bugbears were not appreciably slowed, however. Their leather armor was tough and hard to penetrate. Even the arrows that did strike flesh hit nothing critical. None of them could sink too deeply through the natural armor of their hide. The stalemate didn’t last long, however. With a terrified scream that became a wet burble, one of the villagers fell!

	The bugbear that killed him had brought its warhammer down in a mighty overhand swing. The poor fool tried to parry with his sword. The blade was just swept down by the hammer and cut into the villager’s own flesh. It wouldn’t have made a difference if the sword were involved or not, once the hammer fell into the man’s chest. All that was left was a ruined bloody mess. The attacker pulled his weapon out with a horrible sucking sound.

	Richter bellowed in outrage. These people were under his protection! He activated Double Shot. Two arrows flew from his bow in the space of a second. The only flaw to using this subskill of Archery was that both arrows had a greatly decreased accuracy than normal. The second arrow suffered twice as much penalty as the first. True to form, Richter’s first shot struck true, hitting the bugbear in the abdomen, but the second went wide. That didn’t matter though, because he immediately used Drill Shot. Aiming for the impact of site of the first arrow, he concentrated for a moment and then released. The arrow spun in the air true to its name and hit a bare centimeter to the side of the first strike. The already weakened armor gave way, and the arrow imbedded several inches into the bugbear’s stomach, continuing to spin. The invader gave a small groan and collapsed onto the wet ground. The attacker wasn’t dead, but at least Sion’s group won a few seconds of respite.

	One look at the fallen villager made it clear that he would never be getting up again. His friend didn’t seem to know that though, and fought furiously to drive the attackers back. It was clear he had no trained skill with a blade, but he made two of the invaders fall back a step. It was the opening Daniella had been waiting for. She shot an Imbued arrow into the face of the bugbear on the left, and he collapsed. Richter fired an imbued arrow at the other but missed. A grunt drew his attention to the right. The brawl between Richter’s charmed bugbear and the one she had been fighting ended with her dagger sticking from the center of his chest. She stood tall, one ear having been torn off. She grinned with blood on her sharp teeth.

	The group of villagers protecting Hisako were challenged by several bugbears. The awkward swings of the men and women were only completely ineffectual. The only thing they did accomplish was to make the bugbears they were fighting cautious. It was only their stronger numbers that made this particular part of the fight a stalemate.

	Hoping that the villagers would remain safe, Richter began to take aim on the fallen mage again, but then he heard a scream. He looked around and saw that four of the ambush group had circled wide around the sprites who were fighting their fellows, and were now running with weapons raised towards the unarmed villagers. He pointed quickly and shouted, “Attack!” His charmed enemy began running towards them, but it was clear they would reach the villagers first. He drew and took aim, knowing full well that he would not be able to stop them all before they started laying to waste to his people.

	A screech rent the air and a dark shape buzzed by the bugbears heads, too fast for them to react. Suddenly they stopped their run and began holding the sides of their head. Their weapons fell to the ground forgotten. In the heat of the battle, Richter had forgotten about Alma! Her psychic attack had dazed them all. He released his well-imbued arrow and shot one in the groin. Only a mist of blood and a ruin of flesh was left of the bugbear’s former pride and joy. A howl of despair and injustice filled the battle site.

	Richter pointed at the bugbears and addressed the unarmed villagers, “Attack while they are vulnerable!” The mass of villagers fell on the bugbears who were already shaking off the psychic attack. Though they were no longer stunned, the attackers had lost all momentum and soon fell to the combined counterattack of the twenty plus villagers. A furious and bloody scuffle broke out, which left seven villagers injured, but all of the bugbears dead. Now six more villagers were armed and rushed forward to help.

	A shout drew his attention back to Sion and the invaders he had been fighting. The other villager was still on his feet, though one arm hung limp and bloody. Next to him was the dwarf that had chosen to fight against the wishes of his woman. He had initially been guarding the Hearth Mother, but must have stepped forward when the other villager died. The dwarf was now trading blows with an attacker.

	The shout had come when Sion had driven his needle-like sword into the knee of another bugbear. A vicious swipe of a studded mace made him let go of the handle as he rolled out of the way. He unshouldered his bow, but before he could nock an arrow, the mace wielder was on him again. It was all the sprite could do to keep out of the way of the swings.

	Richter was knocking an arrow to help his Companion when his body was locked into immobility. Everything he could see had developed a purple tint, giving the world a surreal look. Just as importantly though, his health started falling at five points per second! From his vantage, he could see the air caster and one of the villagers guarding Hisako were also surrounded by an aura. Since everything was purple to him he couldn’t be sure theirs were as well, but it was a safe bet. That damn mage must have recovered from the spell backlash! At this rate he would be dead in less than two minutes. The villagers in even less time. Richter really hoped that they had invested the points from their leveling into Constitution. Without investing the points, they could be dead in twenty seconds!

	Richter tried and strained, but he couldn’t break free. What was the duration on this damn spell? Twenty, forty, eighty health gone! And the pain! It felt like his muscles were being torn apart from the inside! He would scream if only he could. Worst of all though, was that he could see his people in the same spell. They couldn’t last much longer! And then, something amazing happened. Hisako finished casting her spell.

	He had been wondering what spell would take such a long cast time. Richter wasn’t disappointed. Above her head a ribbon of gold light appeared stretching ten feet vertically into the air. It rotated clockwise began to form a window into a day lit realm. The area around the portal grew perceptibly warmer. It continued to spin until it was a perfect circle, the entire process taking no more than a few seconds. Through the hole in the air, Richter could glimpse endless fields of gold grass. They looked like the grasses surrounding the Hearth Tree, but whereas that was a small circular patch this was a plain that extended on into the distance. A figure emerged from the portal. Seven feet tall, the creature’s physique was astounding. Sculpted muscles were highlighted by tattoos that covered every area of exposed flesh. He was wearing a white sleeveless vest with a hood that was drawn up, hiding his face from view. Pants of the same color extended down to his ankles, and his feet were bare. On his back were two white wings that slowly flapped. They were longer than the man was tall when extended. In his hand, was a crystal sword that created rainbows when it refracted the light of the portal. Once he was out the summoning portal, he landed in front of the Hearth Mother. The light from the portal filled Richter with a sense of wellbeing.

	You have been exposed to the light from the Plains of Sana. All healing spells 100% more effective for positive alignment and neutral creatures while the portal remains open.

	Unable to help himself, Richter cast analyzed the angel.

	Name: Zacharia. Cherubiae. Level ???. Health ???. Mana ???. Stamina ???. Disposition: Neutral. Among the lowest levels of the celestial army, cherubiae are often used as scouts and messengers. Cherubiae gain seven points to distribute per level, and have 1.3x modifier to all stats from their base value. Denizens of the Plains of Sana are well versed in healing and have some regenerative properties.

	The angel spoke, his voice a rich tenor, “Hark, Daughter of Light, you have my service until the portal fades. How may I serve?”

	Hisako was clearly drained from such a powerful summoning, “Break the spell that binds these three. Kill the mage, and then all other bugbears and orcs that you can reach!”

	“As you wish, Daughter.” The angel simply raised a hand and three gold beams shot out to Richter and the two villagers. He collapsed to the ground, almost in ecstasy at the lack of pain. He looked up a moment later to check on the two villagers that had been caught in the spell. Neither were moving. “Nooo,” he croaked. He cast Slow Heal on the Air mage, but no glow surrounded the man. It was too late. He couldn’t cast it again on the other man because of the one-minute cool down for the spell, but he knew in his heart that it wouldn’t have mattered anyway. Two more of his villagers were dead.

	By the time he had recovered from the pain and failed to heal the villager, the angel had reached the remaining bugbears. Four warriors had been left to oppose the seraphim, all standing in front of the mage. It didn’t matter. The crystal sword struck down at one. It raised a shield to block. The sword cut straight through the buckler however, a single blow overcoming the shield’s durability. The blade continued forward and bisected the body at angle. Before either half had fallen, the angel spun and thrust his sword through the throat of another, and yanked to the side. The head was left attached by only a few tendons. The spin had presented the wings to the two other bugbears. With a forceful extension, each wing connected with a fighter knocking them off their feet. With no other impediments, the angel turned to the Dark mage.

	The mage was no fool however, and had started casting as soon as the angel moved in his direction. A pool of darkness welled up and surrounded the man like a cocoon. When the crystal sword flashed into it, the pillar of black dispersed like wisps of cloth on the wind. The angel finished the two bugbears it had struck prone, and then flew back to Hisako.

	Sion and Daniella had managed to kill their opponents now that they weren’t facing so many. The angel alighted in front of Hisako, as the villagers came up behind Richter. It was only then that he remembered his charmed bugbear. Apparently it had come to stand with him after the villagers had killed the four bugbears Alma had stunned. It had also been caught in the Dark mage’s spell and had succumbed to the life drain.

	“The mage fled, Daughter,” the angel said in its strong sure voice. “Would you have me pursue? The teleport he used is only short range.”

	“No,” she said. “Please heal all of us, and then go help my people who are still fighting.” Blue flashes could still be seen to the south.

	“As you wish.” The hooded head bent, and he puts his hands together with the sword held pointing up. A gold light began in his hands and then infused into the sword bathing a forty-foot area in light. Richter immediately felt his pain diminish and he saw his health bar improving. He recovered all of his lost health in only three seconds. He absolutely had to get a healing spell like that! A quick look around showed all of the injured villagers had been healed as well. The dead, sadly, remained down.

	“I go now Daughter, but advise you to join the fight. My time here grows short.” He gestured to the gold portal which had lost half of its bright intensity. The angel then jumped into the air, and with a flap of his powerful wings, flew towards the fighting at incredible speed.

	The villagers looked around in shock at the dead bodies of their friends and loved ones. Richter raised his voice, “We will mourn soon, but right now we must finish this fight. Our people are still in the longhouse and are running out of time. Our brave allies are fighting for us right now to keep still more of the invaders from getting to your families! Anyone that can fight now is the time!”

	With that short speech, Richter started running towards the burning building. Hisako and the sprites were right beside him, and he could hear the villagers close behind. Running up one final rise in the land, the longhouse came into view. The entire roof was ablaze and smoke came out of the high air vents cut into the walls. The invaders were no longer trying to break in, but instead simply waited several yards back from the barred doors. They knew the fire would succeed where they had failed, and that soon the villagers inside would soon come running out. At least ten were standing in front of the building.

	Seeing them waiting to slaughter his people, Richter flew into a rage.

	*Alma!*

	*Attack?*

	*No,* he thought. *Kill!*

	*Yesss!* came her happy and brutal reply.

	When they were only a seven yards away, the bugbears finally caught sight of them. They noticed too late because Richter was able to get close enough to cast Grease again. He caught more than half in the AoE. As they turned to meet the attack, they fell prone. He had targeted his spell to the center of the attackers and so only one still stood standing on the left and two on the right. Alma dove from the left and targeted her psi attack at the one still upright. Rather than continue her dive past, though, she latched onto the bugbear’s head with four legs. Clinging like a tick, her tail wrapped around her prey’s neck securing her hold. The skirmisher reached up to pluck her off, but Sion shot him with an imbued arrow. The damage from the attack, coupled with whatever Alma was doing, was apparently enough to overwhelm the bugbear’s psychic defenses. The last sight Richter caught of the invader’s face was of the eyes widened in absolute terror, as blood ran freely out of his nose.

	Sion and Daniella began targeting the fallen warriors with imbued shots. Three were dead before they regained their feet. Not to be outdone, Hisako fired off beams of light at two bugbears once again leaving cauterized holes in the bodies. They were dead before they struck the ground. The villagers fell upon the remaining two standing bugbears and literally tore them into pieces. The panic in his people knew no bounds. They all feared their loved ones might be dead in the building before them, and would let nothing stand in the way of opening that door. Several of his people were so blinded by rage that they had rushed forward and were caught in the Grease spell as well. Rushing forward, it was almost impossible to see the slightly darkened surface that warned of the spell.

	Once all of the attackers were dead. Richter ran up to the door and shouted, “It’s Lord Richter. Come out! We have killed the attackers!”

	There was no response at first, but then there was a scrabbling at the door. Richter heard a scrape, followed by a loud thump, as something heavy hit the ground. Richter pulled on one door while a dwarf villager pulled on another. The heavy wood moved easily when confronted with his strength. A cloud of black smoke came out blinding them all momentarily.

	Richter was hit by a weak tackle. He was ready to attack when he heard, “Thank you, my Lord! We would all have died in a few more minutes!”

	Richter blinked his eyes clear and saw he was holding a high elf woman. She looked up with bloodshot eyes set in a soot-stained face. She began to sob, clinging to him like he was the last light in a suddenly dark world. He held her awkwardly for a few seconds until another villager led her away to make room for more people escaping the still-burning building.

	Someone shouted, “There are still some inside! They were too weak to move! Help them!”

	Richter ran inside hacking against the smoke. He couldn’t see anything, but then Hisako cast a spell that shot a dozen shining globes into the rafters of the longhouse. Five bodies were on the ground. Richter ran to the closest. He didn’t waste any time checking for life, but just picked him up in a fireman’s carry and ran out of the door. He kept running until he was ten yards away, and then put the body down. He was going to go back, but he saw others had taken the other bodies out. Besides as he watched, a portion of the roof collapsed with a crackle. The structure of the building had finally succumbed to the flames.

	He looked back to the body he had drug out of the flames. The smooth face of a young dwarf male looked back at him. The eyes were half open and stared sightlessly up. The dwarf hadn’t even been old enough to even start growing a beard yet. Guilt and anger surged up from deep within Richter. “Noooo!”

	He cast Slow Heal, but again the spell couldn’t find purchase on the body. Richter wasn’t done though. He slammed a fist into the dwarf’s chest. He then started compressing the dwarf’s chest. “One, two, three, four,” he said under his breath in time with his exertions. After a count of thirty, he moved to breathe into the dwarf’s mouth. After tilting the dwarf’s head back, he placed his lips on the young dwarf’s and blew forcefully into his mouth. Richter blew a second breath into his lungs before he began to compress the chest again.

	A small hand touched his shoulder. “He is gone Richter,” Hisako said.

	He ignored her. There was a lot he couldn’t control. There were mistakes that he would make. Hell, this whole attack was his fault! He would have to live with the consequences of this night for the rest of his life. The needless deaths of his people occurred because of his carelessness, and he couldn’t change that. He would not let THIS life go, though. One, two, three, four, … He breathed into the dwarf’s mouth again.

	He was starting his third round of compressions when Hisako touched him again, “We need to keep fighting. Yoshi needs out help! I am sorry for your loss, but…” Her words trailed off.

	The dwarf youth coughed. Richter couldn’t believe it! It was the most beautiful sound he had ever heard! Placing a hand to the dwarf’s neck, Richter could feel a faint pulse! It was weak and thread, but it was there. As he was checking it faltered. It might go out at any moment.

	“Hisako! Please heal him.”

	She was staring at the dwarf in shock, “But how… this is impossible…”

	“Hisako! Please,” Richter pleaded. She shook her head to clear it and extended one hand. A golden glow surrounded her hand and extended to the body of the dwarf. The pulse grew strong under Richter’s hand and the breathing eased. The dwarf lapsed into an easy sleep.

	Once breathing normalized, she looked at Richter, “We have much to discuss, Lord Richter.”

	“Later,” he replied. “We need to help Yoshi.”

	Turning to the villagers, he raised his voice, “All of you who can stand support those who cannot. Those who can fight, your job is to protect the other villagers and make your way back up to the meadow. No arguments,” he said sharply. Several of the villagers had opened their mouths to protest at being sidelined, but they closed them quickly at his tone.

	Terrod had walked up while he was speaking. His blackened face made it clear he had been trapped in the building. “You heard Lord Richter. Let’s get moving!” The man’s voice was scratchy from smoke inhalation, but it still radiated authority. How much of that was due to the Comradery ability, and how much was due to his learned gravitas, Richter didn’t know, and he didn’t care. He nodded his appreciation to Terrod, who simply nodded back. His Companion turned away, and picking up an unconscious villager, began walking towards the meadow north of the village. Not wasting any more time, he just turned to Sion and said, “Ready?”

	The sprite nodded and they ran to the flashes of blue light, Hisako and Daniella not far behind.





CHAPTER 8




	Hisako cried out in outrage and pain. Six of her people lay on the ground. Their bodies were bloodied and ruined. More than one was decapitated. Eleven bugbears bodies joined them in unnatural positions. None were moving. The remaining ten sprites were split between firing out of the village to keep the reinforcements out of the village or attacking the knot of bugbears still inside walls. They were outnumbered even if their attention had not been divided. At least fifteen bugbears remained inside the earthwork walls. The only reason the sprites had not been overwhelmed was the presence of the angel. Zacharia was battering with its crystal sword against an unseen barrier.

	The Dark mage was straining to keep the defense in place. He was down on one knee with both hands raised above his head. The drain of maintaining the shield was telling upon obvious. Next to the Dark mage was another figure. She wore tight-fitting robes that in the light of Hisako’s Blessed Light spell, looked more dark grey than black. There was no submission in her face however, unlike her comrade.

	The grey-robed sorceress had dark grey skin and fine features. Jet black hair hung loose and straight down her back. She held a staff of braided black wood. The end was pointed at the angel. Her face would have been considered beautiful if not for the cruel snarl fixed upon it. She was five and a half feet tall and her ears were upturned like an elf’s. Even at a distance, her form fitting clothes showed off an athletic and pleasing build.

	All of this registered to Richter in a moment, but what caught his attention was Yoshi’s battle with a bugbear several inches taller than the other bugbears Richter had fought. Aside from being bigger, he wore a mix of chain and leather armor, not just the leather of the rest of the attackers. He wielded a large sword. The blade swelled out closer to the tip resembling an axe blade. In the other hand, he held a heater shield. Analyze showed:

	Name: Lif’alt. Bugbear Raider Level 24. Health 410. Mana 130. Stamina 430. Disposition: Enmity. Bugbears are the result of sorcerous experimentation blending cave bears with goblins. The race is naturally strong and hardy. They are adept at hiding. Warlike to a fault, it takes a strong leader to control them. Well known to incorporate other races into their war parties. Bugbears obtain the title of ‘Raider’ by undergoing special training. Every raider has +3 to Strength and Constitution. They also have advanced weapons training. Bugbears get one point to distribute per level, and each level gives +1 to Strength, +1 to Constitution, +1 to Dexterity, +1 to Endurance. Profession: Warrior.

	The steady banging of the angel against the two mages shields provided a slow tempo. The movement of the two Fighters though was faster by far. Everyone around them fought in what looked like slow motion. Yoshi had two blades out, held in either hand. Each was three feet long and double-edged. The blades were one inch wide uniformly until they tapered to a point. They glowed the pale blue of a glacier. As Richter stared, the two exchanged furious blows.

	The raider swung his sword down in an overhand chop. Rather than trying to block, Yoshi smacked his sword against the flat of the falling blade while jumping slightly to the side. The heavy weapon served as a relatively unmoveable surface, allowing Yoshi to push himself out of the way. Getting back on the ground, he spun in a circle both swords lashing towards his opponent’s legs, using the form Samara Seed Falls. The bugbear didn’t even try to dodge, and instead just took the strikes on his iron greaves. Yoshi’s swords left blue white splotches of ice against the iron but did little else. In response, the raider thrust out with his shield trying to bash the sprite. Yoshi had not stayed still however, and used the momentum of his spin to continue behind the invader. That was the idea anyway.

	Seeing his shield bash fail, Lif’alt lowered his center of gravity and pivoted on his front foot, keeping the shield between himself and Yoshi. He activated Thrust, and his heavy blade shot forward several times faster than it would have by strength of arm alone. Richter’s breath caught in his throat. At such a short range there should be no way that Yoshi could dodge. Richter was wrong again.

	Yoshi bent backwards at the waist almost to ninety degrees, putting one leg behind him for balance. At the same time he crossed his swords in front of him, catching Lif’alt’s weapon in the crook of the two blue blades. The other side of the angle they formed was only an inch from Yoshi’s chest. The tip of the sword drew a drop of blood from the end of the adept’s nose. Drawing his blades across his body in a reverse scissoring motion, he pushed the sword up and away. He straightened and he spun both of his swords back into a guard position.

	The two circled one another before resuming their deadly dance. The raider led with his shield, with the sword laid atop sticking towards Yoshi. Taking half steps forward, he closed the distance and jabbed over the top of the shield. Yoshi struck the sword away and swung the sword in left hand over the shield. The bugbear had already retracted his blade though, and was able to deflect the half sprite’s strike. The two started to circle again, putting some space between them.

	Lif’alt activated another Warrior ability, Lunge, triggering an unexpected burst of speed. He crossed the six feet in under a second, the sword leading with a straight thrust. He followed this with a sideways slash, a shield bash and then overhand chop. Yoshi barely dodged the first strike and ducked under the second. Richter saw that the bugbear had waited until Yoshi was backed up against a large stone. The first two attacks of the combo had just been a distraction! The shield bash connected and flung Yoshi back. Richter resisted the impulse to look away from the last attack that he was sure would cleave the half-human in two.

	Once again Richter had underestimated the sword adept. The shield had indeed connected, but it had not knocked Yoshi off balance. He used the force of the shield bash like a spring board to propel him to the stone. He quickly kicked off the large rock and jumped over the bugbear.

	The invader’s downward slash had brought his body forward and made him bend down to a certain extent. As Yoshi passed over the bugbear’s head, he stabbed down with one sword, two feet of the icy blade entering just above the clavicle. The blue blade sunk two feet vertically into his opponent’s chest, leaving frost at the penetration site. A startled grunt escaped the raider, but Yoshi was not done. He maintained his grip on the imbedded sword, using it as a fulcrum. He ended his flip by hanging crouched on his enemy’s back. One hand was holding the handle of the buried blade and his other sword was poised to strike. A moment of stillness came and went, ending when Yoshi thrust forward. The tip of his sword entered through the base of the neck, traveled up at an angle, and then fangs, blood and glowing blue metal exploded from the bugbear’s mouth. That was how the story of Lif’alt ended.

	Richter had been totally distracted by this battle between two fighters and came back to himself with a start. Though it had captivated his entire attention the fight took less than one minute. The other bugbears upon seeing the death of their strongest fighter seemed to deflate and lost some of their intensity.

	Death of an enemy Champion: -100 Fighting Spirit points for enemy forces for the duration of the battle! +50 Fighting Spirit points for allied forces for duration of battle.

	He finally felt like the battle was going their way! The only real question was… when would he stop making stupid assumptions? The sudden absence of a particular sound caught his attention, and he realized he could no longer hear the angel’s sword banging upon the enemy wizards’ magic shield. Turning his head he saw the cherubiae raise his crystal sword in salute to Hisako.

	“Good luck, Daughter of Light.”

	The angel faded from view, its time on this plane done. Large cracks could be seen in the black shield that the mages had huddled behind. The disappearance of cherubiae created an unspoken cease fire. The remaining bugbears broke off their attack on the remaining sprites, backing up towards their casters. Their large shields were dented from blocking imbued magic strikes. The sprites broke off to form around Hisako and Richter. Yoshi stood in front, both swords glowing softly blue in the darkness.

	No one spoke at first, and the two groups just glared daggers at one another. Richter took the opportunity to drink several mana potions. Something about this particular piece of land tickled his memory, but he stopped thinking of it when the female caster said, “Hello Hisako. It has been a long time.” Her voice was a sultry syrup. The kind of tones that everyman thinks he wants to hear.

	“Hello, Modara,” Hisako replied with venom in her voice. Richter looked at her surprised. He hadn’t ever thought he would hear such vehemence coming from the kind and matronly sprite. Her face was a mask of stark anger. Richter looked back at Modara who seemed amused by the Hearth Mother’s fury. “You will not escape this time!”

	Modara just laughed. She held up her staff, “I think you might be overconfident, or do you not recognize what I am holding?”

	“I see your new bauble,” Hisako said in the same tone as before. “I also saw how much you strained to keep the angel at bay. There can’t be much mana left in it. You WILL die!”

	Yoshi spoke up, “Let me take her head now, Hearth Mother! I know what this whore of darkness has done.”

	“Watch how you speak to your betters fool! I will drink the fluid from your eyes,” she spat back at the sword adept. Turning to look at Hisako again, she resumed her previous languid tone of voice, “You are quite right Hisako. I have used most of my reserves, but I have enough for one last spell.”

	Modara raised the staff in the air and shouted an incantation. The sprites started firing at the mass of bugbears, but they huddled behind their shields. Braced by their massive strength, the shields protected them from harm. The two casters were behind the warriors, and the fighters seemed content to let Modara finish casting her spell. After a few seconds, she let loose a shout and thrust the staff into the air. Dark streamers of energy plunged into the ground between the two groups. The earth immediately started rumbling, and then a bony hand shot up, followed by another and another. That was why this patch of ground had seemed significant. It was where Richter and Sion had burned the bodies of the goblins they had killed cleansing the forest!

	Modara’s laugh rose into the air. “You really should be more careful where you put a mass grave!”

	In no time at all, dozens of skeletons had climbed out of the ground. The sprites started firing at these new enemies, and the first volley dropped several, but the Dark mage had not been sitting idle. He finished his spell and dark tendrils wrapped around each skeleton. Whereas before the sprites’ imbued arrows had caused the skeletons to collapse, now they caused much less damage. The defenders would have been overrun, but Hisako saved them again.

	The Hearth Mother raised both arms in a “X” in front of her face and then spread her arms wide. A large gold panel like the ones she had cast before flashed into existence. This was much larger however, and covered two dozen yards in width and ten feet in height. She gave a second and a third shout, each magical yell starting with making another “X” and ending with an open armed stance. The shield became more substantial and glowed brighter at the end of each of her movements. The golden panel was a formidable defense, but the strain of such a large shield was clearly telling on the Hearth Mother’s face. Richter could see the bugbears had joined the skeletons, and all were beating against the wall of light.

	Modara laughed again, “How long can you last Hisako? And just how are you going to kill me after my minions rip you into little pieces? Hahaha.” Hisako didn’t answer, the stressed look on her face did that for her. Richter knew she couldn’t last much longer. Both enemy casters began firing dark beams of energy at the shield. The impact points of their blasts created a fine series of cracks that grew by the second.

	Yoshi spoke up, “The Hearth Mother cannot fight on her own. Form up! We will send these evil creatures to the hell of their choosing. Foresuto No!”

	The sprites responded, “Foresuto No!” Richter translated the phrase silently, ‘For the Forest!’

	He readied himself to fight. He wasn’t concerned about his own life; he would be reborn. The thought of the sprites dying though, filled him with horrible guilt. He couldn’t even think about what would happen to the villagers once the fighters were dead. He knocked an arrow to his bow and prepared for Hisako’s shield to collapse. The sky began to lighten as the assault continued against the gold plate, making it even easier to see the wide spread cracks. It wouldn’t be much longer.

	Wait, lighten?! The sun was coming up! Richter accessed the town interface and checked the mana available. 517! He began to laugh. First the sprites, then the bugbears, and then the casters, started to stare at him. The only person that didn’t seem to notice was Hisako, who was fully committed to their defenses.

	Modara shouted, “Do you think the sun will save you idiot? You’ll be dead before it is fully up!”

	Richter held up his middle finger. “Modara,” he paused to make sure he had her attention, “you’re fat.” She looked at him with utter shock on her face, then her expression twisted into something truly ugly. She screamed in rage. The magical attack from her outstretched hand grew thicker and darker. Richter just laughed evilly, and then threw his hands up above his head. He cast Confusing Mist.

	Thick mist shot out of his body in all directions. It penetrated the golden shield and continued on. Visibility was soon zero for everyone present. He concentrated this time, and mentally focused on making the mist permeate to the boundaries of his domain without leaving a clearing in the middle. As the mist flew faster and faster, he selected all of the sprites and gave them immunity. He also thought of Alma giving her immunity as well. The skeletons had continued to pound at the shield, but the bugbears had stopped in confusion and the two streams of black magic had stopped as well.

	Richter moved to Yoshi, “We need to retreat with Hisako. Tell everyone to be as quiet as possible so that we can loose them in the mists.” The sword adept nodded and spoke quickly to the other sprites. All shouldered their bows, and Sion came to stand next to Richter. Alma alighted on his shoulders hissing at the enemies on the other side of the golden shield. A glowing grey orb was also floating thirty feet away. Richter shouted, “Futen!”

	The orb flowed towards Richter, “Yes, my Lord?” The remnant’s deadpan voice sounded even stranger than normal against the screams of outrage and bloodlust coming from their foes. Modara’s voice rose above the others as she threatened the bugbears with painful deaths if they let Hisako flee.

	“We need to escape. We are going to run as silently as possible. Lead them off in another direction by imitating our voices.”

	“As you wish, my Lord.”

	At a nod from Yoshi, Richter picked up the Hearth Mother and began running. They quickly reached the range of her ability to maintain the shield, which shattered to golden pieces. She cried out at the spell backlash and lapsed into unconsciousness. The fragments dissipated before striking the ground. As soon as the wall was down, the skeletons and bugbears surged forward. Blasts of black energy shot in their general direction. One caught a sprite in the shoulder throwing him to the ground. The brave fighter didn’t make a sound however and regained his feet quickly. Yoshi moved to support him, and they all continued forward. The increased agility of the sprites let them outstrip the bugbears and skeletons. After a minute, voices issued well to the left, and the sounds of pursuit followed it. Once again Futen’s ruse was working.

	They ran for another five minutes until there were no sounds behind them. Stopping to assess, Richter looked at Hisako. She still had not regained consciousness, but she didn’t seem to be in any distress. He waved to two of the sprites and whispered furiously, “Take the Hearth Mother to the meadow. Stay there and protect them all.” He carefully handed over her body. A thought occurred to Richter, and he spent a few seconds giving immunity to the sprites that were guarding the villagers and all of the villagers he could remember.

	Sion came close and asked softly, “What do we do now, Richter?” Yoshi and the other sprites looked at him as well.

	He looked at his best friend, and the other fighters with a harsh glare, “We kill them all.”





CHAPTER 9




	Yoshi made eye contact and nodded once. Bows were unlimbered, and the fighters walked back towards the distant sounds. There was more blood to be spilled. Yoshi separated the remaining sprites into three teams. The order for the other two groups was to find pockets of attackers. They would fire and retreat, using the concealment of the mists for protection. Richter advised all of them about the properties of his spell.

	“They won’t be able to see you unless you get too close, within five or ten feet. Once you attack though it negates the enchantment for a short while. Also, if you imbue an arrow, they may be able to detect you despite the mists. If that happens retreat until they lose sight of you, and then attack again. They ALL die!” The sprites had no objections. They had lost treasured friends and comrades.

	The final group was comprised of Yoshi, Richter, Sion, Daniella, and a fifth sprite named Red. Richter guessed it was because he was wearing a red shirt. When Daniella had asked what their mission was Yoshi had simply said one word, “Modara.”

	They all moved off into the mists following the distant sounds of shouts. Richter had handed out his last mana regeneration potions to his group. They drank the potions on the run. Each group separated from the others as they ran. Being able to see through the mists meant the sprites could move much faster than the bug bears. It wasn’t long before Richter saw blue flashes in the distance to his left, followed by shouts of pain. Thirty seconds later a similar scene unfolded to their right. Yoshi didn’t pause. He kept running with the rest of his party right behind him. They passed two more pockets of enemies, but still the half human didn’t slow. He wanted the Death mage.

	They finally found the hooded caster at the boundary of the village. She and the black robed mage were surrounded by five skeletons and three bugbears. The rest must have gotten lost in the Confusing Mist. Richter expected Yoshi to rush in, but he waved them to stop once they had found their quarry. The mages would most likely already be gone if not for the trench. Bugbears on the other side were bringing up another make shift bridge though. The casters would escape in mere minutes.

	Yoshi turned to Richter, “We need to remove one of the casters quickly. If we imbue our arrows, they’ll see us and I don’t think we can stand against both Modara and the Dark Mage. Do you have a way to take one out quietly?”

	Richter thought for a moment going through his skills and spells. Nothing came to mind except… He pulled an arrow out his bag of holding with a smile. Yoshi looked at and then smiled in return.

	Arrow of Stun. Chance to stun target for 3-5 seconds.

	“This will do,” the sword adept said. Turning to the other sprites, he said, “Poison your arrows. The first two volleys will be done without imbuing. After that, just fight well. Do not risk yourselves unnecessarily, but you all know what that dark elf bitch took from the Hearth Mother. The goal is to kill her. All else is secondary. Lord Richter has a stun arrow. Red and I will approach them from the south. You begin firing from the north. The signal for both attacks is when the first caster falls to the stun arrow. Lord Richter I suggest you target the weaker caster, the Dark Mage. The risk of Modara resisting the effects of the arrow is too great. I will finish her myself,” he said as he held his two blades.

	They quickly rebuffed, and then Richter gave the dangerous sword adept a simple nod. Richter took aim on his target. Yoshi and Red faded to the left while Sion and Daniella moved to the right. Counting to ten to allow everyone to get into position, Richter then drew his bow back and sighted on the black robed Dark mage. His breathing slowed. He drew in a final breath, and then let loose his bow with his exhale.

	The arrow pierced the Dark mage in the chest. The simple robes she was wearing were no match for Richter’s Recurve Bow of the Wood Sprite. It penetrated and she collapsed to the ground not moving. At the same time, Alma swooped down releasing a burst of psychic power that made Modara shriek, and two of the bugbears drop to their knees screaming. Sion and Daniella sank arrows into and the final bugbear. One sank found a home in his furry throat, and he fell back with a wet gurgle. The critical strike coupled with the poison on the arrow heads ensured he would not rise again.

	Modara thrust her staff at Alma in a rage, unleashing a dark destructive beam. Much to Richter’s relief however, his agile familiar was able to avoid the attack and flew off into the mist. Thank god she had cast Haste again! The skeletons started moving towards Sion and Daniella. That was when Yoshi attacked. He flew into their midst and his twin swords flashed in every direction. Bones flew off as he deconstructed the skeletons piece by piece. The Dark magic that had initially made the undead stronger had since faded.

	Red ran into the fray, swinging his sword. He was able to dodge the swings of the skeletons easily. The Dark mage was starting to rise, but Yoshi broke off his attack on the undead and stabbed him in the heart. With his death, the remaining skeletons dropped to the ground in a clatter of bones. Sion and Daniella’s Imbued strikes were keeping Modara huddled behind a spherical purple-black shield. She was chanting a spell, and with a shout her hand extended out in a claw. Two beams made of silver black fire shot from the chests of both bugbears to her hand. Pulses shot from their bodies towards Modara, and the energy gathered in an expanding ball centered on her hand. The two bodies slowly rose into the air, as their life energies were drained away by the Death mage. Unfortunately, Red’s dash brought him within the radius of Modara’s spell as well, and a third tether shot from his chest. The sprite’s back arched in spasm.

	Yoshi yanked his gaze up from the Dark mage’s body and seeing Red being attacked reared back and threw his sword at Modara. Seeing him start his motion she snarled and yanked her arm down. The black ball of energy became a tear in space that she fell through. The tear closed and Yoshi’s sword flew through the space she had occupied only a moment before. The bodies of Red and the two bugbears dropped to the ground. Yoshi said nothing as he walked stiffly to where his sword had fallen. Richter ran over Red, but there was nothing to be done. The sprites skin was pale and cold. His expression was frozen in a rictus of pain.

	Sion and Daniella joined Richter looking at their red-shirted fallen comrade. Yoshi started walking towards the trench. The area that Modara and the others had been trying to cross was actually not far from the ruined gate. The original bridge was just to the side of the gate, and would have given them an easy escape from the village it only they had seen it through the mist. Yoshi sheathed his swords and picked up one corner of the heavy log bridge. He looked back at them, “Come.”

	“Come where,” Sion asked with sadness in his voice. He was kneeling beside Red, holding the dead sprite’s hand. “Modara has gone. Probably miles away if she is even still on this plane! Where are we going,” Sion’s voice was stressed and fatigued.

	Yoshi put the corner of the bridge down and pointed at Red’s body, “They all die. Come.”

	The sword adept walked back to the bridge and picked up the same corner again. Daniella, Sion, and Richter all looked at each then followed and picked up a corner. If Richter was being honest with himself, his desire for blood and vengeance had been extinguished. The original order had been his, however, and he wouldn’t have others fighting while he rested. They extended the wooden bridge out over the trench, and then crossed out of the village into the wild forest beyond. They began to hunt. Even years later they never discussed what happened after they crossed the trench, but not one bugbear left the mist alive.





CHAPTER 10




	It was afternoon by the time the four made it back to the village. Once their bloody task was completed, they had all waded into the river. None of them had wanted to reenter the village covered in gore. Richter had retrieved the better weapons and armor from the slain invaders, but even his Bag of Holding was not large enough to hold them all. He mentally made marks on his Traveler’s Map so that all of the gear could be recovered. The map would also serve to help gather the bodies as well. In addition to being a health risk, Richter believed that even enemies were entitled to proper disposal of their bodies. In this case, they would all just be placed in a pit and burned, but it was still better than being left for the animals. The loot from the bugbears was nothing amazing. Most of the gear was standard, but Richter did find several potions of healing which would come in handy. They crossed the bridge, pulling it in behind them.

	The Dark mage offered better loot.

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 12/12. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight 0.1 kg.

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 11/11. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.1 kg.

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 25/25. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.1 kg.

	You have found: Apprentice Dark Mage Robes. Defense + 12 (additional +15 vs magical attack). Durability 20/20. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight 2.8 kg.

	You have found: Magic Amulet. Durability 20/20. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.3 kg.

	You have found: Magic wand. Attack 4-6. Durability 17/17. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.2 kg.

	You have found: Minor Mana Potion x 4. Taking this will restore 40 mana points over 6 seconds.

	He was well familiar with the blue mana motions and so could identify them by sight. Richter would need Futen to identify the other items whenever he turned up. Despite having spent several nights reading the Lore book, he had yet to achieve the skill to identify unknown magical items. The remnant had found them after they had crossed out of the village, and had been instrumental in locating enemies throughout the morning. If it wasn’t for Futen and the Sion’s tracking skill, they would never have found all of the them. After the last bugbear was killed, Richter had sent Futen back to the Quickening. The remnant was to inform everyone that the attack force had been defeated, and then to keep watch at the base of the hill leading to the meadow. He would serve as an early warning in case any enemies were still hidden and tried to attack the noncombatants.

	The four walked slowly through the village passing the bodies invaders and defenders alike. Each one was marked on Richter’s map, but not even Yoshi had the emotional wherewithal to deal with the bodies of the dead after the morning they had had. Richter felt a painful stab of guilt every time he passed one of his villagers that would never wake again. He took his mind off of it by examining his combat log. Experience was allocation seemed to be different in larger battles. Any enemy that he killed directly he received experience for, but it also seemed he received varying amounts of experience if he helped in the kill at all. Trying to figure out the math was giving him a headache, so he closed his log again.

	They walked until they reached the top of the hill leading to the Quickening. A sea of saddened and weary faces greeted him. The sprites stood around Hisako. The Hearth Mother was now awake and stared at Richter with sympathy. Her empathy touched him. That she could understand his pain and guilt, when her own people had died as well, moved him deeply. He knew that he needed to remain strong though. Sensing his turmoil, Alma landed on his shoulders offering him her warmth and support.

	Terrod stepped forward, “Has the danger passed, Richter? Are we safe?”

	He looked back at his Companion, “They are gone. We killed all that we could and the defenses are back in place.”

	One of the villagers shouted, “Here here! Cheers to Lord Richter! Cheers to our savior!” The villagers took up the cry. All except those who had the vacant look of numb loss. Several families had been irrevocably damaged, and nothing would bring their loved ones back. One mother held a small doll which she gazed at, slowly stroking its hair and murmuring to herself.

	Richter couldn’t stand having them cheer him for stopping an attack that he had allowed to happen in the first place. “Stop, stop! Do not praise me! This is my fault! Because of my arrogance and impatience our defenses were lowered. It was me! I chose to dispel the protective enchantment. I assumed that our location and our trench would protect us. I was wrong.” He walked over to the woman mourning the loss of her daughter, “I’m sorry.”

	With those words, his walls came down. He hadn’t been able to face the complex emotions that had arisen over the last hours of battle. There hadn’t been time. The needs of the moment had helped him to compartmentalize, but saying those simple words broke him down. He reached out and held the woman holding the doll. She looked at his face and began to sob. Unnoticed tears began to stream down his face as well. She clutched the doll to her chest as if it was the child she had just lost. The two of them slowly crumpled down to the ground. He didn’t know how long he sat there with the survivors of the attack. After a time, though, a hand touched his shoulder. Looking up from the embrace he shared with the grieving mother, he saw the faces of Wisteria and Poltan.

	Both were elders of their people, Wisteria was a high elf and Poltan was a hill dwarf. Richter had met with both of them a month before in the Kingdom of Yves. He had convinced them that his village was a chance for a better life, and they in turn had convinced their people to come. Looking up into their faces, he braced himself for the condemnation that he knew he deserved. Instead of berating him though, Wisteria just placed her hand gently against his cheek.

	“Before you came to us, we were struggling to feed our children. The laws of Yves were crushing us, and it was becoming shamefully common for our men to be wantonly killed or our women abused. Nothing was done about it by the authorities because they saw us as less than human. That changed the day that you came to speak to us. You didn’t promise a miracle or a perfect life. Instead, you offered us the chance to rise or fall based on our own merit.” Wisteria’s voice was soft and understanding.

	Poltan spoke after her, “If I remember correctly you said, ‘I make no promises for the future, but I do promise that if you come with me, we will meet it together.’ Today when we were attacked, you didn’t look to save yourself, you plunged into danger. You fought and defeated those that were a threat to us. And,” the hill dwarf paused. When he continued his voice was thick with emotion, “you saved my son, Dargren.” Poltan gestured to a reclining figure behind him. It was the dwarf Richter had used CPR on. Dargren looked exhausted and worn, but was alive. When he noticed Richter’s attention, he smiled weakly and raised his arm in greeting.

	Wisteria withdrew her hand from Richter’s cheek. She offered a hand to help him stand up. He gently disengaged from the woman he had been holding. She stood as well, and then shuffled over to some of her kin who held her in turn. Richter accepted the offered hand and stood. Her grip was sure and reassuring.

	Poltan spoke again, “It is easy for us to forget your youth when we are confronted with the knowledge that you are Master of a Place of Power. You made a mistake, and it was a terrible one. It had real consequences, and as a result, lives were lost. You will have to live with this forever. Nothing you do will ever undo what happened here tonight.” Richter would not have thought it possible, but his heart sunk even lower with the dwarf’s words. He didn’t try to deny it, though. He deserved these words of recrimination and more. So much more. Poltan wasn’t done speaking though, “If I guess correctly though, you have gained in wisdom tonight.” He looked at Alma, “And perhaps you have gained a great deal more as well. Know that you do not need to make every decision alone. If you but ask, we will readily give our counsel and help. Either way however, if your offer remains to stand with us come what may, then we will stand with you.”

	Richter looked around at all the faces around him. Many of the villagers nodded to show agreement with Poltan’s words. The rest at least looked at him with acceptance. Terrod gave him a small smile while he held Isabel, and Sion moved to stand beside him. The sprite didn’t say anything, but then he didn’t need to. They had been through fire and death together. They would always stand together.

	Richter squared his shoulders and set aside his self-pity. His guilt would be with him for some time to come, but Poltan was right. He had made a mistake. He had forgotten that this was not a game. He had been so wrapped up in the loot of the Tome, and so eager to use his cool new ‘toy,’ that he had sacrificed the safety of his people. He would have to live with that.

	A mistake was not all he had made, however. He had also made a promise to stand with these people come what may. He couldn’t undo what had happened, but he could start preparing for the future. It was time to get back to work.

	He was about to address everyone, when a prompt clouded his vision. The notification symbol in the corner of his vision was blinking indicating that at least one other message had appeared, and been auto-minimized during the course of the battle. He was about to minimize this one as well to just deal with them all later, but the interface was a silvery color that he hadn’t seen in a prompt before.

	Congratulations! Your actions on behalf of your village have awarded you your first Tenets! A Tenent is achieved when a preset series of conditions are met. The Tenent will provide certain qualities or privileges to your settlement. At the current level of your village, you may have: one Tenent. At the next level, you may have two Tenets. All previous Tenets can be replaced at the time of the village leveling.

	Congratulations! You have been awarded the Tenent: Don’t mess with Texas I! You have been attacked, and taught those fools a serious lesson! Specifically, less than 10% of those who started the attack lived to see another day. Defense +10% in future attacks, small chance of future attackers acquiring ‘Fear’ status when faced with your merciless forces.

	Congratulations! You have been awarded the Tenent: An Honorable Ruler I! You have made an error that negatively impacted your settlement. More importantly, however, you acted in a way that was consistent with your conscience. You were honest with your people and admitted your fault. As a result they will trust you more and feel more comfortable relying upon you. Loyalty for all inhabitants increased by +0.5 per day.

	Would you like to assign a Tenent now? If you do not, then one will be randomly assigned in one week. Yes or No?

	Richter shook his head. His first impulse was to choose the first prompt. Right now all he could think about was protecting his people, but he resisted the urge to act impulsively. That was the kind of the action that had led to the attack. He would have to learn more about both options. He decided to deal with it later. What he needed to do was take care of his people. There were tasks in front of them that needed to be completed.

	Richter started speaking, “Okay then. This is what we do.” Over the next several minutes he outlined tasks for everyone that was able to help. Even the children were given assignments. He detailed several of those more comfortable with weapons to go stand guard around the trench. The defenses may have been back up, but Richter wouldn’t take chances again. Randolphus thankfully had survived the attack and assured Richter that a guard rotation would be setup around the clock. Quasea, the gnome Dark magic adept, promised to cast Night Vision on the guards for the night shifts. A quick request to Yoshi also got him a detail of sprites to sweep the village and surrounding land a final time, to ensure no other enemies were near.

	He then tasked several of the villagers with collecting the bodies of their fallen comrades. The enemy bug bears would be left for the Mist Workers. Sumiko said she would aid with the disposal of the bodies. There was apparently a simple blessing that would keep the corpses from being resurrected in the future. He instructed Futen to summon as many of the workers as possible as quickly as possible, but to pay special attention to having the full four hundred mana needed at midnight to pay the upkeep of Confusing Mist. Futen responded with his customary, “Yes, my Lord.”

	He asked Sion to make more potions, specifically as many mana potions as possible. It was time to put the superb quality alchemy set he had bought to good use. Thankfully another sprite said he was skilled in Herb Lore, and an arcane gnome said he was quite skilled at potions. Unless they could make their own mana and health potions, the only other source would be to wait until they got a shipment from Leaf’s Crossing. That would take at least a month. That brought him to the next important issue.

	He asked Shiovana to go with the sprites once they went outside of the city walls. He needed to know if work done on the ship had been destroyed or not. Connection to the outside world was of the utmost importance. He also asked several of the farmers to go on the same trip and check the crops.

	The children that had shown skill with Herb Lore were to sweep the meadow with Sion or the other sprite and help collect herbs for potion making. The rest of the villagers were to salvage whatever could be useful from the fallen invaders and the ruins of the longhouse. Terrod was in charge of that group. His ability to get along with people would make this day go much easier. It might also soften the realization that they would all be staying in the rooms off of the Great Seal until another longhouse could be built.

	Elora flew up while he was talking. She felt terrible that she had not been helpful during the attack. In turn, Richter just apologized for putting her in danger. He assured her that her only task was to live and grow. She seemed to feel better after their short talk, and flew over to hover by Hisako. Richter checked in with the Hearth Mother, who besides being a bit tired, appeared to be none the worse for wear. She agreed to rest in Richter’s quarters for at least the next couple of hours. Yoshi and a few other sprites would stand guard. She protested it wasn’t necessary, but the adept was not to be budged on this matter.

	Richter addressed the group of human and nonhuman villagers once again, “Thank you for everything! We will rebuild. I promise you that. When you first arrived here, I chose not to include all of you in the immunity to the mists. Right or wrong, I own up to that decision. We are in a different place now, though. We rise, or fall, together. I trust you all with the safety of our village. I will work to keep us safe. Make sure you do the same.” Richter’s voice took on a heavy tone, and he drew his glass dagger, “I swear to you that this attack will be avenged. I will find the rest of those responsible. They are already dead; they just don’t know it yet!” He drew his dagger against his palm and showed the blood to his people. Hisako gasped a weak, “No,” but the deed was done. Richter squeezed his fist shut, and the first drop of blood dripped down and struck the ground. There was rumble of thunder.

	Know This! You have made a Blood Oath of Vengeance. In The Land, your words have meaning. You have one year to enact vengeance on the attackers of your village. If you do not accomplish this, the anger in your heart will poison your soul. This soul sickness will cause the loss of one Charisma per week until your vengeance is complete. Any losses will be permanent.

	You have received a Mark: Blood Oath of Vengeance.

	A tingling began all over his body and swept over him until it concentrated on his inner right wrist. Looking down, he saw a red diamond with skull inside of it. A slight glow was in the center of the eyes. It faded from view in a few seconds.

	Richter could live with the countdown. Whoever was responsible for this attack would be lucky to make it a year. As far as the physical Mark … He would figure out what it meant and deal with that too. He was preparing to leave the meadow when he heard someone say “Through service, ascendance.” The other villagers answered together in a shout, “Through dedication, transcendence!” Yes, Richter thought, I will protect these people. In fact…

	“My people! Before you leave to start your tasks, I would like to make an offer. If any of you wish it, I will use my power as an Air Master to awaken any Air magic you have inside of you.”

	His announcement drew a sharp intake of breath from most of those present, and everyone started talking at once. He could only awaken Air magic in those who had over 50% affinity for that school of Power. Just because they had over 50% did not mean they would ever naturally manifest though. With Richter’s intervention, however, anyone over 50% was guaranteed to be able to cast spells. His pronouncement raised such an uproar because knowledge and magical power were jealously guarded secrets in Yves. Only the rich or powerful would be able to be taught magic without a lifetime pledge of service to the King or one of the magical guides. It was like Richter had just offered a chance for a free ride to Harvard (or somewhere even better like Dartmouth or Morehouse), to EVERYONE in the glade!

	The quickly formed a line, and as each passed by he placed his left hand on their heads’ and his right hand on their hearts. He would then murmur, “By the Right of My Power, I Awaken Your Power.” For most nothing happened, and they would leave with a disappointed, but grateful expression on their faces. In no less than thirty one villagers though, eleven of them children, he felt the same warmth he had experienced when he had awoken Sion’s power. The feeling would emanate from the center of his chest and flow down his arms into the man, woman or child, and find a resonance within them. For only a few hours of work, he now had thirty-one new Air novices in his village. Each of them were pulled aside from their duties, and Randolphus documented their affinities, and any starting spells they were granted.

	Most of the villagers only received one spell or none. It seemed like it was tied to their affinity however, and five villagers with affinities above 90% at skill level one, received two spells. For the most part, the spells were the same as what Richter had started with, Haste and Errant Wind, but a few received spells that Richter didn’t have. Randolphus’s descriptions were exact.

	Glitterdust! This spell will create a 5x5 foot area of shining sharp dust. Anyone caught in the AoE will suffer certain effects. Effect 1: Hidden creatures will be revealed. Effect 2: Chance to blind creatures susceptible to such attacks. This is a spell of Air Magic. Cost: 30 mana. Duration: 1 min. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 30 seconds.

	Air Push! This spell creates a column of air ten feet in front of you, one foot in diameter. Does no real damage, but will knock enemies back and possible prone. This is a spell of Air Magic. Cost: 15 mana. Duration: 1 second. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 2 min.

	Gentle Rain! This spell summons a small rainstorm. This can be cast inside. This is a spell of Air Magic. Cost: 40 mana. Duration: 20 min. Range: 100 yards. Cast Time: 5 min. Cool Down: 1 hour.

	Some of the spells were very useful! Glitterdust would have been indispensable in the attack on the Night Daggers. At the very least, it might have kept Richter from being shived in the back. The Air Push was also a good offensive spell, and as far as Gentle Rain… Richter smiled, he had a feeling that the crops would always have what they needed.

	To finish increasing the Air magic skill of his villagers, he had a group teaching session. When he was done, all thirty-one Air novices knew at least, Haste and Errant Wind. He left them with the instruction to practice their new powers every day. Unfortunately, they could not teach Richter their spells, but at least someone knew them, he thought. When he was done, he started walking down the hill.

	As Richter was turning away, Sion asked him, “What are you going to be doing, my friend?”

	Richter stopped his movement, and instead placed his hand on his Companion’s shoulder, “It’s time to get stronger.”





CHAPTER 11




	Richter handed his map to the sprites that would be sweeping the village, and the lands beyond. Futen had already summoned four Mist Workers that would accompany the sprites and retrieve the bodies. As he was walking down the hill, he asked Sion to join him in the Great Seal room once he had retrieved enough herbs to get started on making potions. Hisako, Yoshi and several other sprites followed him intending to go into the catacombs to rest. Alma flew in lazy circles above his head and Futen floated along behind. While they walked. Richter examined all of the combat prompts he had gained during the battle.

	Congratulations! You have received racial bonus Level I vs bugbears. +3% attack and defense bonus when fighting bugbears. Kill total 100 bugbears to reach next level.

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: War Leader. Your presence will now be seen as a rallying point in war. Those around you will fight harder. Base distance for bonus is radius of 10 yards from War Leader. Take a prominent role in larger battles to increase this skill. Being a War Leader automatically qualifies you as a Champion in battles.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in War Leader. +1% effective distance. +1% attack and defense for all allies.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 8 in Archery. +2% bonus to aim. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 3 in Focus. +2% bonus to aim. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 7 in Light Armor. +2% bonus to aim. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 3 in Grace in Combat. Dodge increased by 12%.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 4 in Grace in Combat. Dodge increased by 13%.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Earth Magic. New spells now available.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Life Magic. New spells now available.

	Your familiar has performed her special attack: Brain Drain. She can latch onto the mind of an enemy, and drain its thoughts and experiences. The minds of other creatures are not meant to undergo this, and the affected creature will suffer an ongoing drop in health, mana and stamina while she continues her attack. Additionally, the mental attack will cause confusion and disorientation, in already weakened or low-level creatures it will create a stunned status. Brain Drain requires her whole focus however, and she will essentially be helpless while performing the attack. If the creature expires while the attack is in place, she will absorb 1% of the its total accumulated experience. Her master will also receive 1% of the target’s experience.

	You have been award 521 (base 41,723 x 0.01 x 1.25) experience from Brain Drain against Level 8 Bugbear.

	The first prompt raised mixed feelings in Richter. Having it reported in black and white that he had taken more than twenty-five lives was not something he was proud of. At the same time though, they weren’t the first deaths he had caused since coming to The Land. They most certainly wouldn’t be the last. It was the last combat prompt that truly fascinated him, though. It raised some very interesting possibilities. If Alma could target some high level enemies with Brain Drain, he could really power level!

	The combat play by play wasn’t all that was awaiting his perusal. Apparently, the destruction the bugbears had caused made a measurable effect.

	You have lost the 100% of the constructed shelter for your people. This occurred during an attack, and so your people will be understanding. If you do not build another shelter within one week however, the morale of your people will decrease by 5 per day to a maximum loss of 50. Shelter is a basic tenant of survival. You will not receive the bonus to morale that you initially did upon completing your shelter.

	Heavy is the head that wears the crown, Richter thought to himself. When they got back to the catacombs, Richter saw Hisako to his room to rest. Rather than leave, he stopped by the bedside. The other sprites also stayed because him, and Yoshi looked at him questioningly. Not wasting anytime, he spoke, “I am so thankful for everything you have done for us. I am equally sorry about the loss of life you have had to endure to do it. I have little to offer, but I would like to offer this. I will try to awaken Air Magic in you,” he said to Hisako, “and any of your warriors.”

	She looked at him surprised. Even after seeing him invest his magic into his people, it had not occurred to her that he would make the sprites the same offer. The ‘every man for himself’ philosophy seemed heavily entrenched in The Land. Well, that was something he would change. He preferred the motto of enlightened self-interest. Richter wasn’t a push over, but he did believe that by serving the interests of friends and allies, he would ultimately be furthering his own interests.

	“This is not necessary, Lord Richter. We are allies. It is our honor to fight by your side!”

	“I know, Lady Hisako,” he replied just as formally. There was a time for friendship, but right now he was operating as the leader of his people. He was extending a potential weapon to an ally. In truth, he should have done this before. “I offer this freely.”

	“You do not know how precious the gift that you offer is, however. It is not to be done lightly.”

	“It is not, Hearth Mother. Will you accept what I offer?”

	She nodded her head in acquiescence. Richter walked forward and placed his hands upon the Hearth Mother. He soon felt the magic intertwine with her soul, and she opened her eyes an Air mage novice. He smiled and was about to extend the same offer to the other sprites, but she caught his hand in a surprisingly strong grip.

	“I offer this freely as well,” she said her hands extended. Understanding what she offered, Richter bowed his head and bent down. “By the Right of My Power, I Awaken Your Power,” she breathed, and Richter felt for the first time, what he had made others feel. Much of it was indescribable, but it felt like his soul was a house with many rooms. Some were darkened, but in one a light had now been kindled. Forever on from this day, he would be… more.

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Light Magic. Increasing your skill will allow you to cast more advanced spells.

	He thanked her profusely, and then they taught each other the spells that they could.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Simple Light! Creates a ball of white light that will hover above your head, moving with you. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 2 mana. Duration: 10 minutes. Range: Self. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Far Light! Creates a ball of white light that can be fixed to a distant surface. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 5 mana. Duration: 10 minutes. Range: 100 yards. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Mirror! Creates a 6x3 foot reflective surface. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 15 mana. Duration: 1 minute. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.

	Once they were done, Richter tried to teach Air magic to the other sprite warriors. Only three were able to learn, but Hisako was surprised even at that. She told him that seeing thirty-one of his people being able to become Air novices was shocking. Apparently magical affinity was nowhere near that common. Also various races were known for a predisposition to certain magical schools. According to Hisako, meeting a dwarf Air caster, when Air was the natural opposite to their racial predisposition of Earth magic, was strange to say the least! The only explanation she could come up with was that it was due to everyone’s exposure to the birth of the Quickening.

	When they were done, Richter finally left Hisako to rest, and then walked back into the Great Seal room. “Futen.”

	“Yes, my Lord?”

	“I need help with identification.” Richter pulled out the items from the Dark mage. The grey orb flared with an inner white light, and then Richter reexamined the items.

	You have found: Ring of Health. Durability 12/12. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.1 kg. +20 to Health.

	You have found: Ring of Minor Mana. Durability 11/11. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.1 kg. +10 to Mana.

	You have found: Ring of Flowing Thought. Durability 25/25. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.1 kg. +20% mana regeneration.

	You have found: Apprentice Dark Robes. Defense + 8 (additional +12 vs magical attack). Durability 18/20. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight 2.8 kg. +10% Dark magic resistance.

	You have found: Amulet of Minor Mana. Durability 20/20. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.3 kg. Mana +10.

	You have found: Wand of Dark Bolts. Attack 4-6. Durability 17/17. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.2 kg. Casts spell Dark Bolts. Charge 0/50.

	Hmmm. Most of the items were no better than what he already had. He was already wearing eight rings. In the game that was the max that could be worn. Might as well test that theory now. Keeping an eye on his mana, he slipped the Ring of Minor Mana onto a finger. There was no change. He then took off his Dungeon Ring and tried again. His mana increased by 10 points. Well, that answered that. He rearranged his ring configuration and ended up wearing his four old Rings of Health, increasing his Health by +120. He also put on the slightly inferior Ring of Health the Dark mage had been wearing, increasing his Health another +20. He kept on his Ring of Hidden Dangers because he no likey’d da traps. The Minor Ring of Healing also stayed put. Even though it only healed 30 health, the effect was immediate rather than spread out over several seconds like his spells or potions. That made it invaluable. He also held onto his old Ring of Mana, which increased his mana reserves by +20. Last, he equipped the Ring of Flowing Thought. An increase to mana regeneration was just something he couldn’t pass up. The amulet would be a definite step down from his Necklace of Scry Defense, so he just put all of the other items into his Bag.

	Next, he quickly allocated the points and percentages from his previous level increases. His fingers almost tingled at the thought of being able to drop 24 points into his stats! The running and the fight had given him +1 to Agility. Strength had been a neglected attribute for him so far, as most of his kills had been at a distance. This first larger battle showed that things did not always go as planned. He invested +6 into Strength. With the +8 from the sprite breastplate, he could put some real power into his melee attacks now. The same logic of investing in close combat went for Stamina, it would be of greater importance in close quarters combat. He invested +3 in Endurance. His Dexterity was high enough for now, and he was also benefiting from the sprite armor bonus. Constitution, however, would always be important. Higher level enemies meant higher level damage. He allocated +8 to Constitution. Last, something inexplicable drove him to do it, but he put +1 into Luck. The other 6 characteristic points he decided to hold off on. Seeing as how he was going to be tackling a dungeon soon, it might be nice to have an ace in the hole. He did a quick check of his status.

	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 14, 21%

Health: 390 Mana: 300 Stamina: 200

Strength: 29

Agility: 18

Dexterity: 34

Constitution: 25

Endurance: 20

Intelligence: 23

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 24

Luck: 15

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Psi Bond

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 38; 91% to next level, 100% affinity

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level, 100% affinity

Analyze Lvl 5; 24% to next level, 100% affinity

Stealth Lvl 4; 76% to next level, 100% affinity

Archery Lvl 8; 18% to next level, 100% affinity

Imbue Arrow Lvl 4; 62% to next level, 100% affinity

Focus Lvl 3; 11% to next level, 100% affinity

Double Shot Lvl 3; 31% to next level, 100% affinity

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 40% to next level, 100% affinity

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 29% to next level, 100% affinity

Small Blades Lvl 1; 11% to next level, 100% affinity

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level, 100% affinity

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level, 100% affinity

Light Armor Lvl 7; 5% to next level, 100% affinity

Grace in Combat Lvl 4; 88% to next level, 100% affinity

Air Magic Lvl 3; 82% to next level, 100% affinity

Life Magic Lvl 3; 57% to next level, 100% affinity

Earth Magic Lvl 3; 29% to next level, 100% affinity

Water Magic Lvl 1; 19% to next level, 100% affinity

Dark Magic Lvl 3; 64% to next level, 100% affinity

Light Magic Lvl 1; 24% to next level, 100% affinity

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 14; 52% to next level, 100% affinity

War Leader Lvl 2, 43% to next level, 100% affinity

Marks:

Master of Mist Village

Blood Oath

Resistances:

Air 50%

Earth 20%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 3 “You seem like someone worthy of my attention.”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





	He was really getting an extensive skill collection. The page was actually starting to look a bit cluttered. He played with the settings a bit and was able to remove the 100% affinity that was on every skill. Better, he thought. Then he put the 100% of skill percentage points into Archery, which was still his strongest combat skill. It brought him to skill level 9. Only one level away from more sweet experience! Satisfied with how everything was shaping up, he addressed Futen again, “A while ago I was offered a quest to unlock more of my power, but I hadn’t met the requirements yet. I have a feeling that now that I’m above level 10, you can help me to learn more about it.”

	“Yes, my Lord,” Futen flared and a prompt came across Richter’s vision.

	You have met the requirements of a previously restricted Quest: Unlock your Power II. Your village will increase your power, but you must care for it in turn. Go to a local dungeon, and clear at least the first level. Reward: Unlock one of the Powers. Yes or No?

	Choosing ‘Yes’ he asked, “You know where the dungeon is I’m guessing?”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	“We will leave tomorrow morning. I need to rest. Help the villagers and summon Mist Walkers as soon as you can. We need to get more trees to rebuild the longhouse. But that is only after all the bodies have been collected and buried. Do whatever Sumiko asks of you until it's done.”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	Richter walked to the barracks and fell onto the bed. Alma curled into a circle, resting on top of his chest and closed her eyes. In seconds, he too had fallen into an exhausted sleep.





CHAPTER 12




	He slept like the dead. It was impossible to tell time inside of the catacombs, but it felt like he had slept for a while. A quick check showed that Alma had left while he was sleeping. The first thing he did once he got up was to look for Hisako. She wasn’t in her room or in any of the other rooms off of the Great Seal. He paused once to enter the armory and unload the gear he had picked up yesterday. Though the Bag of Holding decreased weight by 90%, it still felt nice to relieve himself of all the extra kilos.

	He was walking down the tunnel to check on his people when he ran into Randolphus.

	“Greetings, my Lord.”

	“Hello Randy. I trust nothing else horrible happened while I was sleeping?”

	“Thankfully not, my Lord. But I do have some slightly unpleasant news.”

	Richter gave a sigh and nodded, “Walk with me. You can tell me on the way to the Quickening.”

	Randolphus fell in step behind Richter, “The first thing you should know it that we lost twenty-one villagers in the attack. Seven sprites were also killed.”

	Richter stopped walking and closed his eyes. He knew it was more than a few, but hearing how many had died made his heart drop. He opened his eyes and looked at his chamberlain, “I assume you have a list of dead?”

	Randolphus handed him a sheaf of paper. It had names, race and age. Richter resolved to memorize each and every name. He scanned it quickly and was about to put it for later away when the last entry caught his attention. Petal, Human, Age 6. Richter had to resist crumpling the paper in his hand, but he still shook with rage. Randolphus showed supreme wisdom and experience by not disturbing him over the next few minutes. It took some time, but Richter composed himself, carefully rolling the paper up and put it in his Bag. Those bastards were going to pay!

	“Thank you for preparing this, Randy. What else do I need to know?”

	“Unfortunately, my Lord, the invaders attacked from the direction of the farmland. Most of the fields were ruined by them. The farmers still have seed, but they worry that by the time they till the earth again and go through the process of planting, it might be too late for certain crops. If that is true, then we would need to buy additional supplies to last us through the winter.”

	Richter nodded, which Randy took as an indication to continue. “We have collected our dead and have taken them to the meadow north of the village. I thought that would be the proper place to bury them. They could overlook the village they had died for through eternity.” Richter nodded again. He mentioned a thought he had had regarding a memorial, which Randy said he would look into.

	“What else, Randy?”

	“The Mist Workers have gathered the bodies of the dead invaders. A large pit has been dug outside of the city walls. Lady Sumiko has been blessing them as they are brought over. I detailed some of the more stoic villagers to strip the bodies of anything useful. We will bring the weapons to the armory, and I will arrange for any other items to be brought to my office for cataloging. I will have Futen identify any unknown objects and make you a list, if that is alright with you, my Lord?”

	“Of course, it is Randy.” They had walked outside, and enjoyed the view of the setting sun. Standing at the top of the slope leading to the catacombs the village looked like such an idyllic setting. It was hard to believe it had been the site of a potential slaughter just yesterday. The scene helped to calm his still raw nerves. Then he caught sight of the charred remains of the longhouse and anger once again ruled his heart. He started walking and motioned for Randolphus to continue.

	“We still have a large number of logs prepared that were going to be used for other buildings. I am working on choosing another sight for the longhouse, and will organize crews to take away the wreckage of the previous one. Housing will be given the utmost priority.”

	“No,” Richter said a touch sharply. He looked at Randolphus while they walked. “Priority must be given to building the smithy. I also want you to take Yoshi and our most accomplished smiths to the armory.” Several doors in the first floor of the catacombs had required Richter to show his Mark which declared him Master of the Mist Village before they would open. He had discovered upon returning to the village from Yves, that he could give privileges to anyone he chose to open the doors at will. He had given Sion, Terrod and Randolphus access to most of them. He was still the only one that could open the treasury though. Even though it was mostly empty, it held most of the wealth of the village. “I also want to see the smiths tonight. After I meet with Hisako, I want you to find them and bring them to me. The same goes for any of our crafters, casters and hunters. Find out if anyone has experience with potion making and bring them as well. We also need to decide who we can send on our trade trip back to Yves. I need someone with high Charisma and preferably a good level in the Trade skill. Make sure they are smart as well though. I don’t need an ample chest and an empty head! I have a feeling these trade trips are going to be very important to all of us. I will also need a detailed list of the skills and abilities of everyone in the village.”

	Randolphus opened his mouth to reply, but Richter cut him off. “Yes, yes, I know. You tried to show me that before, and I shut you down. I’ll do better to listen to you, but we all need to be stronger. Even the weakest of the bugbears would have been a match for almost any of our villagers in terms of training, weapons and armor. If it wasn’t for the sprites we would not have survived the night. That can’t be allowed to happen again!”

	Randolphus nodded solemnly. He didn’t write down anything that Ricther had said this time, but there was no doubt that everything would be taken care of. If there was a skill for government administration, Randy would be a master. “What else,” Richter asked.

	Their conversation meandered while they walked. There seemed to be a never-ending list of things to deal with. Richter was once again convinced that Randolphus just might be the most useful member of the village. The chamberlain stopped speaking as they ascended the hill to the meadow of the Quickening. Walking across the field, Ricther saw several sprites along the outskirts of the tree. He knew Hisako must be beneath its boughs. “Thank you Randy, is there anything else?”

	Randolphus firmed his lips while he looked at Richter. The man looked uncertain, which concerned Richter. As far as he could remember, the chamberlain had never seemed anything but confident and competent. Richter realized that the past day must have weighed on Randolphus as well. He softened his expression and asked, “What do you need to say, Randolphus?”

	“May I speak freely, my Lord?”

	Richter nodded.

	“It may not be my place, but I heard your confession this morning, and I witnessed the forgiveness the elders gave you.” He sighed deeply before continuing, “I know you let the attack weight heavily on you. What I need to say is that it should have. More you should have considered the gravity of the attack, BEFORE you cast your spell. Because you were impatient, several of your people died. Some of them children. Now I don’t know if we could have avoided the attack if the enchantment had stayed in place, but we would have had a better chance. You failed your people yesterday.”

	Richter just stood with his jaw tight. Hearing this was rubbed salt on his emotional wounds. Randolphus wasn’t saying anything that wasn’t true, however. So he nodded, and waited for the man to continue.

	Randolphus stared at his Lord, seeing that his words were having an effect. He continued, “I have served men of power for several decades, and seen countless more in my position at court. Some of them have been strong and some have been weak. Some have been wise, but far too many were foolish. One thing was true of all of them, however. They all made mistakes.” Randolphus voice softened somewhat while Richter stood listening with unshed tears. “What matters is what happens afterwards. You are not hiding from your errors, but instead are letting them inspire you to be better. What I have said was all true, my Lord. It is also true however, that I am proud to serve a man who values of the lives of his subjects. I believe you to be a man of honor.” Randolphus bowed his head, “I am in turn, honored to be your chamberlain.”

	A small bit of the tension and guilt Richter had been feeling alleviated. It wasn’t much of a change, but it was noticeable. He put his hand on Randolphus’s shoulder, “Thank you for your words. I know that I could not do this without you. Please do not ever hesitate to share your thoughts or your counsel with me… especially if you think I am making a huge mistake.” Richter wanted to lighten the mood with a faint smile, but couldn’t draw one to his face.

	Randolphus looked relieved that his words had been received well. When he spoke his next words, he was once again the epitome of propriety. “Of course, my Lord. I will take leave your leave now, and put in motion what we have discussed. I will bring everyone you asked for to the Great Seal.”

	The chamberlain turned and left, and Richter walked under the canopy of the Quickening. He soon saw Hisako and several of the other sprites. She had cast globe of light spells in response to the setting sun. Once again the silver undersides of the leaves shone with the golden white light of her spell. As he got closer, he saw a look of wonder on her face. The expression was mirrored on the faces of the other sprites. They were all looking at the six-inch tall figure flitting around in the air above their heads. When Elora saw him, she crossed the ten yards separating them in the blink of an eye.

	She stopped and hovered a few feet in front of his face, and then curtseyed while hovering in midair. She had somehow turned one of the leaves of the Quickening into a flowing dress. The outside was soft white, but as she moved around he caught flashes of silver from the inner hem.

	“Well met, my Lord Richter.” The melodious notes of her voice stilled some of the agitation within him, and the formal greeting from such a small creature brought a faint smile to his face. He decided to mirror her tone so that she wouldn’t be embarrassed.

	“Greetings, Queen Elora, but please just call me Richter.”

	“I’m sorry, I forgot. Thank you… Richter.” Elora gave a small giggle at her boldness and then swiftly zipped back to hover above Hisako.

	Richter walked over to the Hearth Mother and knelt down so they were eye to eye. “Thank you for your help, Hearth Mother. If it wasn’t for you and your warriors, I am sure we all would have been killed.” His voice broke a bit, “Again, I am so sorry for the loss of your people.”

	She looked at him with a serene expression, “Thank you, Richter. I know well the pain and guilt you must be feeling because I have felt it myself too many times. All I can tell you is that over time the pain will lessen. What do you plan to do now?”

	“I need to be stronger. So does my village. I plan on clearing a dungeon, and unlocking another one of my powers. I will leave as soon I know my village is safe. Before anything else though, I offer my time and my strength to you. You may ask for anything. I will never be able to repay the debt I owe you.”

	“Shush,” she lightly admonished. “You are the Master of a Place of Power. You should have learned by now, the danger of idle words. I asked you to take up arms against the bugbears. We are allies against a common enemy. It was always an unfortunate reality that some of us would die. Do not apologize again, just continue to stand and fight with us.”

	“That I can promise you,” Richter said with some steel in his voice.

	“Good,” she said, matching him in intensity. “I have information for you. When my people were sweeping you’re the area around the village, we found one bugbear that had been hiding. He was captured and questioned. I know why you were attacked. As my people have been looking for the main bugbear encampment, it appears that they have been looking for us as well. Apparently they had greater success. We were followed by one of their scouts after leaving the Hearth Tree. He trailed us to the boundaries of your domain. Because of the mists, it could follow no further. The scout retreated, found reinforcements, and then returned to the edge of your defensive enchantment. They were waiting for the express purpose of laying an ambush once we exited the mists again. Then, two things happened.”

	Hisako held up a finger, “The first was that the Quickening was planted and it sent the beam of green light into the air. It was as good as a beacon giving them a fairly specific direction to move in.” Richter nodded as this had been what he had already surmised. “The second was the drop in the village’s enchantment. With the disappearance of the mists, they moved forward in a broad line and found the village after only a few hours. At that point, it was the simple matter of creating a make shift bridge to span the trench around your village. The only thing that saved us was that they sent a scouting force into the village first as opposed to sending their entire force at once. Bugbears are adept at stealth, so under the cover of night it is not surprising that they made it by whatever guards you had posted, and then killed them before they could raise an alarm. One of your villagers must have seen them however, and raised the alarm. It made them attack prematurely and you know the rest.”

	“The point is Richter; we all share the blame for this attack. This is a war. And though you are only now just joining it, this is a war that has been raging for millennia on countless fronts. You do not owe me anything. I only ask that you do what you have already resolved to do. Grow stronger, follow your conscience, and oppose evil as you come across it.”

	The perspective he gained from Hisako’s recounting gave him some peace. He turned to Yoshi, “Where is the bugbear?”

	The sword adept pointed down the hill and past the village wall, “Waiting to be put in the pit. I had to asking some of my questions… forcefully.”

	There was no ambiguity to that. Richter could not muster any criticism of Yoshi’s tactics. He and Sion had done the same to a goblin in the past. Even if he hadn’t, the invaders put themselves in harm’s way when they attacked. They got what was coming to them.

	“Understood,” Richter said. “Well you know my plans,” he said to Hisako, “What are yours?”

	“I will stay here for a time if that it is alright with you. I wish to spend more time with Elora. She will bond to the tree soon, and I will want to be there for that. Besides, Yoshi doesn’t want me leaving the protection of the village until there are more guards to escort me back.”

	“I trust that is not an issue,” Yoshi asked. Of course, he wasn’t really asking.

	“No. You are all welcome here for as long as you wish,” Richter said. “I need to go take care of certain matters.”

	Before he could walk away, though, Yoshi stepped in front of him. “You are overdue for a sword lesson. You skipped the lesson yesterday completely.”

	“We were attacked! I got enough practice!” Richter’s voice rose a bit.

	“I’ll be the judge of what constitutes practice,” the adept said. “Tonight, practice will resemble… our very first lesson.”

	Richter’s eyes widened and all of the fire went out of him, “Th-the first lesson?” His voice rose again, but this time in a most undignified manner.

	“Yes, Lord Richter,” a thick and quite hard looking length of wood had appeared in Yoshi’s hand.

	“Yes, well… as I said, I do have quite a few duties to attend to, and people to speak to.”

	“They will wait,” the sword adept said advancing.

	Richter looked to Hisako for help, but she seemed to be finding something completely engrossing in the exact opposite direction he was standing in. Yup, this time he was sure she was smiling!

	When Richter looked back, Yoshi’s face was only inches away from his own. The half-human lowered his voice and said softly, “Why don’t we get started?” A toothy grin was on his face, and a manic gleam had made its way into his eyes.

	Richter said the only thing that came to mind, “Derrrrrrr…”





CHAPTER 13




	“Goddamnhalfbloodsadistsunuvabitch!” This was the first utterance Richter made to the collection of skilled people that Randolphus had gathered at his request. More than a hundred people were crammed in the chamber of the Great Seal. He was sitting at the head of the table that his chamberlain had brought out of one of the larger rooms on the first floor of the catacombs. Alma lay curled in a ball on the table in front of him. After his training with Yoshi, standing during the meeting was out of the question. Even sitting would have been beyond him if Hisako hadn’t taken away the worst part of his pain with a spell. He was still left with minor to medium aches and pains, however, which had elicited the aforementioned expression when he had turned too fast and felt a painful spasm in his back. There wasn’t even any point in casting another healing spell. His health was full; he was just sore.

	“Sorry about that,” Richter said. “I have gathered you all here because I want us to be working in the same direction. First, we need to speak about rebuilding the longhouse and finishing the smithy. The smithy will take priority.” There were a few murmurings at that, but Richter held up his hand until they died down. “We were woefully unprepared during the attack. We have a very small amount of guards and fighters when we examine our entire population. That will be fixed, but in the meantime, we will balance it out with better equipment and training. So we get the smithy finished as quickly as possible, and then the longhouse. After that, I want a switch to building with the quarried stone as opposed to just wood. Let the chamberlain know if you need anything else.” He asked the builders and carpenters if they had any questions. They merely said they would need a great deal more stone and more Mist Workers. Randolphus made a note of it and they moved on.

	Next he turned to the hunters, “You need to range a bit more afield. I don’t want the hunting grounds near the village to be depleted. But the bugbears are out hunting for us so be especially careful. No one hunts alone for the foreseeable future. If you find an enemy, and can make a kill safely then go ahead. If it is a larger force send one person back to notify us, while the other follows from a safe distance.” The seven strong force just nodded. He went on to the next item on the agenda.

	For this next question, he addressed the entire room, “Why aren’t there more enchanted weapons?” No one spoke, they all just looked at one another. Finally, a high elf spoke. Analyze showed:

	Name: Gloran. High Elf Level 14. Health 210. Mana 320. Stamina 150. Disposition: Friendly. …

	The elf’s stats were normal for his level, but he had the Profession of Crafter. Richter really had to learn more about Professions, but now was not the time.

	“Without getting into specifics, Lord Richter, it is expensive and not many have the expertise to enchant. It also requires specialized items that are rare and difficult to acquire.” Several people around the table nodded in agreement.

	“Do any of you have skill with enchanting,” Richter asked.

	“I cannot speak for anyone else, but I have some experience, my Lord. I made enchanted jewelry in the past,” Gloran replied.

	“So what do we need specifically,” Richter asked undaunted. If there was one thing that his years of gaming had taught him, it was that the right gear was crucial. Even more than training, enchanted items were a force multiplier and really could turn a person into an army of one.

	“First you need a captured soul, my Lord.”

	“Someone needs to give up their soul?!” Richter couldn’t believe what he was hearing.

	Gloran laughed, “No, my Lord. The souls of most sentient humanoids cannot be captured. For instance, none of the races in this room could be captured. All creatures have souls, however. If a spell like Soul Trap is cast prior to a creature dying, then its spirit will be captured if you have a soul stone.”

	Richter sighed, “Well then how do you get a soul stone?”

	“They are made, my Lord. It is a relatively simple process. Any stone can be made into a soul stone, even simple rocks.” Well, that’s good news, Richter thought happily. “Those soul stones would only be sufficient to catch the souls of simple animals, though, like rabbits or deer. Even the soul of a large bear could not be contained in such a low-level gem.” Well, that news is not as good, Richter thought sadly.

	“So how do we make better soul stones,” Richter asked afraid that he already knew the answer.

	“Gemstones are used sir. The higher quality of gem used, the stronger the soul that can be trapped.”

	“And I’m guessing that stronger souls make stronger enchantments?”

	“Yes, my Lord,” Gloran replied. He must have seen Richter’s crestfallen look, because he added, “Even cheaper semiprecious jewels can make soul stones strong enough to trap most basic monsters.”

	Richter nodded at the Gloran’s last statement. That was helpful information, but he was just adding up how much outfitting his people was going to cost him. This world seemed dedicated to bankrupting him. The chest of jewels that was his nest egg just didn’t seem like that much anymore. He really needed to sell those Potions of Clarity. He told Gloran he would need some soul stones made later that night, and the man assured him it wouldn’t be a problem.

	Not wanting to get bogged down in his own economic woes, he continued, “Okay so that covers the soul stones. Does anyone know the spell Soul Trap?”

	Zarr, the Earth Master mage spoke up, “Every branch of magic has a version of that spell, but it is well acknowledged that of all of the Basic Elements, Life and Death have the strongest versions.” The other casters in the room nodded.

	Richter looked around confused, “Basic Elements?”

	“The ley lines which cross under the earth are ribbons of Power, Lord Richter. There are eight different types of ley lines: Life, Death, Water, Fire, Earth, Air, Light and Dark. These are the eight Basic Elements. Each has different strengths and weaknesses,” Zarr said. “Earth, for example, is excellent for defense and construction. Dwarves have a natural affinity for Earth which is why we build such strong citadels and craft the best weapons and armor. Mountain dwarves in particular.” He said the last with a smirk and the comment was answered by some grumbling by the other races present. It all seemed in good fun though. From the back of the room someone yelled, “Gnomes rule!”

	Richter was happy that his people could smile with each other. It meant that the attack had not broken their spirits. “Alright, I will ask Sumiko to teach me the spell. So if we are able to capture a soul, what’s next?”

	A dwarf from the back of the room spoke. His beard was black but well threaded with silver and white. Despite these signs of age, he stood straight and muscles bulged from his arms, “This is all well and good for making cute baubles to look at as you sit for afternoon tea, but what you need for a strong enchanted weapon is good metal and a better smith. The iron that has been harvested here is good enough quality to make steel, perhaps even a bit of high steel. What we want though is quicksilver, cobalt, or mithril. THAT is how you make a quality weapon!”

	“How do we get access to that,” Richter asked. Analyze gave the dwarf’s name, ‘Krom.’

	“Well those damn mists of yours kept us from searching the mountains to the north. It doesn’t go underground, but we couldn’t even find the rotten entrance to the rotten tunnels! Now that your lordship has given us all immunity, we can search for veins of rarer metal. We will sell them to the village. Plus our standard search fee and finder’s commission of course.” Krom had a wide grin on his face.

	Knowing he was about to get fleeced, Richter opened his mouth, but Randolphus spoke up, “We will come to agreeable terms. I negotiated the longstanding contract between the old King of Yves and King Gromhold of the Serrated Mountains. I am well versed with the customs of dwarven negotiation. Gd’urt rikud alam b’tren!”

	The smile faded from Krom’s face. Richter realized that his chamberlain had said the last phrase in the language of the mountain dwarves. The best translation Richter could come up with was, “Never bet against a Sicilian when death is on the line!” Haha, score one for Randy! Richter was going to have to get him whatever The Land’s equivalent of a Klondike bar was!

	Sure that Randolphus would handle the finer details, Richter turned back to Krom, “Keep a lookout for any gems as well. Now let’s say that we get the soul stones and the metal. Is there anything else I need to know about the requirements?”

	“Just that the quality needs to be Average or better. You can’t just enchant any ol’ trash.”

	“Can you make Average quality weapons,” Richter asked him.

	The dwarf’s chest puffed up, “I make superb quality or better! Who do you think you are talking to?”

	Not wanting to get sidetracked by the dwarf’s ego, Richter redirected to the original topic, “So when we have all of that done, what enchantments can we make?”

	Krom’s chest lowered and his expression took on a rueful look, “I am the most advanced smith in the village. I am a journeyman in my Smithing skill and have reached apprentice level in Earth magic. I am known to make strong and durable weapons. I have also almost reached journeyman level in Enchanting. The knowledge of how to create magic weapons is jealously guarded, however, and my old master only taught me a few enchantments. I can improve damage by +1, increase durability, and I can make armor with +2 defense.” Krom stopped speaking, and shook his finger at Randolphus and Richter, “Even those enchantments won’t come cheap! They can make a real difference!”

	Damn greedy dwarves, Richter thought. “Well, how can we learn more?”

	“Only masters or adepts can pass down those enchantments without a skills book. Masters can even make new enchantments or alter existing ones. Learning enchantments is actually one of the tasks a journeyman smith must undertake in order to one day be recognized as a true master by the dwarven people. Even if your skill level gets to one hundred and you can technically be called a master, without ten enchantments to your name you will never be recognized as one by the other dwarf smiths.

	“Okay,” Richter said with some impatience, “that’s fascinating and all, but what does that have to do with us finding more enchantments to put on our weapons?”

	Hearing his tone, the surly dwarf snapped back, “Because! Only one dwarf is recognized as a Smith-Master by the Mountain Dwarves each year. Because the competition is so fierce, no journeyman would make a skill book for another, and we only trade in rare circumstances. Masters tend to stay in one place so you have to go to them. Even then you must devote years of service to pry even one enchantment from them!”

	Richter was growing frustrated. Not only was it going to cost a great deal to make magic weapons, but it seemed they would be relegated to crappy little enchantments! “Is there no other way to learn enchantments?!”

	“No,” Krom said definitively. “Well… not unless we can find a Magic Forge.” The dwarf started laughing, “and I only know of seven of those south of the Wilds. Not even you, Lord Richter, could afford to use one of those!”

	This guy was really starting to get on Richter’s nerves. First the dwarf had tried to rob him with a smile on his face, and now he was getting all prickly. “Well, how would a Magic Forge help?”

	Speaking slowly as if to a toddler Krom said, “Magic Forges can deconstruct other magic items. The item is destroyed in the process, but the Forge has a chance to learn the spell forever. The more a smith uses the forge the greater the chance he can learn the enchantment, and then make more items with that enchantment. Because of that, it costs a minimum of one hundred gold coins to use a Forge for even one day. And as I said, even then it’s not a sure thing that you will learn an enchantment.”

	“Then how do we make a Magic Forge,” Richter asked.

	It was quiet for a moment, then all of the dwarves and even some of the elves and gnomes started laughing. The laughter seemed to feed on itself and only got louder as they all saw each other having a chuckle at Richter’s expense. Shouts started to ring out,

	“Make a Magic Forge?”

	“Why don’t you make your bed first?” (Was his mom here?)

	“As if Magic Cores just fell from the sky!”

	“Gnomes rule!”

	After a minute or two the laughter died down and Krom spoke again, “You need a Magic Core to make a Magic Forge! Magic Cores are relics from the time before the gods were banished! They cost more than a king’s ransom! Hahaha! I tell you what. If you find a Magic Core, I will enchant for free!”

	Richter put an uncertain look on his face, “Well that doesn’t seem fair. You would still be getting to learn new enchantments without having to pay for them.”

	Krom laughed even louder, “True enough. Then I would pledge myself to you as I would a dwarf chief. To serve by your side in war, to make your clan my own, and to work to increase the power of the village. What do you say lads? What will we give Lord Richter to let us use his ancient relic of power?” Krom’s voice was more than mocking.

	The laughter started up again followed by shouts.

	“We will give up half our finder’s fee!”

	“Serve in the militia!”

	“Two casks of Mithagan Red Ale!”

	“Gnomes Rule!”

	Richter still couldn’t see who was saying that last bit. Almost a hundred people were now shouting what they would give if Richter could produce something as wondrous as a Magic Core. Laughs and catcalls were mixed in. Fighting a losing battle to keep a smile from his face, Richter quickly added one last point, “And you would all teach your skills freely to other villagers so we may all get stronger?”

	“Aye!” Came a shout from all in the room.

	Gotcha bitches, Richter thought with extreme satisfaction. He reached into his Bag of Holding and took out the Magic Core he had obtained during a quest. He placed the clockwork sphere on the table. Red and white light peaked through the gaps in the mechanism. The silence in the room was so profound Richter could have heard a pin drop.

	Looking at Randolphus, he asked, “Did you record all of that?”

	Randolphus smiled broadly, “Oh yes, my Lord. Negotiating pay for services should go quite well here on out in light of the promises that have just been made.”

	Richter was quite pleased with himself at getting so many to agree to reduced rates. Apparently the Universe agreed.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Trade. 0.5% bonus to buying and selling per level.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Trade. 0.5% bonus to buying and selling per level.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 5 in Trade. 0.5% bonus to buying and selling per level.

	…

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 14 in Trade. 0.5% bonus to buying and selling per level.

	You have received 2,000 bonus experience for reaching level 10 in the skill: Trade.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Trade. You can now “smell” when there is a deal to be made. You can now make trade agreements with other settlements that you have an Ally relationship with.

	Well! Started from the bottom now I’m here indeed, Richter thought seeing the cascade of windows. He dismissed each quickly as they were all basically the same. It was awesome having that bump from leveling his skills again, though. But he hadn’t taken a Potion of Clarity in the last 24 hours. Damn! He had to remember to ask Randy about the experience from skill leveling. Maybe there was a way to power level more skills… hmmm.

	It looked like he could enter into a trade agreement with the Wood Sprites now too, he realized with a smile.

	He would have kept enjoying the shocked looks on the faces of his villagers, but the silence only lasted for a few moments. Then it was pandemonium.

	“My Lord, don’t waste the Core on a Forge!”

	“We can use it to make a golem,” a gnome shouted.

	“No, no! A Creation Table!”

	“The Core can power a shield for the village!”

	“Gnomes rule!”

	“Just let me study it!”

	Richter held up his hands for quiet. At first, no one seemed to want to follow that direction, but Randolphus stood with a thunderous look on his face. He slammed both hands down on the table, and shouted, “Your Lord called for quiet!”

	The tumult died down as everyone looked at Richter expectantly. He hadn’t known there were so many uses for the Core, but his priority was arming his people right now. He also had something important to deal with.

	Turning his gaze to Krom, he rested his hand on the Magic Core, “Well Krom, what do you have to say?” All levity had left his voice. As much he needed the dwarf’s skills, he wouldn’t force someone to work for him. “I will not put the lives of my people in your hands if you do not wish to be here. If you say the word, I will release you from the promise you just made.”

	Krom stared back at him and a series of emotions that Richter couldn’t read crossed the smith’s face. He looked back and forth between the Magic Core and Richter’s face several times before speaking, “You would truly release me from the deal I just made?”

	“Yes, Krom. You need only say the word.”

	Krom started into Richter’s face for another full minute, searching for something. Then he went down on one knee and bowed his head. In a formal voice, he said, “I pledge my fealty to Lord Richter of the Mist Village. I will raise my hammer for him in war or in service, and never against him. If you maintain faith with me, I shall never break faith with you. Will you accept my pledge?”

	Richter didn’t know what he had been expecting, but it wasn’t this. He had hoped that he could maybe get a better price out the dwarf. He paused for a moment and the room was once again dead quiet. Words came almost unbidden to his lips, “Do you accept the position as Smith of the Mist Village?”

	Krom looked up, surprise evident on his features, but he didn’t hesitate, “I do.”

	Richter stepped forward and pulled the dwarf to his feet. “I accept your pledge, but I require those who serve me to stand, not kneel.”

	Krom looked him in the eye and nodded thanks.

	Your relationship with Krom has improved from friendly to loyal.

	Congratulations! You have uncovered the first Job of your Village. You have filled the position of Smith. Your village will benefit proportionally to the skill of whomever you have chosen. The level of your Smith is: Journeyman. All weapons and armor produced in your village 8% more effective.

	Richter read the prompt and smiled. It looked like this meeting would get him more than just a boosted Trade skill! “I will grant you access to the armory,” he said. “Let me know what we can use, and what can be melted down for new weapons.”

	“I will see to it, my Lord,” Krom said in a respectful voice.

	“And one more thing,” Richter said, “no need to be so formal.” Then he did what he had seen other dwarves doing with their friends. He head butted the smith. Now what normally happened is both dwarves laughed and clapped each other on their shoulders. That is what Richter fully intended to happen. What actually happened is that he felt like he had slammed his head into a boulder. Richter promptly dropped down onto his butt. A “stunned” icon floated in the corner of his village.

	Then a hand reached under his armpit and pulled him up. Laughter echoed and he heard scattered cheers. “We will make a dwarf chief out of you yet,” Krom shouted. “Isn’t that right boyos?” Shouts of “Here here,” punctuated the revelry.

	Richter found himself being led back to his chair, his head still spinning. When he sat down he said, “Okay then,” still blinking far too often. “I need to speak to Shivona, the rest of you can go. Gloran, speak to the other villagers and make a list of the enchantments that you can place on items. And Krom,” the dwarf looked at him, “make my Forge,” Richter said holding out the Magic Core.

	Krom came to take the Core with no small amount of reverence. They filed out, but not before Richter heard Krom say, “That’s why he’s my Lord. He is smart to hand off a task before he works himself to death, but just to be sure, he keeps a woman around to bring him back to life! Hahaha!”

	The only people that remained in the room were Richter, Sion, Randolphus and Shivona. Richter started stroking Alma’s scales. The dragonling gave a contented purr. “I am going to say this simply. I want you to build a kytachi vessel. Can you do it, and if so, what type of soul would you need?”

	Shivona looked at him with surprise, “That is not what I was expecting you to say.”

	“What were you expecting,” he asked.

	“Maybe some sort of joke about the motion of the ocean?”

	Richter looked at her form, curved in all the right places. Sion was laughing freely and Randolphus had given a hard cough at her words. “Not today,” Richter said with a smile. “My stomach still feels a bit queasy from all the blood that was spilled.”

	“Oh, I can understand that…,” she said, “but how does your mouth feel?”

	Sion stopped laughing and stared at her in shock. Randolphus’ cough now threatened to bring up a lung.

	“Errr, pretty much all of me is closed for business right now.”

	“Your loss,” she said with a smirk. “Now if you’re serious about making a kytachi, some monsters are better than others. Water based monsters are generally the best.”

	“Like what,” he asked. “Lochness monster? Piranaconda? Sharknado?”

	“Hmmm,” she said to Randolphus. “It’s almost like he is trying to be funny…” Looking at Richter, she said, “No sweetheart I mean like a water dancer, water elemental, or a kelpie.”

	“Okay, so how soon do you need it,” Richter asked.

	“Not until I have finished with the boat. It would be dangerous to attach a spirit to an unfinished vessel.”

	“You mentioned enspelling jewels and attaching them to hull. Would that work with the defense +2 that Krom had mentioned?”

	“I don’t think so. First of all, you can’t forge a ship. His skill with making enchanted weapons won’t translate to building an enchanted ship. Even without that, and I don’t know much about smithing, but it sounds like he changes the quality of the object he works upon. Something like that would not mix well when you are going to bind a spirit to the boat. Just trust me, Lord Richter. You don’t need to worry about the boat. If you give me five or six jewels, then I’ll handle the rest. What you need to worry about is who will sail it. One of the reasons kytachi vessels are not often made is that it takes an extremely strong will to pilot one. Ideally, someone with the Sailor profession would captain her, they get a bonus to ship related skills. Theoretically, anyone with a strong will could force the spirit into submission, but if you lose the battle…”

	“What happens,” Richter asked.

	“If you lose the battle, you run the risk of spiritual damage. You could have a piece of your soul ripped out. You could be killed. You could even be possessed.”

	“Whoa, whoa, whoa,” Richter said. “You didn’t mention anything about possession before!” Now that he was thinking of it, possession might be one of the only ways to permanently kill someone like him. “There have got to be ways to minimize the risk.”

	“There are,” she assured him. “I just have no idea what they are.” Richter felt less assured. “I told you that I can build your kytachi vessel. I never told you I could captain one. My Lord, what I recommend is you just let me build you an enchanted ship if you can spare the gems. Whoever you choose to crew the boat can cut their teeth sailing this first enchanted vessel, and improve their sailing skills. I also will fulfill a quest of mine by working on these boats. Speaking plainly, if we wait to build the kytachi, I can build you a better boat and you’ll have more experienced people to sail it.”

	“You make a good argument,” he said. “Okay, we will hold off on the kytachi right now. I need the first ship built ASAP. How quickly can you have it done?”

	“You said I could have one Mist Worker per day. Can you spare another?”

	“After the armory, building the ship is the top priority. How about four a day?”

	“More than I need, just make sure I have two at the start of each morning if you please.”

	Richter nodded, “How many gems do you need, and does it matter what type?”

	“Mid-level gems will work for this. I need five, though six would be better. I can have the ship ready in a little over two months.”

	Richter looked at her with some surprise, “You said it would take three months when I asked you a few days ago.”

	She shrugged, “Things are a bit different now.”

	She offered no further explanation, so Richter just shrugged in return. If he could get his ship faster, then he would take it. Richter pulled out the appraisal sheet Hafiz had made for him. After a quick check, he removed the gem chest from his Bag of Holding. It was what he kept his gems in. He selected three agates, two tiger eyes and one malachite. Shivona caught a glance at the wealth of gems in the small chest and gave a small gasp. Leaning in, she breathed words softly into his ear. After the first few sentences, Richter began coughing. Whatever Randy had must be catching, he thought. When she was done speaking, Shivona stood up slowly and gave him a smile full of promise, before walking out of the room.

	Sion looked at him quizzically, “Huh! I didn’t know that someone your color could blush!”





CHAPTER 14




	Randolphus, Sion, and Richter talked over a few more items. Richter resolved to include Terrod in future discussions like this. Even though the true significance of Companions was still unclear, Richter knew in his heart that they were important. He needed to spend more time with the man and figure out how he fit into this new society. He didn’t think he would be including Elora in discussions yet though, he thought with a smile. Giving birth to a new race had to be hard enough!

	Sion gave an update on his task. He told Richter that he had the components to make health potions of various strengths. The other sprite that had helped him with collecting herbs, Fudave, was an apprentice in Alchemy, and the arcane gnome that had spoken up, Beyan, was a journeyman in Alchemy. Apparently, the gnome knew several useful potion recipes including mana replenishment. It took at least day to prepare, but several mana potions would be ready by tomorrow. Sion gave him a smile and told him a few other potions would be ready as well. When Richter asked what they were, the sprite just waved off the question. Richter told Sion that he intended to leave in the morning to unlock his next power. The sprite said he would be ready.

	Sion left, and only Randolphus and Richter remained in the room. And Alma of course. She had flown to rest on a sconce set into the ceiling when Shivona had started getting naughty. The chamberlain and his liege sat together in silence. Richter was pretty sure Randy was feeling the same thing that he was, relief and satisfaction at being able to just sit and do nothing for a moment. Randy started scrawling some more of his endless notes. To Richter, it seemed the perfect time to learn about a few topics that had been confusing him.

	First, the topics of moral and loyalty. He, of course, understood the basic definitions, but it seemed like they had a specific and quantifiable meaning in The Land. He checked his village interface. Once again the sprawling forest of pulldown menus filled his vision. He chose “City Mechanics.” Sure enough there were two subtabs next to each other. Choosing Loyalty, a timeline appeared in his vision, but instead of dates it had words: Traitor, Faithless, Disloyal, Unreliable, Neutral, Dependable, Loyal, Faithful, and Unto Death. Each had a certain number assigned to it and productivity bonuses or penalties as well. Right now ‘Dependable’ was highlighted. Apparently it took +250 Loyalty Points to reach this tic on the timeline, and it offered a +25% productivity bonus. Morale showed a similar timeline, but the grades were: Rebellious, Hateful, Angry, Unhappy, Neutral, Happy, Delighted, Joyous, Party Every Night! ‘Happy’ was highlighted. The associated factors for Morale were productivity, population growth and something called fighting spirit. Apparently because his people were ‘Happy’ they had a +10% to those three elements. And if he got to Party Every Night… 50% bonus to all three, including population growth?! That’s the kind of party he could live with! He would surround himself with fine leather bound books… and make sure his room smelled of rich mahogany!

	All jokes aside, there were clear benefits to increasing both morality and loyalty. Richter snapped his fingers. That must be why the ship would be completed faster now! He made his choice.

	You have chosen the Tenet: An Honorable Ruler I. Loyalty +0.5 per day for all inhabitants.

	There were other subtabs under City Mechanics: Health, Commerce, Statistics, and that was just to name a few. Two more specifically caught his eye. One was Science. It was grayed out, however, and nothing happened when he mentally clicked on it. The second was Faith. It wasn’t only greyed out, it also had a deep irregular gouge through the word. Of course, clicking that tab also accomplished nothing. It was interesting to see it, though…

	The other thing he needed to know about was the bonus experience he received from leveling, “Randy,” he said breaking his chamberlain out his work focus.

	“Yes, my Lord?”

	“I leveled my Trade skill recently, and before that I leveled Herb Lore. I received experience for both.”

	“Yes, my Lord,” Randolphus sounded unsure as to what Richter was asking.

	“So why did I get the experience?”

	“Ahhh. I apologize for my confusion. To most people this is common knowledge. When leveling skills, you will receive a bonus every ten levels. It starts with 2,000 experience points and each level gives you an extra 2,000 for every ten levels. At level 20 you would receive 4,000 experience points and so on, until level one hundred, when you receive 20,000 experience points.”

	Richter did some mental math, plus 4, then carry the 1, so… that was another 110,000 experience points for making it to the level of master! Richter had been taking his skill leveling at a rather relaxed pace, but now that he knew it could provide so much experience… well that changed everything! Richter would have to set aside some time for skill grinding sometime soon, but not until some other things were done.

	They spoke about other sundry items. Richter asked if Randolphus had a good candidate to go on the trade mission. The chamberlain said he had found the perfect man, a human named Basil. Apparently, he was naturally gregarious and had managed a successful business for years in the Kingdom of Yves. His success had unfortunately made him a target for one of the King’s noble friends. Basil was given an ‘offer he couldn’t refuse’ to sell his business for coppers. The man certainly had an axe to grind against the current government of Yves. It made it easier for Richter to trust him.

	More importantly from Richter’s perspective, he was a long-time personal friend of Randolphus. The chamberlain personally vouched for the man’s honesty and said he could be trusted. Richter wanted Basil sent as soon as possible to rendezvous with the ship captain. He removed two hundred Potions of Clarity and set them on the table. He also placed five hundred gold on the table for any expenses that might arise.

	Randolphus protested the sum was too big, but Richter disagreed. If he was going to trust Basil, then he was going to trust him. Richter didn’t believe in half measures. Randolphus nodded his head saying he was honored for the faith he was being shown. Richter waved it away, uncomfortable with the older man getting emotional. He focused on what he needed done. Richter had a list of things he wanted to be brought back from Leaf’s Crossing. It included another two months of food rations, more vials, paper and a dozen other little items. Richter instructed Randolphus to poll the villagers and sprites to see if there was anything specific that they needed. He promised that he would take care of it.

	That just left one unfortunate item to discuss, “Have the arrangements of the funeral been made?”

	“Yes, my Lord. I have arranged for the bodies to be taken up to the meadow. I was actually going to suggest that we leave now.”

	Richter nodded and stood up. Together, the two men walked to put their fellow villagers to rest. The funeral went smoothly. There were tears to go around, but the villagers pulled together in support. Hisako and the other sprites were present as well. Sumiko had cast a spell on the fallen sprites. It left their bodies wrapped in golden threads like a mummy. Richter was told that it would halt decay until they could be returned home to be buried in the custom of the wood sprites. The Hearth Mother recited a small speech in the language of her people at the end of the ceremony.

	No one felt like saying much after that. They all went in separate directions to retire for the night. More than a few walked to the Quickening to sleep under its canopy. Richter couldn’t blame them. The sense of wellbeing that exuded from the tree was palpable.

	Richter walked up to the Hearth Mother. She was surrounded by Yoshi, Sion and the other sprites, “I am leaving tomorrow morning. I need to finish my quest,” he said.

	“Will my son be accompanying you,” she asked. Richter looked at Sion, who seemed confused by the question as well.

	“Yes,” Richter replied. “Do you not want him to?”

	“I am not saying that, but I well remember how dangerous my own quests to unlock my powers were. My son must follow his own path, and it will be as the Forest wills. I have a request, however.”

	“Anything,” he said immediately.

	“I would like you to take Yoshi with you.”

	Both Richter and Yoshi began to argue against that at once, but she raised a hand to stop them. “I am quite safe here behind the enchantments now, and I have recovered fully from the battle. We will be working and fighting together quite a bit in the future. It will be to our advantage if two peoples are familiar with each other’s weakness and strengths. There is no better way to accomplish this than working together to complete a quest.”

	Yoshi waited for her to finish speaking, then immediately said, “I cannot leave you alone Hearth Mother. These mists are not full proof as you well know! Anything-”

	“Enough Yoshi,” she said sharply. She seemed to immediately regret her tone because then her voice softened, “I know you worry for me, but we must all take chances in the coming days. There have been more incursions into the Forest by those with evil in their hearts than any time in recent memory. Do not forget, if not for the efforts of Sion and Lord Richter, where we now stand could have been the heart of a goblin stronghold. Instead,” she sighed and looked at the Quickening with satisfaction, “we are sitting in the presence of a celestial tree. Most importantly, the other half of our souls has been returned to us. Instead of new enemies, we have new friends.” She patted Richter on the shoulder with a smile.

	She looked at Yoshi again, “Please be ready to leave with Lord Richter in the morning. Help him accomplish his quest.”

	The sword adept bent his head in acquiescence, “As you wish, Hearth Mother.”

	“Daniella, will you go as well? This quest could benefit from someone with brains,” Hisako said with a wry smile.

	“Of course, Hearth Mother,” the cute sprite said with a smile of her own. Sion gave a faint groan.

	“Then we leave in the morning,” Richter said. “Sion, finish preparing the potions. Yoshi, let’s do some sword practice.”

	The look on the sword adept’s face was almost worth the pain that followed.

	Yoshi decided that this time, practice would consist of multiple sparring sessions. Richter first sparred Sion, both of them holding stout sticks. The sprite soundly trounced him up and down the meadow. His Companion was, of course, trash talking the entire time.

	Unexpectedly, Yoshi had saved him by saying that Sion needed to work on his own forms and they faced off against each other. It was Richter’s turn to be amused as Sion was whacked in the backside more than once. Then entered Daniella. With a cheery smile she asked if Richter would like to spar. He made a mental promise not to hurt the small woman. He soon found out that his promise wasn’t necessary because apparently she had already resolved to beat him like he owed her money.

	It wasn’t the most humbling experience in two lives to be beaten soundly by a three and a half foot tall woman, but it was up there! She moved like a ghost. Her two blade style was strongly reminiscent of the sword adept’s fight with the bugbear raider, leaving no doubt who had trained her. He face planted at least five times! At one point he was pretty sure he shouted at her, ‘Stop laughing at me!’ That may have been a hallucination, though. Richter was relieved when she finally stepped back and thanked him for the exercise. That relief only lasted until he saw the other sprites standing in a line, patiently waiting for their turn to ‘spar’ with the Master of the Mist Village.

	Richter was nearing the end of his patience as he sparred with the last sprite in line. Yoshi had been watching his practice silently. When he started his fight with the last sprite, however, he started ordering Richter to use certain forms. The names came faster and faster, and Richter’s training allowed him to follow. Before he knew it, he was standing over his sparring partner with his stick pointing at the sprites chest. A cheer rose up from the other warriors and even his vanquished ‘foe’ smiled ruefully before excepting Richter’s help to stand again. They shook hands and parted with no animosity. Yoshi just walked up and said, “That was less horrible.” Then he walked off.

	Richter’s mouth dropped open in shock. He spread his arms wide and looked around as if to say, ‘Yeah boyyyyy!’ Sion just shook his head and turned away with a laugh. Daniella followed close behind him, already restarting her constant monologue on the sprite’s many faults and how he could improve if only he would listen.

	Laughing quietly as his friend’s stoic demeanor, Richter walked over to Hisako. He made a quick request to which she readily agreed. Thanking her, he decided to keep moving before the heat left his muscles. Prior training sessions had taught him that as soon as he slowed, his muscles would cool down, and then the aches would begin. He collected his map from the sprites, and then began to jog down to the village. While he was moving he saw a minimized unread prompt, he had advanced his sword skill by a level! Pleased with his progression, he made his way down to the village. The sun was going down and he wanted to speak with Sumiko and Gloran quickly before passing out. Luckily, Futen showed up while he was jogging, and Richter sent him to gather the high elf and the Life master to await him at the Great Seal.

	When he got closer to the soon to be site of the rebuilt smithy, he heard raised voices and arguing. Sighing to himself, he jogged over. Krom and four other dwarves were shouting at each other. Every word uttered got louder and brought the arguers closer together. Anyone could see this was about to come to blows. In fact, judging by the lack of other people around, Richter was the only dummy running towards this conflict.

	“Whoa! What’s with all hubbub bub?” The dwarves stopped fighting and looked at him confused. Richter sighed. Damn colloquialisms. He tried again, “Why for art thou fighting?”

	Krom immediately started talking again. Why the hell did that work, Richter thought. “These short sighted fools want to just shove the Core into any ol’ anvil!”

	Richter just looked at him. When the dwarves started arguing again, in dwarvish this time, Richter held up his hand again, “Hey! Somebody tell me what the problem is.” He pointed randomly at one of the dwarves, “You, what’s the argument about?”

	“Well your lordship, the Core can be combined with any anvil to make a Magic Forge. But it will combine with the highest quality metal it is touching and change the entire anvil into that metal. Thereafter, any weapons or armor made will have special traits based on the metal the Forge is made out of.”

	Richter had to take a second to process that, “So you are saying that if you put gold next to the Magic Core, then you could turn an entire anvil into gold?”

	“Yes, my Lord, but gold would make a horrible anvil,” one of the dwarves responded.

	This guy didn’t get it. “And we can do this over and over,” he asked. Richter was already dreaming of a factory churning out gold anvils by the dozens. He was going to invent both the car and grey poupon, just so he could drive around handing it out!

	“The Core can be taken out of the Magic Forge, but the anvil would return to its former metal.”

	Richter sighed, he guessed that would have been too easy.

	“We would also lose any levels or spells that the Forge had learned,” the dwarf continued.

	“Yes,” Krom spat, “and that’s why we need to do this right. The material that is used in the anvil will convey certain properties to the weapons we make! Right now we only have common metals, and these blockheads want to waste a MAGIC CORE when we don’t have anything stronger than high steel! Even orichalum would be a better choice, but I would sooner make love to ant hill in winter than use the metal of those accursed bastards!”

	“Wait,” Richter said raising a hand to hold off any more of Krom’s tirade, “what do you mean levels. The Forge could get stronger?”

	Another dwarf spoke up, “That is the other reason Magic Forges are so valued. They will absorb the skill of those who work upon them. Each weapon that is made upon them and each weapon that is deconstructed on it will add to the experience of the Forge. When it has enough experience it will level,” the dwarf smiled, “and that is when the really amazing things start to happen. You see, my Lord-”

	Richter held up his hand for the umpteenth time. He was too tired to get a lesson in smithing right now. He turned back to Krom, “What metals are there, and which one should we use?”

	Krom’s face lost much of its animosity as he started thinking of a topic near and dear to his heart, “Well iron and steel of course. Bronze or its base metal copper is also possible, but only a blockhead or back woods tribesman would make weapons out of bronze these days. High steel can be made by combining molten steel and xanthite. Glass is stronger, but only those crazy islanders know how to forge it. Moonstone will make you a nice light armor. Quicksilver will give you something even better, though whoever could find enough quantities to make even a decent dagger is someone I would like to meet. Cobalt will make you a fine piece of medium or heavy armor, and ebony will protect you from almost anything, though you will need to be as strong as a bear and probably hung like one to if you want to move around in it. My pappy used to talk about red duranium, but I’ve only seen it once. Of course, mithril is the dream of every smith, but you might as well wish for a great dragon’s scales or adamant while you are at it.”

	Richter was shocked that such a long winded and thoughtful discourse had come from the hot-tempered dwarf. It was clear that there was more to Krom than just the barroom brawler persona that the smith initially exuded. Krom wasn’t done, though.

	“So if I had my wish, it would be duranium or ebony. I suppose in a pinch, quicksilver or moonstone would do, though. That’s why,” Krom’s voice regained its previous levels of derision and annoyance, “I’ll not hear about wasting the Core on high steel!”

	From what Richter had heard, he agreed with his new vassal. Even though he was eager to have the Forge made and to start constructing weapons, he had always been a measure twice and cut once kind of guy. (Previous girlfriends might point out that certain Ikea desks or tables had been left a bit wobbly because he had refused to read the directions first, but that’s not the point!) Richter had a question to ask before he made his decision.

	“How much metal will we need?”

	Krom answered, “Well I have never done this before. The only information we have is based on fables the oldsters would tell us, but I remember is my mam telling me a story about Frederico the Axesmith.”

	“Holding one globe of silver mithril,

and one sphere of red and white,

he brought the two brother orbs together,

and unleashed his hammer’s might.

The Magic Forge was created,

to manifest the Axesmith’s will,

he swore to forge to save his people,

and never just to kill.

	Educational dialogue and now poetry? Richter smiled at seeing the softer side of the cantankerous dwarf. “So it needs to be the same size as the Core then,” he asked. The clockwork sphere was about the size of a large grapefruit.

	“We think so, my Lord. The problem is even if you could find someone selling that much precious metal, an ingot of pure quicksilver would cost near two gold coins. Ebony at least five times as much. Also, to be completely honest, the Kingdom of Yves regulates the purchase of higher level metals. All known mines that produce them are either owned by the Kingdom, the nobles, or one of the mining guilds that wouldn’t risk breaking the law just to sell to us. Some could be bought on the black market, but you would need a high skill level tradesman just to find one.”

	Metal costs that much, Richter thought incredulously. He supposed it made sense. In medieval times on Earth, it was only the upper crust that could afford to wear armor. A knight clad in full plate was literally wearing a fortune. The kingdom’s stanglehold on metal also meant only their soldiers would have access to the best gear.

	One of the other dwarves piped in loudly, “That is why we should not wait around for something that we will probably never find!”

	“Quit flapping your sausage wrappers,” Krom shouted back. Turning back to Richter, he asked in a respectful tone, “Can you get us a high quality metal, my Lord?”

	You have been offered a Quest: The Right Tool for the Job. Your smiths are arguing over which base metal to use when making the Magic Forge. You have been put on the spot to solve the problem for the fractious dwarves. Weapons and armor made on the forge will have special properties based on the type of metal that is used. The benefit of gaining a better forge must be weighed against the difficulty of finding a higher metal and delaying the production of arms to defend your village in a dangerous world. Failing this quest will lower the regard the smiths have for you. Reward: A Magic Forge that gives better traits. Do you accept? Yes or No?

	Richter thought about it for a moment, and ultimately based his decision on the boon of the Quickening. The level 2 bonus provided a 25% greater chance of finding rare resources. There was a real chance that they could find a high-quality metal in the surrounding lands. Richter knew he would always kick himself if he just took the easy path that was right in front of him, to get a quick result. If he only applied himself, he could get something so much better. It was the same reason he never paid for sex. It wasn’t really so much about being moral, as it was about believing in himself… and having good fiscal sense.

	“I agree with Krom. There is a good chance that we might find what we need around here. Search the iron mine. We might discover a previously unseen vein of precious metal. Also, carefully go through the armory Krom. There might be weapons made of what we need. If we don’t find anything after a time, we will reach out to our trader friend in Yves and see if he can help.” Richter quailed at thinking about how much the tubby, but shrewd, trader Hafiz would charge. It didn’t’ matter. The Magic Forge was worth investing it. It had to be invested in.

	The dwarves seemed comfortable with that decision, and they walked off still good-naturedly grumbling amongst themselves. Richter stared after them. Now he was getting quests from his own villagers? That possibility hadn’t really occurred to him before. In some ways, he had just viewed the village and the people now living here as macro extensions of himself, like an arm or a leg. Even though he knew that this wasn’t a game, his thinking had unknowingly shifted back to those thought patterns. He supposed it would be good to remember that each new member of his community was an individual, real and distinct.

	Richter resumed his jog over to where everyone had gathered to eat. A large bonfire had been made from the wooden remnants of the longhouse, and the villagers circled it. The overall demeanor was not joyous, but neither was it depressed. The people ate and spoke quietly. Richter was pleased that he saw a few smiles here and there. He was pleasantly met by his people who made room for him to sit. He begged off, saying there was no rest for the wicked, which earned a few good-natured laughs. He piled some food on a wooden plate and made his way up to the Great Seal.

	Sumiko and Gloran were sitting in a small room that had also had a table set into it. They seemed to be laughing about something, but both rose quickly at Richter’s approach. He waved them back down, futilely tell them again that things like that weren’t necessary, and then came to the reason he asked to see them. Sumiko readily agreed to teach him the spell Soul Trap.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Soul Trap! Binds the soul of the target to this plane, preventing passage to the beyond at the time of death. They will instead be pulled into any nearby empty soul stone you possess of appropriate size. This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost: 30 mana. Duration: 2 minutes. Range 10 feet. Cast time: 1 second. Cool down: N/A.

	Richter was thankful for the new spell, but the short duration and range were not ideal. Sumiko told him that there were other spells like Soul Trap with increased stats, but his level in Life Magic was still too low to learn them. She further told him that the basic Soul Trap spell only lasted sixty seconds if learned in another school of magic besides Life and Death. Richter thanked her again and spoke to Gloran.

	The high elf had already prepared several dozen low level soul stones using pieces of the marbled quartz he had found near the cliffs. Apparently it served as a better template than he had thought it would. Gloran explained that there were multiple levels of soul stones: Weak, Basic, Common, Higher, Special, Resplendant, and Absolute. The marbled quartz had made ‘basic’ soul stones when he had only been expecting ‘weak’. Each level captured higher level souls. Gloran couldn’t give him a specific breakdown of which monsters went into which category, but he did tell him that ‘resplendent’ level stones were required to capture high level angels or demons, and ‘absolute’ could capture anything.

	When Richter asked if an absolute gem could capture a human or elf, Sumiko’s face tightened. She said in a scolding tone that only the most perverted magic could be used to make a gem like that. Richter took the rebuke easily, but he still thought about it. Call him cold, but he knew that at some point he would face other Chaos Seeds. If he needed to put one down, Richter wanted him to stay down.

	Richter took the basic soul stones from Gloran and looked at them. None were overly large, and Richter could fit several in one hand. He had expected them to look like the original stones they were created from, but none resembled the white stone of the cliffs. Each was the color of amber and formed a perfect six sided gem. Holding them made his hand tingle. Richter pulled some gems from his Bag that he had put aside earlier. He had taken Shivona’s reaction to heart, and wouldn’t be flashing the contents of his whole chest again… not that he expected Gloran to start whispering sweet nothings into his ear and make a move, but better safe than sore. He put several jaspers, a turquoise, a topaz, and a few opals on the table. He also placed one ruby, sapphire, emerald and diamond on the table with the other gems. “What can you make these into?”

	Gloran’s eyes had widened at seeing so much wealth so casually strewn in front of him, “Are you sure that you want to use all of these, my Lord?”

	“Wealth should serve a purpose,” Richter told him. “The primary purpose of my wealth is to make us safer and stronger. So what can you do with the gems?”

	Gloran pushed the diamond, emerald and ruby back towards Richter, “My old master told me that these can be turned into resplendent soul stones, but my skill level in enchanting is too low to make them. I can turn the sapphire into a special soul stone, and the other gems into common or higher level stones.”

	“Can you have it done by the morning,” Richter asked.

	“I can do it now, my Lord. It is a simple spell of Light magic. It just also has the requirement of possessing the enchanting skill.” Gloran placed his hands over the gems and murmured a few words. A green glow shone down from his palms, and the image of each gem wavered, like air over a hot desert. Each gem grew a bit larger and when the glow vanished, more amber jewels sat in their place. Gloran identified the largest as the special stone, the slightly smaller gems were higher level soul stones and the common gems were smaller still. Easy enough to figure out which was which.

	“A soul will go into the smallest appropriate soul stone available. Be careful not to run out of low-level gems or a weak soul will use up a valuable higher level gem,” Gloran cautioned. Richter asked if he could turn more quartz into soul stones by the morning. The enchanter bowed his head in agreement.

	Richter had one more question, “I want you to look at something else.” He reached into his Bag and pulled out the depleted Wand of Dark Bolts. He placed it in front of Gloran, and said, “I found this on one of the attackers. It doesn’t have any charges left, can you fix that?”

	Gloran picked up the wand, examining it, “The procedure to recharge the wand is fairly simple. Just place a filled soul stone next to it, and will the wand to be replenished. This wand, though, is not completely empty, my Lord.”

	Richter frowned and took the wand back from the enchanter. When he examined it, he saw that Gloran was right.

	You have found: Wand of Dark Bolts. Attack 4-6. Durability 17/17. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.2 kg. Casts spell Dark Bolts. Charge 2/50.

	“I don’t understand,” Richter said. “I was sure that it had zero charges when I examined it earlier.”

	Gloran nodded in understanding, “The enchantment that made this wand was a ‘charged’ enchantment, my Lord. That means that unlike your armor which gives a constant bonus, the wand has a limited number of uses. After that, it just becomes a stick with a weak attack. The charges can be restored by using filled soul stones as we discussed, but it will also slowly recharge over time.”

	“So if I just wait, then my enchanted items will replenish?” Gloran nodded again but warned that it could take a long, long time.

	Richter thanked them and said goodnight. His muscles had started locking up from his sparring session, and he wanted nothing more than to fall asleep.





CHAPTER 15




	Richter’s dreams were full of shouts of sword forms, and the pain of Yoshi correcting him when he made a mistake:

	‘Forest Wind! No, left leg back!’

	Crack!

	 ‘Argh, you bastard!’

	‘Cat Swatting at Mouse. I told you to find your center!’

	Crack!

	‘Son, of, a, Bitch!’

	Richter blinked the dreams away, waking in the barracks. He thanked god for the improved healing of The Land. When he had finally laid down for the night, his body was wracked with pain from the numerous bruises he had suffered while sparring. This morning though, he barely felt stiff. The villagers filled the other bunks, most still sleeping. A few spoke softly to one another, but no one had left their beds yet. At the start of the tunnel leading outside, there were three large bundles and a cloth bag. Checking the bundles, he saw the arrows he had asked Hisako to create. The sprite arrows were still the best projectiles he had encountered since coming to The Land with their +1 to damage and accuracy. The bag was full of basic soul stones. He slid the three bundles of arrows and poured the soul stones into his Bag of Holding, and then walked outside and greeted the day.

	Alma had swooped down from the arches above the Great Seal and settled on his shoulders in what was becoming her customary perch. The darkness of night had just fled, and the clouds above were lit with peach and orange hues. The forest was waking up around the village, and distant animal calls could be heard. He had always enjoyed the stillness of mornings. He just stood there with his familiar and watched the sky lighten over the tree tops.

	After a time, he saw three figures walking from the meadow north of the village, and the forms resolved into Sion, Yoshi and Daniella. It was time to go. Richter was wondering how to find Futen when the remnant floated along.

	“How do you always seem to appear when I want you,” Richter asked.

	“Because you will it, my Lord. I can sense your desire.”

	Well that’s not at all creepy, Richter thought, but still, good to know.

	“Take us to the quest site,” he said.

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	Alma rose into the air as the four adventurers started following the remnant out of the village. They went east following the foothills of the mountain above. The path was initially the same as that which Richter had taken to unlock his first power, but after an hour, Futen began to move in a more southeasterly direction. They walked in relative silence. One of the things that Richter shared with the sprites was an appreciation of nature and its beauty. After fighting a pitched battle barely a day ago, the forest’s sounds and scents were a form of spiritual healing.

	Sion handed out the potions he had been able to make. Everyone got two healing potions. He gave Richter three restore mana potions, keeping two for himself. Everyone also got a restore stamina potion. The potions were all classified as minor, restoring a base 43.6 points over 6 seconds. Sion explained that the potion had a base healing of 40, but the bonus in his Alchemy skill made his potion 1.5% more effective per level.

	That made Richter wonder about the bonus from his Herb Lore skill. Herbs were supposed to be 3% more effective per level, so he should get a 114% bump now. He pulled a sprig of forest sage, one of the common healing herbs that grew in this region of the forest, out of his Bag.

	Forest sage: Ingesting this will restore 21.4 health points over 30 seconds. You also get the feeling that this is a component of cure poison potions and will make a savory dish to boost stamina.

	Still not as good as potions, Richter thought, but a definite improvement. The restoration potions were all useful, but not what Sion was excited about. He handed over two more to Richter.

	You have received: Potion of Bottled Fire. When smashed, this potion will create a 5x5 foot circle of intense flame. Anyone inside the AoE will suffer thirty health damage per second. Duration: 20 seconds.

	You have received: Bottle of Pure Light. Shake potion vigorously to activate. Will emit an intense light that drives back creatures of negative alignment. Activation will render potion inert. Duration: 10 minutes.

	Richter congratulated Sion profusely. The sprite looked embarrassed for the first time Richter had ever seen, but was clearly pleased as well. He warned Richter that he wouldn’t be able to make other high-level potions unless they found more crystal. Richter just looked at him in confusion, and Sion explained that powered crystal was an important resource in making magical equipment and arms. Richter shook his head. It meant just one more thing that he would have to take care of when they got back. He would have to ask Randolphus about it. How was he supposed to remember all of these things? Just then, Futen caught his eye, though.

	“Futen, remind me to ask Randy about finding more crystal when we get back to the village.”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	Ha! I may not be Master Chief, but I do have my own Cortana, he thought.

	Alma glided above them, often flying off to hunt squirrels or other small animals. The dragonling never seemed to get enough to eat. She would then come back to circle above their heads or fly down to perch on Ricther’s shoulders. At least the familiar was fastidiously clean, Richter thought, happy that he wasn’t getting bloody bits all over him. He was walking along letting his mind drift when he noticed a change in an icon at the corner of his vision. The black dragon indicating Alma had a small gold cross affixed to it. He focused on it and her status window popped up.

	 		 			 Name: Alma

Level: 3, 78%

Health: 130 Mana: 130 Stamina: 130

(Unused level points: 2)

Abilities:

Psi Bond – Lvl 1, points until next level: 1

Psi Blast – Lvl 1, points until next level: 1

Brain Drain – Lvl 1, points until next level: 1

Can use:

Air Magic

Resistances:

Mental: 100%

Air: 50%

Race: Psi Dragonling





	The screen was different from his own status page. For one thing, it was lacking all of the characteristic points that were on his or Sion’s pages. It also looked like he could invest in his familiar’s abilities. The question was, which ability to invest the points into? He thought about each choice.

	The Psi Bond was already useful in that it let him speak with Alma. Who knew what further benefits there could be to deepening the bond? The value of the Psi Blast was obvious as well. During the attack by the bugbears, Alma had been able to break up their lines of defense. The battle could have gone very differently if not for her.

	Richter had always been one to play the long game, though. When he was gaming in head to head matches, while other players skirmished and scavenged for as much territory as possible as quickly as possible, he had always built up a solid and defensible base. From there he would strategically increase his holdings while keeping his defenses intact. The ability that gave him the best chance of a long-term yield would be Brain Drain. Even though he didn’t know exactly what would happen when the ability increased, the extra experience would make leveling a lot easier.

	He allocated one point to Brain Drain.

	You have chosen to increase your familiar’s ability: Brain Drain to level 2. Successful kills will now give 2% of total experience to both you and your familiar. Drain occurs faster. Stun can occur on enemies level 6 and below.

	Richter had been right, this was going to come in handy, he thought with a smile. The next level up for Brain Drain would require two points. So he left one point unused. He also chose to be notified by prompt of any increase in his familiar’s level in the future.

	They traveled until about midday and then Futen stopped. Yoshi and the other sprites stopped walking before Richter who had been lost in his own thoughts. He bumped into a tree before he noticed that no one else was moving. When he looked around though, he didn’t see anything except more trees and some ivy-covered rocks.

	“So where are we going now,” Richter asked.

	“We are here, my Lord, the entrance is hidden behind the rock in front of you.”

	Richter and Sion walked up to the vine-covered rock they had stopped by. He started pulling at the thick vines. The strength of his new body was enough to pull them off easily. Yoshi and Daniella joined them. Richter used his dagger to cut through thicker vines and roots. Nothing was seen except for bare grey stone until Daniella called him over. A small circle of clear glass had been set into the rock. Smiling Richter raised his left wrist willing his Mark to show. Then he thought about how he wanted the entrance to open, just as Yoshi shouted, “Wait!”

	That was the last thing Richter heard before the ground dropped out from under their feet and they plummeted down into darkness.





CHAPTER 16




	Richter came to with a knot on the back of his head and a throbbing headache. The only light was from the hole thirty feet above them and from Futen’s soft white glow. It was just enough to illuminate Yoshi’s angry face.

	“Stupid gyoti!”

	Richter looked over at him, “You kiss your Hearth Mother with that mouth?” Yoshi just started pacing and muttering under his breath. ‘Gyoti’ was sprite speak for irritating fool. Sion had called him that a time or two. “Is everyone okay?”

	Daniella spoke up saying she was fine. Sion groaned and then questioned Richter’s parentage. He took that to mean that his Companion was fine. Yoshi’s pacing back and forth was coupled with a quiet monologue that had a fair amount of cursing. At the very least, it reassured Richter that the sword adept had avoided serious damage as well. Richter had lost eighteen points of health, but it could have been a lot worse. Where was Alma?

	A gust of air right in his face answered that question. *Dumb*, she thought at him. He couldn’t really disagree with her statement.

	Yoshi turned and verbalized his ire directly to Richter again, “You don’t just push buttons and activate magical locks. They can do anything! Do you realize there could have been spikes at the bottom of this pit?”

	Richter nodded to show he had heard and then apologized. Yoshi just repeated, “Gyoti,” and then started muttering and pacing again. Richter looked around. A new prompt stated:

	You have found: Timeworn Dungeon

	“Futen, give us some more light.”

	The grey orb increased its inner light until it was easy to see the details of their new surroundings. The prompt had said ‘timeworn.’ That meant the dungeon they were facing was anywhere between 1,000 and 10,000 years old. This was not going to be easy.

	They hadn’t just fallen into a sinkhole; they had dropped into an antechamber of some sort. The floor was made of square blocks of brown stone. The walls were made of the same material, but the blocks were more rectangular. The surface of each was rough like sandpaper, and the stone had a porous appearance. Crumbling mortar filled the cracks between the blocks, leaving all surfaces pockmarked with holes. Along one wall was a doorway.

	The double doors and the doorframe were made of black iron, and were almost completely corroded through in spots. Despite that, the door was solid and rang loudly when Richter rapped it with his fist. This of course earned him another glare from Yoshi, which he ignored. When he started examining the clear circle set in the center of the left door though, Yoshi half drew one of his swords. Richter decided there were other things to examine in the room.

	Sion was looking at the wall opposite the door. Loose rocks were strewn around on the ground and a series of protruding bricks could be seen in a rising line along the wall. They almost looked like… stairs. Richter realized with a drop in his stomach that long ago a staircase had extended out of the wall. All that was left now though was the rubble on the ground. From the resigned look on Sion’s face, he had come to the same conclusion.

	“We won’t be leaving this way,” Sion said.

	They all just looked at each other. Richter pointed at the door, “We need to go forward then.”

	“No,” Yoshi said sharply. “We are in this hole because you acted rashly. After the attack on your village, I would have thought you had learned your lesson.” Richter opened up his mouth to angrily retort, but the truth of Yoshi’s words and the guilt from his latest mistake combined to keep him silent. Yoshi continued, “There are cracks in the walls. With the climbing boost in our armor, we can reach the top.”

	Richter looked at the walls doubtfully. He had seen Sion scamper up a tree like a squirrel, but he had yet to test the climbing properties of his own enhanced armor. He was also lugging a lot more weight around than the three and a half foot tall sprites, and even more then Yoshi with his half-human frame.

	“We are here to beat this dungeon,” Richter said. “We can’t turn back at the first little bump in the road.”

	“I am not saying we give up,” Yoshi said. I am saying that we get to a safe place, ideally outside and thirty feet above our current position. Then we can approach this quest from a position of strength. At the very least, we can tie off a rope and climb back down. Then we would have a ready escape if we needed it.”

	Richter was about to concede the point when Daniella shouted and pointed behind Yoshi. Faster than Richter could follow, the sprite had one of his swords out and slashed downward. The creature that had jumped at him from one of the holes in the wall fell in two pieces. Yoshi leaned over to look at it and called out, “More light.”

	Futen was in another corner in the room and did not move. Sighing Richter said, “For the duration of this mission, do as they say, Futen.” Richter didn’t wait for the remnant, though, and cast Simple Light. A white ball of light appeared about his head.

	The insect, because it was clearly somewhere along that particular branch of the genetic tree, was about one-foot long. The black carapace reminded Richter of a cockroach, but it was split into three distinct segments. The mouth was framed by serrated pincers and sharp teeth could be seen lining its jaws. It had six thin legs, and its blood was green. The fluid steamed slightly where it dripped out along with white viscera. Yoshi swore as soon as he saw it.

	“Open the door!” The sword adept had drawn both blades. Once Sion and Daniella saw the bisected insect, they cursed as well and nocked arrows.

	“Why,” Richter asked. “What’s going on?”

	“Open the door!”

	“What’s the problem,” Richter asked confused. This bug thing had been easy to kill.

	“They are coming! Listen!”

	All Richter heard was a low buzz. It was getting louder, though, and pretty quickly… and it didn’t sound like a buzz anymore. It sounded like… scratching… like maybe the scratching of countless sharp legs on stone…

	Richter ran over to the door and held his Mark to the glass circle willing the portal open. The doors started opening inward, but then they ground to a halt. A squealing of gears created a head splitting racket. The horrible noise had to compete with the skittering and scratching sounds that were now horrifyingly loud. Then the holes in the wall exploded with the bodies of hundreds of the foot-long bugs. The squeezed through the small spaces like roaches through a small crack in the floor. They looked exactly the same as the last one, and they were swarming towards Richter and his comrades!

	Richter threw his shoulders against the doors trying to get them open another few inches. It barely budged. Sion and Daniella were firing imbued arrows at the high speed of one per second, but it was like trying to stop a flood by throwing rocks at it. Yoshi stood in front of them ready to strike any that got too close. Alma helped by sending psychic pulses into the swarm, but the damned things jumped! She was having to weave in the air to avoid being brought down and torn apart. Richter threw his shoulder against the door again. It moved a bit but not enough! The gears were rusted shut. If only he could oil them, or g-!

	Quickly, Richter cast Grease, not on floor but on the wall that held the door. He wasn’t even sure he could cast the spell vertically, but thankfully the familiar brown gravy colored slickness coated the wall and the hinges. Richter slammed his shoulder into the door again and felt it give a little. Another shove and it flew open, making him sprawl on the floor of the tunnel beyond. The loud boom of the door against the inside of wall, coupled with the impacts of the sprites imbued arrows in a confined space, robbed Richter of all of his hearing.

	The sprites had rushed in after him, still firing back into the antechamber. Richter looked up confused, his bell rung from hitting his head on the ground. Yoshi shouted at him, but it sounded like a far-off sound heard while under water. The sword adept spoke again moving his mouth in an exaggerated fashion so Richter could read his lips. He still couldn’t get what Yoshi was saying. All of a sudden the sound came back like someone had unplugged his ears.

	“DOOR,” Yoshi shouted for a third time.

	Richter stumbled to his feet and put his back to the door trying to shove it closed. He was wondering why they hadn’t all been eaten by now, and saw that there were three factors contributing to their continued survival. One, Sion was holding a vial that had bright white light was coming out of. It was forcing the insects back. The ones in back kept surging forward over their hesitant fellows to in turn be driven back by the light themselves. Two, Daniella’s was still firing imbued arrows into the swarm of bugs. Each strike momentarily cleared a section of the antechamber floor, but it would immediately be filled again with more of the giant insects. Three, the attention of the bugs was divided between trying to kill the party of adventures… and eating their own wounded. As Richter tried to yank the door closed, he had one thought on his mind. He really hoped he had been down on the ground less than thirty seconds. That was the duration of Grease, and if the spell ran out… well… then they were all about to become termite shit.

	Both Yoshi and Richter strained against the door to no avail for several seconds, but once again, when it started moving, it slammed shut quickly. Several bugs were crushed between the doors and others were left on the same side as Richter and the others. They were saved from the majority of the ravaging horde of insects now locked outside in the antechamber, at least momentarily. The sprites immediately started dispatching any of the giant roaches locked on this side of the door. Before all the bugs killed, Richter Analyzed one.

	Esurient Beetle. Lvl 2. Health 40. Mana 0. Stamina 50. Disposition: N/A. Esurient Beetles are a plague upon The Land. Also known as hell bugs, eaters, or ‘the scourge’, these voracious creatures perform only two actions, eating and reproducing. Highly territorial and aggressive, every sentient species no matter the alignment hates these creatures, and will kill them on sight. Entire regions have been lost to these swarms of esurient beetles. Fortunately, their queen has a short lifespan of one year, after which that particular nest will not resurge for a century. Unfortunately, that one year is enough to turn forests into wastelands.

	God! If those things had been able to bear any of them to the ground, or Alma… Alma!

	*Alma, where are you?*

	*Here*, she thought to him soothingly. He looked up, and saw her clinging to an empty torch bracket set into the side of the tunnel. He exhaled in relief.

	There were only a few eaters left on their side of the door, Yoshi having dispatched the rest. A thought occurred to Richter. “Wait,” he called out. The sprites pulled back from the five insects remaining insects.

	“What,” Yoshi said irritated. The bugs were clustered in a corner gnashing their serrated teeth in anger, but not willing to rush the dangerous sprites.

	*Stun them*, Richter thought.

	Alma swooped to the corner where the bugs were and let loose a psi blast. The bugs fell over in a stupor. It appeared her attack worked well on the simple creatures. Thank Abrams and Whedon for small favors.

	“Disable them, but don’t kill them if you can help it,” he said to the sprites. It was a relatively simple matter for them to cut the eaters’ legs off while they were disabled. By the time the bugs could respond, their mobility was gone. Richter consumed a Potion of Clarity, and then looked up at Alma. Curious what would happen he offered her a Potion of Clarity as well. She took the end of the vial in her mouth, and then put her head back letting the potion slide down her throat. Richter gave a vicious smile and then said, “Drain them.”

	The dragonling let loose an excited cry and pounced on the first eater. Richter cast Soul Trap on each in turn. She took less than a minute before moving on to the next. As she finished each, a ribbon of multicolored light flew into his Bag of Holding. While he watched her kill the beetles, Richter re-enabled his prompts showing experience from kills. He had disabled it soon after coming to The Land because it was too distracting. With each kill, though, his experience went up by 75-90 depending on the beetle’s level not including the 25% boost that the Potion of Clarity gave. He also received a second prompt because of his familiar’s Brain Drain ability. Depending on the level of eaters that Alma consumed he would get between 30 or 80 experience as well. The awesome news was that experience from Brain Drain was increased by his Potion as well! True, these monsters were low level, and didn’t give much experience, but it boded well for the future! He disabled the experience prompts again before he forgot. Those things were seriously distracting and cluttered his notification log.

	While he was waiting, he also looked at the backlog of experience prompts from the frantic fight with the eaters. Just like the battle with the bugbears, it seemed that he got experience even from the sprites kills. A quick question revealed that the sprites got experience from his kills as well. Yoshi explained that in group battles everyone that contributed to a kill would get some decreased experience. The more people involved, the less the individual experience each person got. Up to a party of five, though, everyone got an equal and unreduced level of experience from completed quests. It seemed The Land followed old D&D rules. Most people accepted that the ideal party size was four, but you always made a party of five. That way if someone had some bad lo mein, and subsequently was spraying dark miso soup out of their bottom, you were still ready to rock with the four who made it to your mom’s garage.

	Richter had been slightly concerned that the sprites would have a problem with what Alma was doing, but they just looked curious. Yoshi asked about what was happening, and when Richter explained he just nodded in agreement, “Any opportunity to get stronger should be taken.” It was clear he was still irritated with Richter from the way he spoke, though.

	Once Alma was done, they took stock of their surroundings. Sion’s bottle of Pure Light had gone out, and if not for Futen, there would be no light in the subterranean tunnel. The stone of the hallway was different from the antechamber. It was grey slate and the blocks were expertly laid together. Most importantly there were no holes in the walls. After seeing the eaters speed out of holes that should have been too small to accommodate their bodies no less, it was a relief to know that they wouldn’t be swarmed from all directions. The tunnel led on into the darkness. Futen’s light only extended about twenty yards, past that nothing could be seen.

	Alma had perched back on his shoulders when she was finished killing the eaters. Yoshi was cleaning his blades, and Sion and Daniella were shouldering their bows and checking their arrows. Other than the quiet sounds the four of them were making, the tunnel was as still and quiet as the grave.

	“Well how do we get out of there,” Yoshi asked.

	It was quiet for a moment until Richter realized the question was directed at him.

	“How should I know,” he asked.

	“That internal map that you have been bragging about,” Yoshi said sharply. “Find us a way out.”

	“It only works on places that I’ve already been.”

	“Only works on where you’ve already been? Not where you are going,” Yoshi asked putting emphasis on the last word. “You do know that’s the exact OPPOSITE of the purpose of a map, right?”

	“Oh! Is my magic map not good enough for you,” Richter asked loudly. Not giving Yoshi a chance to respond, “Well let me just check and see if CAN tell us anything. Looking, looking, looking. Wait! I was wrong! It does say something. Yup. It says right here that we’re fucked. Wait, let me check again. Yup! We’re fucked!”

	Before Richter and Yoshi started wailing on each other, Daniella pulled the sword adept away, whispering urgently to him. Richter walked up to Sion, who was checking his quiver.

	“What is wrong with that guy,” Richter asked.

	“Well,” Sion replied, “he’s just kind of in a bad mood. Probably due to falling down a pit, then nearly being eaten, and now being buried alive.”

	Richter was quiet for a moment, “Well yeah! But what’s his problem with me?”

	“Well,” Sion said again, “all of that happened because you activated whatever was set into that stone.”

	Richter was quiet a bit longer this time, “Yeah well, that’s still no reason for him to be a total twat!”

	Sion sighed, “I don’t know what that means, butttt, I’m guessing if there were reasons to be a… total twat, then being dropped down a pit, almost being eaten alive, and then being trapped in an underground tunnel, would all be pretty good reasons.”

	Richter chewed on Sion’s words and realized his Companion might have had a point. He looked over at Yoshi. “Hey Yoshi, I feel… partly responsible for all of this. I want to apologize.”

	The adept looked at him with squinted eyes, and then half raised one hand. He did something peculiar with his fingers though, with only the second and fourth ones extended. As soon as he made the gesture, Daniella grabbed it and pulled it back down.

	Richter looked at Sion, “What did that mean?”

	Sion looked back and forth between the two men, “Uhhhh, it means he accepts your apology.” He quickly redirected Richter’s attention from the Yoshi’s blatant insult, “If we are going to be trapped in here long, then we might be in trouble. I just used a third of my arrows,” Sion said.

	Daniella chimed in to help with the distraction. Walking over, she said, “I used a bit less, but if we run into more hell bugs, my arrows will deplete quickly.”

	Richter looked at the two sprites, quite sure that hand gesture did not mean ‘I accept your apology,’ but seeing Yoshi leaning against the tunnel wall clearly pissed, he decided to let it go. This was at least partly his fault after all.

	“Not a problem,” Richter said. “I asked Hisako to make me more sprite arrows before we left. She went a bit overboard.” Richter pulled out one of the bundles Hisako had left for him near the Great Seal. Each of the three contained hundreds of arrows. The sprites replenished their stores and Richter put the rest of the arrows back into his Bag. Richter also took the time to give them ten Potions of Clarity each. Yoshi scowled initially, saying he could not afford them, and despite Richter’s insistence he continued to refuse. When Richter repeated Yoshi’s own words about not missing opportunities to get stronger though, he finally accepted.

	“So those things were eaters,” Richter asked.

	“I can’t believe there is a nest in the Forest,” Yoshi spat. “I still remember fighting to clear the last nest forty years ago. They shouldn’t be back for at least another fifty or sixty years! We lost good sprites during that fight,” he said in a regretful tone. “This is no longer about your quest, Lord Richter. We need to find the nest, and destroy it. Will you help?”

	You have been offered a Quest: Scourge the Scourge I. Yoshi has just discovered the Forest has an infestation of hell bugs. He has made clear that finding the nest is more important that anything. He wants your help. Not accepting will cause Yoshi to leave the party and decrease your reputation with him. Yes or No?

	Like there was really a choice, he thought. “Okay, how do we start,” Richter asked.

	Yoshi looked around at the hallway that contained them and the iron door behind them. He made eye contact with Richter, “We go forward.”

	Remembering what had happened when unlocking his first power, he told Futen to move ahead of them and scan for traps. The remnant moved ten yards ahead of them and waited. When they started walking after him, the grey orb matched their pace, staying in front. Richter took lead, followed by Sion and Daniella who had arrows nocked to their bows, and Yoshi brought up the rear.

	While they were walking, Richter accessed his inventory. All of the quartz soul stones Gloran had given him had taken up only one slot in his Bag of Holding, each type of larger soul stone also took up one slot with a number next to it to show how many there were of that type. The five soul stones holding the spirits of the hell bugs, though, now took up one slot each. These stones had a pulsating radiance at their center. Richter pulled one out of his inventory and looked at it. The amber jewel did indeed have an undulating spherical light in its heart, that showed a rainbow of colors, changing from second to second. The tingling feeling was still there, but there was also now a slight sensation of warmth. He put it away.

	The silence in the tunnel was deafening. The air had adopted a progressively worsening ‘stale’ smell as they went further in. Richter could only guess that opening the iron door had let in the first fresh air this dungeon had seen in ages.

	The four party members walked for at least half a day. The tunnel bent and zigzagged. Occasionally it even led back up for short stints. The actual features of the hallway they walked through, remained uniform, simple grey blocks of closely fitted stone. It was clear that they were slowly being led deeper into the earth.

	To stave off boredom, Richter withdrew one of the soul stones containing an eater’s soul. He also took out the Wand of Dark Bolts. First, he simply held the glowing jewel next to the wand, but nothing happened. He left them pressed together for a full minute, but unfortunately, it still didn’t yield a positive result. Next he examined each item, but it just gave the basic stats of each separately. The wand had recharged another five shots in the past day or so. Richter was getting frustrated, but then he remembered Gloran told him to ‘will it.’ He placed the two items together again and imagined the power in the soul stone flowing into the wand. A prompt came up:

	Do you wish to recharge the Wand of Dark Bolts with the Basic Soul stone? Yes or No?

	Richter chose ‘Yes.’

	The same ribbon of rainbow light that appeared when a spirit was captured, now flowed out of the soul stone and into the wand. The gem lost its inner light and then fractured. Richter was left holding a few pieces of broken amber in his hand. He put them away, not wanting to just leave them on the floor of the tunnel. Another prompt appeared:

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Enchanting. The path of the enchanter is to make the wondrous out of the mundane. You can now add spells to items to greatly increase their strength.

	Awesome, Richter thought. The soul stone had added another eleven charges. He was about to use another soul stone when he realized that the tunnel had ended. Directly across from the passage they were in, on the other side of the open area, was an archway made of the same grey stone that formed the hallway. Set into the archway was a large door made of overlapping bands of metal. Four other doors were randomly set into the walls. One appeared to be made completely of long bones, like femurs. Another was made of red iron with no handle or apparent means of opening it. A third was black wood with glowing silver sigils carved into the frame. The fourth was simply a hatch. It looked like a dome, and it bowed outward in the direction of the room. It had a cross-shaped indentation set directly in the center of the dome, but no apparent handle. What concerned Richter, was that it was set two feet off the ground, but was only three feet in diameter. Good god, don’t let the passage way on the other side be a small tunnel, Richter thought. He wasn’t afraid of small spaces per se, he just heavily preferred NOT to be in one.

	All of these doors were definitely weird, but everyone in the party was happy to have a change from the tunnel. Richter was about a step into the room when he had a strange feeling. It could only be described as a ‘wrongness.’ He sharply snapped his arm up, hand flat, to stop the sprites behind him. He immediately heard the creaks of Sion and Daniella drawing their bows taut, and the shing of Yoshi drawing his blades. He didn’t know what had alarmed him exactly, but he knew on an instinctual animal level that something in the ‘bad’ category of things would happen if he walked into the room.

	Despite being sure of his feeling, he just didn’t see anything. He scanned the room, but nothing jumped out at him. No giant spiders, no robots with laser blasters, and no womp rats. He looked at his familiar.

	*Alma, do you feel anyone in the room?*

	*No*, she thought back.

	Well at least there is that, Richter thought. She had been able to detect those bugbears even though they were hidden by magic. He guessed psychic vibrations were hard to hide, or at least common concealment spells were not aimed at hiding them. That still left the question of what was going on, though. The feeling had not debated.

	He expanded his other senses, but still felt nothing. He stared at the walls, the ceiling, the floor… Was that a red glow? He knelt down and examined the floor of the room closely. Unlike the slate block floor of the hallway, the floor of the chamber in front of them was an irregular pattern of shapes: circles, diamonds, rectangles, and triangles. They interlocked with one another in a seemingly haphazard manner. From his lower vantage, he didn’t see the red glow, but his feeling of unease increased. Letting his eyes relax, he gazed at the floor. When he saw the red again, he was able to focus upon it this time. The closest circle had a superimposed red glow. A prompt appeared:

	You have found: Level 3 trap.

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Pierce the Veil. The Land is a place of hidden secrets. Traps to snare the unwary, hidden treasures, booty: both pirate and otherwise. From this moment on, you will be able to find that which others have concealed.

	Casting his gaze wider, he looked at the other nearby shapes and with close attention, all of the circles near him began to glow red.

	“Relax,” he said to the sprites. “There aren’t any enemies here, but the floor is full of traps.”

	Yoshi looked at him, “Who trained you in trap detection?”

	“No one,” Richter replied. He tapped one of the rings he was wearing. “It’s called the Ring of Hidden Dangers. It increases my likelihood of detecting traps. The real question is,” he said looking at Futen, “why didn’t you warn us about the traps?”

	“The trigger was not magical in nature, my Lord. I have no skill in detecting this type of trap.”

	Why doesn’t everything always just work out for me, Richter wailed silently. So far only the circles were glowing, but that still made the floor a minefield. It would take careful footwork to avoid the traps, and one misstep would… well, he had no idea what it would do, but he was pretty sure that it would both suck and blow.

	“So what do you think the traps do,” Sion asked.

	“Let’s find out,” Richter said. He tossed a small pebble from the tunnel floor towards the other side of the room. It bounced once then lay still. Yoshi reached out a hand to stop him, but Richter’s impulsive action caught him by surprise.

	Nothing happened. Richter looked at Yoshi’s irritated expression. “Maybe the traps are duds,” he said.

	A loud whoosh heralded a foot-high gout of black flame extending vertically up from the floor in the exact spot that the pebble had first hit the floor. At the same time, a flash of steel showed at the final resting place of the stone. Three different razor wire hoops shot up from the floor crisscrossing each other at ankle height. Both traps started and ended in the space of a second before disappearing completely. The only evidence that anything had happened was a lingering smell of burnt ozone.

	“Fucckkk meee,” Richter said slowly, backpedaling away from the dangerous room. What was truly terrifying was that neither of those traps seemed designed to kill. They would just remove a portion of a leg. Then you would fall back on even more traps, and… yeah, definitely in the ‘bad’ category of things. “I thought you said the traps weren’t magical Futen! Since when is black flame not magical?”

	“I said the trigger wasn’t magical, my Lord.”

	“Greattt,” Richter said.

	“Gyoti,” was all Richter heard before a hand slapped the back of his head. Hard. “What did I tell you about just pushing buttons!”

	Richter was wired from everything that had been happening, and the disrespect from the sword adept pushed him over the edge. He took a swing at the sword adept who dodged under the blow. The situation would have grown more out of control if not for Daniella.

	“Enough! Mother Forest! The Hearth Mother was right,” the female sprite shouted. “There isn’t a brain among you! Lord Richter, Yoshi was right. You had NO idea what those traps would have done. It could have triggered something that would hurt us even though were still in the tunnel. And you,” she said pointing at finger in Yoshi’s face, “are not making a bad situation any better. Gyoti or not, Lord Richter is the Master of these lands, and the Hearth Mother sent you to assist him. Now can you stop bickering like old mothers and act like men? I can show you how if you need me to!”

	Richter and Yoshi glared at each other, but by the end of Daniella’s verbal barrage, Richter was looking down in shame. Even Yoshi looked a bit sheepish. Richter looked back up at Daniella’s fierce expression, and then at Sion. His Companion was standing behind her, clearly trying not to laugh. Little bastard, Richter thought. He looked back at Yoshi. He couldn’t find it inside himself to apologize just for striking back, but Daniella was right. It had been a bone head move. He nodded at the half-human. Yoshi gave a noncommittal grunt in return. Richter decided it was as much bro love as he was going to get. He turned his attention back to floor.

	“All of the circles that are close by are rigged. I’m assuming they all are, so what do we do here?”

	Yoshi pulled out two small spikes of metal. One had a small hook at the end. The other undulated like a sine wave at the end. The opposing ends of both spikes were sharpened like needles. “We disarm them. Point out the closest trap. Your skill to detect it might be more advanced than mine.”

	Richter showed him. The sword adept knelt down to examine it. After a few seconds, he said, “I see it.” His face was only inches away, but he never directly passed any part of his body directly over it. Yoshi looked at it, and then he looked at it, and then he looked at it. After twenty minutes, the other sprites sat down in the tunnel. After forty minutes, Richter joined them and broke out some hard rations from his Bag and handed them to Sion and Daniella. Hours passed.

	Sion was in the middle of his ‘a dwarf, a goblin, and an elf’ walk into a bar joke when Yoshi called out to get their attention and then waved them over. Richter was hoping it meant they could start moving again, but he really had wanted to know why the dwarf had looked so triumphant and why the goblin’s butt was sore.

	“You figured it out,” he asked Yoshi. The sprite told him to kneel down and then pointed to a small square to the side of the circle he had been studying.

	“The release mechanism is here,” Yoshi said pointing at the square. “That’s why it took me so long. I was examining the circle meticulously, but couldn’t find any way to disarm it. Then it occurred to me that if one symbol triggered the trap, maybe another disarmed it. Watch.” Yoshi reversed his two tools, pointing the needlelike ends of both picks downward. He placed them at opposite corners of the square. They slipped into barely perceptible holes. He pushed both down, and with a soft click, one side of the circle popped up. Yoshi carefully pried it up further, and a mechanism could be seen underneath. A bar was underneath the circle, and it was connected to a small spring. That was in turn connected to a bar of metal which disappeared down into the floor past the point that Richter could see. With a grunt of satisfaction, Yoshi used the hook end of one of his tools and detached the spring from the lever that was apparently the trigger for the trap. He then put the circle back into the floor and stood. He cracked his neck and then arched his back, stiff from squatting for such a long period of time.

	“Is it disarmed,” Sion asked.

	Yoshi waved Sion closer, and then put a hand around the younger sprite’s shoulders once they were standing next to one another. The adept looked at Sion and said, “What do you think?” At the same time that he asked the question, he stomped down on the circle.

	Sion shouted in alarm and leapt back. Yoshi just stood there with a manic grin on his face.

	“So, are like, ALL sprites assholes,” Richter asked his heart racing. Yoshi just chuckled while Sion cursed under his breath.

	Richter looked at the sword adept, “Okay. So I’m glad that you’re having a good time, and that you disarmed that one trap, but it took you an hour.” He looked out at the sea of small shapes that comprised the floor of the large room in front of them.

	“That’s why I’m going to need your help. Did you follow what I did?”

	Richter checked his prompts and saw:

	Congratulations! You have learned the subskill: Trap Disarm. You have learned how to disable the mechanism of traps. Through careful application of your new subskill, you can make the world a safer place. This is a subskill of Traps. As you have learned this subskill, you have also learned the skill Traps.

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Traps. You can set traps that will harm unwary enemies, but use caution lest you harm the innocent as well.

	“I guess I did,” Richter said. “Let’s get to work.” Yoshi handed him a pair of lock picks.

	You have received: Lock picks. Durability 5/5. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight 0.01 kg.

	Before getting started, Richter pulled out and activated his Wand of Magic Illumination. The blue beam of light didn’t show anything on the floor though, thankfully. Even with having been shown how to disarm the traps, it still took Richter at least fifteen minutes to disarm the next one. Unfortunately, the shape that hid the disarming holes varied. The release mechanism that Richter found was under a triangle. The only hint seemed to be that it needed to be near the circle. One of his picks also got caught when trying to withdraw it because Richter was moving too fast. The durability decreased by one. When he asked Yoshi if he had any more picks, the sprite told him no and called him a gyoti. Richter thought about snapping back but decided distracting Yoshi while he was disarming deadly traps was a bad idea. At least while Richter was still working next to him, that is.

	Richter realized he would have to slow down even farther. If he messed up too many times, half of their total number of lock picks would be gone. He looked out at the hundreds, no thousands of small circles set into the floor and sighed. He got back to work. Hours passed as they slowly made their way across the floor. The good news was that Richter got a small amount of experience for each trap that was disarmed. His skills with Pierce the Veil, Traps, and Trap Disarm improved as well.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Pierce the Veil. +1 to perception.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Pierce the Veil. +1 to perception.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Pierce the Veil. +1 to perception.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 5 in Pierce the Veil. +1 to perception.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 6 in Pierce the Veil. +1 to perception.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Traps. All traps 2% more effective.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Traps. All traps 2% more effective.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Traps. All traps 2% more effective

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Trap Disarm. +2% more likely to disarm trap.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Trap Disarm. +2% more likely to disarm trap.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Trap Disarm. +2% more likely to disarm trap.

	Richter could only reason that Pierce the Veil leveled faster than the other two because he was using that skill directly, whereas all of the points going towards Traps were actually coming indirectly from leveling its subskill, Trap Disarm. It meant his Trap Disarm skill might have risen higher, but its growth was limited by the fact that subskills could never be a higher level than their main skill. He thought about examining the logs to see exactly how much his Traps skill leveled in proportion to his Trap Disarm skill but then decided that would be about as interesting as watching paint dry. He got back to work

	As they had moved deeper into the room the level of the traps had increased as well. This was initially a problem because the mechanism was more complex, but Yoshi was again able to show him what to do. After that, it was just back to rinse and repeat. The good news was that the higher level traps gave a commensurate higher level experience and seemed to level his skills faster.

	The hours of focus required to get to the middle of the room had taken their toll. Richter was mentally fatigued. His actions were getting sloppier as well, and he had fumbled disarming another trap. Thankfully he didn’t trigger the trap, but it did remove another point of durability from his other lock pick. He told Yoshi that he thought they should rest. He had expected some ‘Goonies never say die nonsense’ from the sword adept, but instead the swordsman agreed. At seeing Richter’s confused expression, he said, “There is no honor in pushing through a bad position.”

	As they were walking back to the hallway, Richter muttered, “Yeah, that’s why I always put their legs in the air.”





CHAPTER 17




	Richter was about to lay down when a stray thought that had made his heart pound in fear. He called out to Futen, and asked what would happen if neither of them was in the village to pay the upkeep for Confusing Mist. Richter was already recriminating himself for putting his village at risk again. It didn’t matter that he hadn’t foreseen being gone so long. He should have! He was ready to risk running across the trapped floor when Futen soothed his panic. The remnant told him that the upkeep was automatically paid as long as there was enough mana. Since neither of them were accessing the village’s mana pool, the spell would continue with no issues. Also, the remnant reminded his Lord that they were still within the boundaries of his domain even though they weren’t in the village proper which meant Richter could still access the village’s mana.

	Richter had breathed a sigh of relief. He hadn’t been thinking clearly. His mental fatigue had combined with physical exhaustion, letting panic take over. Once he let go of that worry, though, he laid down on his bedroll and passed out almost immediately. He didn’t sleep long, though, thanks to a boot nudging his ribs. Yoshi was waking him to stand watch. Richter made the argument that they didn’t need to keep watch as Futen could hover in one part of the tunnel and the other part was protected by the trap floor. Yoshi wasn’t hearing any of it, though, and they all spent one shift awake.

	When everyone had slept, Richter and Yoshi got back to work. Walking back to the center of chamber, they had a decision to make. The room wasn’t perfectly round, and the angle of one wall meant that the bone door closest to them. Richter wanted to keep going straight to reach the metal door. Yoshi, on the other hand, argued that if their picks broke before they got to a door, then they would have to try to run the gauntlet of the floor. Better to reach any door than to get stuck, the adept reasoned.

	Richter didn’t have any better counterargument than, ‘Good god! Not the bone door. It’s creepy!’ or ‘Why is it a shit idea to go towards the bone door, you ask? Because it is so OBVIOUSLY a shit idea!’ Needless to say, they ended up disarming traps towards the bone door.

	It took another day and a half to disarm the increasingly difficult traps, but Richter took his time and didn’t lose any more durability on his lock picks. While they were working, Richter asked something that had been on his mind for a while, “How did you become a Warrior? How did you get your Profession?”

	Of course, the adept didn’t answer at first. That would have been too easy, Richter thought. He did end up answering, though. “If you have reached level twenty and have a journeyman skill level in a combat skill, you are given the opportunity to prove yourself. If you so choose to take that opportunity, you will be taken… elsewhere. There you must defeat the challenges set before you. If you succeed, then you will be assigned a Profession.”

	“What if you don’t defeat the challenges,” Richter asked.

	“Well then you come back,” Yoshi replied irritably.

	“There aren’t any consequences?”

	Yoshi gave a long-suffering sigh and looked at the ceiling as if begging for strength. When he spoke, he enunciated each word like Richter had a mental deficit. “If you do not pass the challenges, then you lose a personal level and one skill level in every skill you have.”

	Trying not to let Yoshi’s attitude get to him, he just reflected on the information he had just learned. Soon, Richter would reach personal level 20. Except for Herb Lore, though, he was far from a journeyman in any of his skills. He would have to start skill grinding sometime soon. He knew he was pushing it, but decided to ask another question, “All Professions require you to be a journeyman and reach level 20?” He was remembering that Gloran had the Profession of Crafter despite being only level 14.

	“Yes,” Yoshi snapped. He went back to disarming his traps but then picked his head back up. “Except for noncombat Professions. Those you can reach at Level 10, but you still need to be at least a journeyman in a related skill. And in answer to your next questions, Yes, you are a gyoti, and no, I won’t kiss you for a copper.” Yoshi gave a bright garish smile, which swiftly fled his face leaving behind only a cold glare. Richter took the hint this time and got back to work himself.

	By the time they reached the bone door, he had reached level ten in his trap skills and level eleven in Pierce the Veil. He got the normal bonus experience from reaching level ten (plus the 25% bonus), but unfortunately only received half the experience for leveling his subskill. Total, it was 6,250. He deserved every point, he thought, massaging his aching back.

	While Yoshi went back to lead Sion and Daniella through the disarmed traps, Richter looked at his status page.

	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 14, 60%

Health: 390 Mana: 300 Stamina: 200

Strength: 29

Agility: 18

Dexterity: 34

Constitution: 25

Endurance: 20

Intelligence: 23

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 24

Luck: 15

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Psi Bond

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 38; 43% to next level

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level

Analyze Lvl 5; 31% to next level

Pierce the Veil Lvl 11; 71% to next level

Stealth Lvl 4; 76% to next level

Traps Lvl 10; 5% to next level

Trap Disarm Lvl 10; 7% to next level

Archery Lvl 9; 18% to next level

Imbue Arrow Lvl 4; 62% to next level

Focus Lvl 3; 11% to next level

Double Shot Lvl 3; 31% to next level,

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 40% to next level

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 15% to next level

Small Blades Lvl 1; 11% to next level

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level

Light Armor Lvl 7; 38% to next level

Grace in Combat Lvl 4; 88% to next level

Air Magic Lvl 3; 82% to next level

Life Magic Lvl 3; 71% to next level

Earth Magic Lvl 3; 32% to next level

Water Magic Lvl 1; 19% to next level

Dark Magic Lvl 3; 64% to next level

Light Magic Lvl 1; 34% to next level

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 14; 86% to next level

War Leader Lvl 2, 43% to next level

Enchantment Lvl 1; 7% to next level

Marks:

Master of Mist Village

Blood Oath

Resistances:

Air 50%

Earth 20%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 3 “You seem like someone worthy of my attention.”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





	He still had his six characteristic points in reserve. After seeing the devilish trap floor, he decided holding off was the right choice. Who knew what the next challenge would be?

	He had also received three noteworthy prompts during the past few days.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Pierce the Veil. In addition to hidden traps, you can now find hidden compartments.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Traps. You can set traps with proximity triggers in addition to simple pressure triggers.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Trap Disarm. You can now retrieve some of the traps you disarm for your own future use.

	Hidden compartments? Had he been missing hidden treasure?! Richter looked around but didn’t see anything new. The other question was why didn’t he progress to Initiate for Trap Disarm? He could only guess that it was because it was a subskill.

	The three sprites walked up. Sion was protesting, “Of all the doorways here, are we sure that we want to go into the bone doorway?” Richter was just about to chime in, ‘That’s what I said!’, when Yoshi made an abrupt swipe of his hand.

	“This was the most efficient option,” Yoshi said. “We have limited resources and without further information, each choice was the same as the others.” Looking at Richter, he asked, “Do you sense anything?”

	Richter shook his head. Even though the bone door was weird, there was no red glow coming off of it. Similarly, the wand didn’t show anything. “Futen, any magical wards or traps that you can detect?”

	“No, my Lord.”

	The door had a small hole in it where a door knob would be. Looking inside the hole, he saw a metal circle with the impression of a square set in its center. The circle was set about a foot past the door. It could be easily reached if you decided to stick your hand in the hole.

	“Okay,” Richter said, “So one of us is supposed to stick our hand in that hole to reach that circle, but then it’s going to be all like, ‘Oh no! Something grabbed my hand. And where did that monster come from? Oh, curse this completely unexpected twist of fate! Oh, the humanity!”

	Richter was really getting into the role and was doing his best Sterling Archer by the end of it. The sprites just looked at him with unamused expressions. Tough crowd, he thought. He tried another tact. “The point is; this is an obvious trap. And I don’t think any of us wants to lose a hand to prove it.”

	“Well, what do you suggest,” Yoshi asked annoyed.

	“We go to the metal door, which incidentally, unlike this bone door, doesn’t have the obvious promise of sure death attached to it,” Richter said.

	“We do not have time to go to another door!”

	“Then be my guest,” Richter said. He swept his arm towards the hole in the bone door.

	Yoshi stared at it for a minute and then said, “I need some time to think this through. Until I figure out a solution, though, we should keep working on the other traps. We might as well go in that direction,” he gestured loosely towards the metal iron door. He turned around and walked towards the middle of the room again.

	Richter’s eyes opened wide, “Really dude? Really?”

	Yoshi just kept walking.

	Shaking his head, Richter led Sion and Daniella back through the traps so they could wait safely in the tunnel. He was walking back to join Yoshi when Alma shrieked unhappily. He handed her some dried meat out of his Bag, which she sniffed at in disdain, but ultimately took. She had made her displeasure at the lack of fresh meat clear the first time he had offered it. All he got in return was a stream of air into his face.

	The two men got back to work. Something interesting happened as they were making it to the metal door. After he disarmed a trap that at first seemed no different from the others, it had started glow a reassuring green. None of the other traps had ever done that before.

	He kept staring at it hoping a prompt would appear, but he had no such luck. A little voice whispered in the corner of his mind, but he shushed it. It was talking crazy. He kept staring at the green glow, and the voice whispered again, louder this time.

	‘Try to grab it,’ an adventurous little part of him said.

	‘Why don’t you try to grab it,’ the cautious part of him thought back. Then all of him thought, please god don’t let anyone find out that I’m talking to myself! Alma stared at him suspiciously.

	‘The green light probably means everything is fine,” the adventurous part of Richter said. ‘Just put your hand in the hole. Something great might happen!’

	‘Well something great might happen at a glory hole, but I’m not sticking my hand, or any other part of me in one of those either! Or have you forgotten what happened in Tijuana?’

	Silence reigned in Richter’s head. The cautious part of him cheered in victory.

	That was when the chicken noises started.

	‘Bwakkk, bwakkk, bok, bok, bgwaakkkk!’

	After two minutes of that he gave in.

	‘Fine! I’ll do it,’ Richter thought. The adventurous part of him reintegrated into his psyche with a smug grin.

	Richter stuck his fingers under the circle and into the green glow. His jaw was clenched shut expecting to lose his hand at any moment. Finally, a prompt came up.

	Do you wish to retrieve Level Acid Trap? Yes or No?

	Nowww I get a prompt, he silently asked, staring up at the ceiling in exasperation. He selected ‘Yes’ and the circle of the trap came completely free. A metal contraption with a glass sphere rose to the level of the floor. The sphere was clear and was mostly filled with a syrupy red liquid.

	You have found: Adhesive Fire Acid Trap. Durability 5/5. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight .2 kg. Once triggered, will release a spray of acid in a circle five feet in diameter. This acid will adhere to anything it touches making it extremely difficult to remove. Does 7-10 damage (85% Acid, 15% Fire magic) per second for 20 seconds.

	Despite having had to guess about the green light, Richter was please at this new weapon. This acid sounded like some serious stuff. He was also feeling like he didn’t want any part of a trap like this going off near him! He CAUTIOUSLY got back to work.

	A day later, they had finally made their way to the metal door. His trap skills increased another two levels. Unfortunately, it was always the way that the higher skills rose, the harder it was to level them.

	Up close, the bands of metal that created the door had a previously unseen feature. The entire surface was covered with impossibly thin and short spikes. Richter hadn’t seen them earlier because they were completely clear. Not one was longer than an inch, but they were so tightly packed and so numerous that touching the door ensured being pricked. Richter tried to cut one free with his glass dagger, but the spike seemed to be impervious to damage. What did happen, however, was a drop of clear viscous liquid welled from the end of the spike. Sion collected it in an empty vial he took from his pack. He wafted some of the odor towards his face, then took out a second vial of orange power. He placed a small amount of water in the first vial and added some of the powder. When he swirled the mixture around it turned into a milky purple solution. With a disbelieving look on his face, he added a small brown leaf and it began to produce green bubbles.

	“Shrieke venom,” Sion said in surprise.

	“What effects does it cause,” Richter asked.

	“Death,” Sion said definitively. “It is one of the deadliest naturally occurring venoms in The Land. We cannot touch this door. Even one drop would kill us. You,” he said pointing at Richter, “might be able to survive being stuck once by a spike because of your larger size, but not twice. The venom has Earth and Death based magic as well as just being a natural poison, so your resistance should help, but again, I wouldn’t risk it.”

	“What is going on,” Richter cried out. “Who would come up with a massive metal door covered in near invisible spikes that leak deadly poison? The architect/author for this dungeon must have been insane… or just insanely clever and attractive!”

	No one spoke for a second, “I am not sure why you would draw that last conclusion,” his Companion said, “but I am sure that we cannot touch any of these spikes.”

	“There has to be a way out of here,” Daniella said. “We are just not looking in the right place. Maybe one of the other doors will be helpful.”

	Richter knew that they would ultimately have to check out the other doors, but felt sure that each one would present a problem as well. As a matter of course, he pulled his wand and scanned for magic. The door itself glowed white uniformly. No real surprise there. In frustration, Richter dropped his hand. He was going to scream in frustration again, but felt someone nudge him.

	“Look down,” Sion said.

	Richter looked, and in the beam of blue light emanating from the wand, were words in a flourishing script. It contained umlaut’s, tilde’s, and other unknown accents.

	Daniella drew in her breath sharply.

	“What,” Sion asked turning around sharply to scan the room. They were all a bit on edge from just sitting in here.

	“This is ancient high elvish.”

	“Bah,” Yoshi said. “That hasn’t been spoken for almost one hundred thousand years. How could you recognize it?”

	“Hisako has books written in high elvish in her library. If you enjoyed doing more than just stroking your sword, you might have learned something as well,” she answered waspishly. Sion took a step back from the potential confrontation. He was always smart like that.

	Richter had been tracing the line writing with his wand, and saw that it completely encircled the door. The words touched the ceiling, the walls, and the floor. “I can read it,” he said. “Listen,”

	“Red of iron, essence of flesh, both must be tempered, to unlock the way forward.

	Grist of bone is the stage of life, rage against the fading of life.

	To prepare the way forward, remove the distractions of the past. Heed this warning or suffer the error of youth.

	Death comes on swift wings, causing a terrible storm.

The passage of birth is the loss of the womb.

The safety of illusion fractures under the blows of pain’s truth.

Any being would be crushed, to carry the world on his shoulders.

Know thy limitations or never transcend them.

The last path is the first that is taken each day.

Listen well to both devils and angels, for both are you.

Life can be found in the truthful lies of one and the lying truths of the other.

Cross not the wrong threshold, or suffer the reaper.

Only these truths can pierce the veil of lies which bar your way.”

	Yoshi stared at him, “Is that it?”

	“Yes,” Richter replied.

	“Are you sure,” Sion asked.

	“Maybe you’re reading it wrong,” Yoshi said. He turned to Daniella, “What do you think it says?”

	“I can’t read it,” Daniella said.

	“You said you had learned from the Hearth Mother!”

	“I said I could recognize it! The same way I can recognize a gyoti when I’m looking at one!” She glared at the sword adept. Yoshi inhaled deeply, probably preparing for a scathing reply.

	“Enough,” Richter said forcefully. “Trust me Yoshi, I can read it. It’s my Gift of Tongues ability. Now all of you stop wasting energy. We have to get out of here. We have enough rations for a good while, but our water will not last forever. Also, have you forgotten that the eaters are a clear threat to the entire Forest of Nadria? Now start being helpful!”

	Yoshi stared angrily at Daniella a while longer, then shook his head and looked down. When he looked back up, the irritation was gone from his face. “You are of course right, Lord Richter. I apologize. I also apologize to you, sister sprite. I am frustrated by the need to remove this menace before it harms our people.” He bowed at the waist.

	Daniella bowed back, “I apologize as well sword adept.”

	Richter looked back and forth between the sprites, “Yeah yeah, kumbaya. We still need to get out of here.”

	Sion asked him to repeat the inscription. When Richter was done reciting, he said, “Well flesh and iron can be red, and we have a red door…”

	No one else had a better idea, and for a good Georgia boy who had been raised on red clay hills, the reasoning was sound enough. Yoshi and he got back to work. While they did, Sion had brought out another empty vial and was meticulously striking each spike to catch the drops of venom it produced. Though it took hours, he got all of the spikes within easy reach of his short frame.

	The traps were all level five or six in this section of the room, but luckily, the increases in Richter’s trap skills made the process go a bit faster. They both had to rest before they were done. On the plus side, Richter was awarded two more traps. On paralyze, and another that triggered a needle coated with fear poison. It took the greater part of a day, but they made their way to the red door.

	Richter had been hoping that once they got right up to it, a means of opening it would be revealed, but a careful inspection showed nothing. Until he used the want that is, the blue light revealed more spidery script appeared.

	“Brighter than Light, blacker than Dark, stronger than Earth, faster than Air, deeper than Water, hotter than Fire, more cherished than Life, more inevitable than Death.”

	Something about it the inscription tickled his memory. It was like hearing a familiar song but in another language. He repeated the inscription to himself silently and thought about how the riddle made no sense. Nothing was brighter than light! Nothing was hotter than fire. Nothing was more inevitable than… Richter’s eyebrows rose, and he said, “Nothing.”

	As soon as he finished speaking that one word, the door began breaking apart. A piece fell off but did not strike the ground. It bent down the middle, and the two halves began opening and closing. Before he knew it, a red butterfly was flapping its wings. A cascade of red fell away from the door and the four comrades were surrounded by a maelstrom of red flapping wings. It was like being surrounded by every scarlet leaf of autumn or being gently cocooned in the softest red silk. As quickly as it began, the wonderful storm of butterflies ended when they all fell to the ground at once. The red door was gone, leaving the way clear.

	“I think these are red monarchs,” Sion said in awe. “I recognize them from a picture in mother’s library.”

	“Have they been absent from The Land for centuries too,” Richter asked.

	“No, but they are from a different plane. They are only supposed to exist in abyssal realms. Help me collect them.”

	The four reached down and collected all of the fallen butterflies, handing them to Richter for storage. Then they assumed the same formation as before, Futen leading with Richter several yards behind and Yoshi bringing up the rear. The tunnel beyond the red door looked like it had been hewn from solid red rock. The walls were irregular and walking required some balance. A couple hundred yards into the tunnel, Richter started to smell water. Soon he could hear a distant roar. The tunnel opened into a large rectangular cavern. The roar was made by what Richter assumed was a waterfall at the far end. Unfortunately, the intensity of Futen’s light was not enough to illuminate the entire room. The party stood on a ledge that looked out over an underground lake. They stood only a few feet above the waterline. In the distance Richter could just make out a small rocky island. An ornate chest was sitting in the middle of it. What caught his eye were the rocks walls. Large clear crystals were periodically embedded into the stone.

	“Okay, so what’s the catch,” Richter asked. No one had anything helpful to say. Futen intensified his light at Richter’s request, but they could still barely see past the island. Richter cast Far Light towards the end of the room. The ball of light didn’t make it far. The luminous white sphere traveled less than twenty feet when one of the crystals on the wall flashed. A bolt of red lightning streaked from the crystal towards the ball of light and impacted it with a loud zzzt and resulting boom!

	“Hehehe,” Richter said nervously. He looked around at his comrades, and saw that all of them were staring at the crystal with their mouths slightly open. Daniella had taken an involuntary step backwards. Richter looked around, ill at ease, but no other bolts of red death seemed to be forth coming. Shaking his head and exhaling solidly, he started to work the problem. If there was one thing he remembered from his semester as an engineering major, it was that where most people saw problems, engineers looked for solutions. Richter had always thought it was good advice in any walk of life.

	He took out his wand again, but didn’t find any script on the ground or walls. When he shined it over the water though, a pale sheet of white could be seen completely crossing the room perpendicular to the direction Richter was facing. It extended from the water to the ceiling. The sheet was in line with the first crystal on the wall, and perpendicular to the length of the room. When Richter turned off the wand off again, all he saw was empty space.

	“Sion, fire an arrow.” The sprite nocked and fired towards the island. The arrow flew straight, and as soon as it passed the white sheet, another red light flared in the jewel. Immediately, a bolt of red lightning shot from the crystal and struck the arrow dead on. All that was left was ash that fell down to sprinkle on top of the water.

	Richter shook his head. There had to be a way across the water. “Sion, try to hit one of the crystals.”

	The sprite took careful aim and shot at the closest crystal. The lightning flashed and the arrow was destroyed just before impact.

	Richter looked at the remnant, “Futen, could you withstand those lightning strikes?”

	“It might not destroy me, my Lord, but there is a good chance that it would disable me. You would have to retrieve me, and I would not revive until I was brought back to the Great Seal.”

	“Even if you were invisible?”

	“I cannot say, my Lord. I will try if you order it.”

	The risk was way too big, Richter thought. Futen was vital to the running of the village. He couldn’t risk the remnant on the off chance that it might work out. Richter racked his brain, and then said, “Sion, can you shoot an arrow so it goes under the water right before it would cross the first crystal?”

	Sion just gave a self-assured smile, then drew and fired. The arrow struck the water and continued on for a few more feet. Even though it crossed the plane of the crystal, there was no discharge. Not initially anyway. When the arrow bobbed back to the surface, it crossed the plane of another crystal, and red lightning shot down destroying it. Okay, Richter thought, I guess this means that they would be safe as long as they were under the water.

	He decided to bring more light to bear on the situation. He shot multiple balls of light with his Far Light spell. Richter was careful not to cross the magical white plane of the crystals. Soon, there was a shining archway made from little balls of light. Now the entire room could be seen clearly. The rocky island in the middle of the cavern was several meters long. There didn’t seem to be any crystals in line with the isle. As long as he swam just a bit past the tip of the rock, he should be able to climb up safely. This was, of course, all contingent on his belief that the crystals only fired when something passed directly in front of them. If they started to cover an arc of space, he was totally dead.

	“So all we need to do is swim under the water until we reach the island. It’s just… about a hundred, a hundred fifty yards… yeah…,” Richter said. He checked Sion’s status.

	 		 			 Name: Sion

Age: 44

Level: 11, 82% to next level

Health: 230 Mana: 210 Stamina: 140

Strength: 18

Agility: 18

Dexterity: 52

Constitution: 18

Endurance: 14

Intelligence: 21

Wisdom: 13

Charisma: 10

Luck: 12

Abilities:

Wood Craft

Concealment

Skills:

Herb lore Lvl 11, 51% to next level, 96% affinity

Alchemy Lvl 6, 17% to next level, 9%4 affinity

Archery Lvl 12; 39% to next level, 97% affinity

Imbue Arrow Lvl 7, 42% to next level, 88% affinity

Double Shot Lvl 3; 32% to next level, 98% affinity

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 45% to next level, 98% affinity

Stun Shot Lvl 2; 83% to next level, 99% affinity

Tracking Lvl 5; 62% to next level, 98% affinity

Swordsmanship Lvl 9, 21% to next level, 91% affinity

Air Magic Lvl 7; 15% to next level, 95% affinity

Marks:

None

Resistances:

Life 10%

Earth 10%

Light 10%

Race: Wood Sprite

Reputation: Lvl 1 “Who are you again?”

Alignment: +2

Language: Sprite, Common Tongue





	Sion had moved up three levels! It was probably because of the 20,000 experience bonus from planting the Quickening. If Richter’s memory was right, though, it looked like Sion had invested a couple points into Constitution and Intelligence and… one point into Charisma? Maybe that’s why he wasn’t such a pain in the neck anymore, he thought. Sion had obviously been practicing his Air magic. What had happened with his affinities though? They were way higher than before!

	“Sion,” Richter said in shock, “When did your affinities get so much higher?”

	The sprite smiled, “Don’t you remember the Quickening? You know, giant silver tree, white leaves, normally only seen on higher planes of existence.” Seeing Richter’s glare, he chuckled. “Well ever since then, my affinities have been higher!”

	Richter nodded, he remembered reading a prompt that everyone present at the planting would have higher affinities. He had just forgotten after all of the other momentous things that had happened. Either way, he was happy for his Companion! The main reason that Richter had checked Sion’s status page, was to see the sprite’s Agility and Endurance. Those seemed to be the main traits that swimming underwater for a prolonged period would entail. Sion’s stats were lower than Richter’s however, though. Richter checked with Daniella and Yoshi for their stats. Daniella numbers were well lower than his, and while Yoshi’s endurance was higher, the adept’s Agility was lower proportionally.

	“Well, that leaves me,” he said. He explained what he had figured out about swimming underwater, and they had all made the same natural conclusion. Yoshi argued that he would make the swim, but even if their stats had been equal, Richter would have gone instead. He was immortal, after all.

	He took off almost all of his armor and clothes, not wanting the drag. Outside of the practical concerns of swimming encumbered, his light armor imposed a 3% penalty on his movement speed per piece. The only thing he kept on were his greaves. They provided a 10% boost to movement speed, so by his reasoning he should still get 7% bump. That might be the difference between life and death.

	Upon Yoshi’s suggestion, he attached the sheath of his glass dagger to his thigh with a two thin lengths of cloth. He tied his wand to the other leg. He then tried to leave his Bag of Holding, but just couldn’t for some reason. He had never actually been too far from it since he bought it from Hafiz, so this had never been an issue before. He tried to hand it to Daniella, but again he couldn’t bring himself to do it. A prompt showed up.

	It seems you are trying to leave behind a Soul Bound item: Bag of Holding. Do you wish to relinquish ownership? Yes or No?

	“NO,” Richter said. He hadn’t even meant to speak aloud; it was just a visceral reaction. The Bag was one of his most precious possessions. He selected ‘No’ on the prompt. Another appeared.

	You have a Companion nearby. If you choose to leave your item with your Companion, they will be able to access your inventory. Would you like to leave your Bag of Holding with your Companion? Yes or No?

	That sounds better, he thought. He selected ‘Yes’ and handed the Bag to Sion.

	*Stay here*, he thought to Alma. He projected an image of the crystal, *Danger!*

	The dragonling couldn’t speak in two-word sentences, but by the tone of her ‘Yes’, she was basically saying, *No duh.*

	He walked to the water with only his legs covered and said, “Don’t act like you’re not impressed,” and then dove in. The water was freezing! He was glad Daniella had seen him before he had jumped in. He swam above the water until just shy of the first crystal, then took three breaths. The first was shallow, the second and third normal. With that last breath, he began his swim. His arms moved in a modified breast stroke and his legs beat a strong, steady dolphin kick. He didn’t rush. That was one of the most important things to know about swimming. Panic increased heart rate, which increased other autonomic processes, which increased oxygen consumption. If he ran out of air before he reached the island, then that would equal deep fried Richter. The other mistake people made when free swimming was to exhale underwater. It wasn’t just carbon dioxide that leaked out, it was oxygen as well. Knowing these tips was why he had come in first, three years running in the swim competition at Camp Crystal Lake. Well, that, and all the mysterious machete related deaths.

	He just kept up the stroke watching the rock island get slowly closer. He tried not to think about what would happen if he broke the surface. Even if he ducked right back down that lightning would hit the water and… you guessed it, deep fried Richter. When he was thirty yards away from his goal, his stamina bar began to decrease. It was slow at first, but then it began to drop faster and faster. He could see the rock in front of him, but he was starting to get lightheaded and his limbs were getting sluggish. He wasn’t going to make it!

	He flailed forward under the water in a panic. He was kicking forward in frantic bursts, struggling to reach the safety of the small spit of rock. Kick, stroke, kick, stroke, the green bar of his stamina was running on empty!

	His hand hit a rock. He was getting ready to kick again when his mind registered what had happened. The island! He grabbed it and threw himself forward. His lungs drew in an ever so sweet breath of air. It was better than the coldest brew on the hottest day! He heard something from behind him, but couldn’t make it out over the now louder sound of the waterfall. Besides, that was when the lightning hit him.

	Blackness. More indistinct sounds, and then he became aware of a red flashing light. Cops? He had to flush his stash! Why hadn’t he moved to Colorado? Wait, what?

	As his head cleared, the sounds became clearer and resolved into Sion shouting, “I have to get to him,” and Yoshi shouting back, “You can’t help him!”

	Richter opened his eyes, the pain racking his body was horrendous. It felt like his nerves were on fire. He would have screamed if he had any control over his body, but in addition to his pain, his stamina was almost depleted. The green bar slowly refilled, but his red health bar continued flash. The reason was clear enough, since only the thinnest sliver of red could still be seen. When his stamina bar had recovered to a certain point, a wretched scream poured from his throat. He could feel his vocal cords tearing from the stress of it, and then he tasted copper.

	 Richter heard Sion shout, “He is still alive! I’m going after him!”

	“You won’t make it,” Daniella screamed back.

	Richter couldn’t let Sion chance the swim. Daniella was right, he would never make it. He rallied his mental faculties, and cast Slow Heal. He tried to anyway. The pain made him clumsy and he fumbled the simple hand movement. He used his Ring of Healing, which provided a minor abatement in the pain. He accessed the Ring a second time, the last time he would be able to use it for 24 hours, and again the pain subsided minimally. With a now greater ability to focus, he cast Slow Heal a second time success!

	Over the next sixty seconds, he regained another thirty health points. With the two uses of his Ring of healing, the flashing sliver of red stabilized. The debilitating pain abated to a level that could be called merely horrendous. He sat up and looked towards the ledge. He saw a naked Sion struggling against Daniella and Yoshi. He held up his hand, towards them and said, “Ssstop.” He repeated himself a bit stronger, “Stop!”

	The sprites took notice of him, and stopped struggling. He flapped his hand twice, indicating Sion should stay put, and then lowered himself back down to the ground. He cast Slow Heal again. He didn’t waste any more thought about his argumentative comrades and just followed a simple pattern. Cast, breathe, wait for the pain to slowly abate as the cool down for Slow Heal elapsed, then cast again. Once his health had recovered past 50%, the worst of the pain was gone. He finally could think straight, and ponder deep thoughts like, how was he still alive?! And why didn’t Vicodin exist here!?!

	He pulled up his combat log:

	Richter hit by Red Lightning for 723 damage. Damage Type(s): Air Magic (90%)/Earth Magic (10%). Air Magic damage 650.7 reduced by Air Resistance (50%) to 325.35. Earth Magic damage 72.3 reduced by Earth Resistance (20%) to 57.84. Total Damage: 383.19.

	Knights of Columbus! 723 damage?!? If it wasn’t for his resistances, he would be done! If he had been wearing armor on his back, which is where the lightning bolt had struck, maybe the damage would have been decreased. Then again, depending on how conductive his armor was, maybe not. After such a powerful strike, it was no surprise that his body felt like it had been dipped in broken glass and lemon juice. He continued his pattern of healing. After several more rounds of this, he was back to full health. He intellectually understood that once his body was completely healed, then the physical pain must be gone. It seemed his subconscious mind, however, still remembered the trauma he had just gone through. He would swear he could still feel his nerve fibers being overloaded by the bolt of electricity, and every part of him felt tender. Despite the pain, he centered himself and then stood up.

	As soon as he got to his feet, there was a cheer from the ledge. He looked over and saw Sion and Daniella waving their hands in the air, shouting in joy. Even Yoshi stood there with a smile on his face.

	Sion cupped a hand to his mouth and shouted, “Did you see the size of that lightning that hit you? It was huge! You took it like a man!”

	Richter laughed weakly. Sion’s exuberance let Richter shake off his phantom pain. His Companion’s communication skills had definitely undergone an evolution. “Put some clothes on,” he shouted back, “nobody wants to see that!”

	He took stock. There didn’t seem to be anything else on the island except for the chest. No red patches appeared so he felt reasonably sure there weren’t any traps. Loosening the ties on the wand, he cast its blue light all across the rock and the chest, but nothing flared white. He took a deep breath, hoping he wasn’t about to spring a high-level trap that his Pierce the Veil skill was too low to detect, and opened the chest. Nothing jumped out to kill him. He exhaled in relief. Looking in the large chest though, he was somewhat disappointed that there were only two items inside.

	You have found: Bone handle. Weight 0.9 kg. Durability 50/50. Item class: Common. Quality: Average.

	You have found: Red Key

	Richter was a bit disappointed by the meager haul. He had just been barbecued trying to get here after all! The bone handle was shaped like capital “L.” The longer portion had an iron cap at the end in the form of a square. Near the bend, the longer portion had a circular groove worn into it perpendicular to the bone. It was pretty clear what this was meant for. The key was about the size of Ricther’s hand and was made of a blood red metal. The bow of the key was a hollow square.

	He lifted his hands to close the lid, but then the faintest of blue glows caught his attention. Opening the lid back up, he stared at the underside and the blue glow strengthened. The bottom of the lid was lined in black cloth. Hoping that his skill Pierce the Veil skill color coordinated traps as red and secret compartments as blue, he ran his hands around the lid and found a loose corner. He pulled at the cloth, tearing it back stitch by stitch. Getting impatient, he used his crystal dagger to cut the edges. Once the fabric was cut free, all that he found was a piece of yellowed hide. He turned it over though, and saw the markings of a map.

	You have found: Map. Would you like to add this map to your Traveler’s Map? Yes or No?

	Richter selected ‘Yes’ and then accessed the map icon at the corner of his vision. The initial view was of the forest. The Mist Village was marked prominently and the dungeon they were in was marked as well. He focused on the dungeon icon, and the forest view disappeared. In its place was a multilevel view of the inside of the dungeon. Richter could see the antechamber, the long hall, the trap room, and the room they were all currently in now. The map showed even more though. As yet undiscovered tunnels, rooms and lower floors were now visible.

	Every time he used the Traveler’s Map he was blown away. The areas he had traveled through were portrayed in accurate colors; the long hallway was grey, made more so by what Richter thought of as the ‘fog of war’ effect. The map would only show in real time what he was currently looking at. The room he was now in was red contrasting with the blue water of the lake. Unexplored areas were only black and white. He zoomed in on the room he was in now. He saw the ledge his other party members were standing on, the lake with the rock island in the middle and the waterfall at the end of the room. The figures of Yoshi, Sion and Daniella were frozen on the map, but when he turned his head to look at them, the map adjusted their movements real time. This was awesome, he thought! Even more fascinating, was that behind the waterfall was a hidden room portrayed in black and white. At the back of that room, was a second large chest.

	Ohhhh, FML, he thought. Sion was already waving for him to come back. Richter looked the other way towards the waterfall. Just after the end of the island, the crystals resumed on the walls. They stopped at the waterfall, but the distance was at least 20 or 30% farther than the distance back to the ledge. Also, the room was black and white, who knew how old that information was? The hide map was old and the ink was faded, there might not even be anything back there… then again, that chest was big! And the fact that it was hidden behind the waterfall probably meant that whatever was still inside was important. This dungeon had already almost taken his life several times. His party would need all the help they could if they were going to get to get out of here alive. Well, he thought to himself, am I an AmeriCAN or an AmeriCAN’T? Richter made up his mind.

	He shouted to the sprites what he intended. Sion responded with several questions ranging from the quantity of fecal matter between his ears to whether Richter’s parentage involved one or more farm animals. Richter just gave him a thumbs up and got back to work.

	He secured his wand and blade again. He put the map, bone handle and key back in the chest. If he survived, he would grab them on the way back. Hoping that whatever was behind the falls was worth it, he dumped all six unused characteristic points into Agility. He needed to be faster.

	He wished he could make a running dive into the water, but the crystals started right after the rocky island he was standing on. He slid into the water and went through his breathing ritual again. After his third breath, he dropped fully into the water, braced his feet against the side of the rock and propelled himself forward at an angle.

	He kept up the same stroke as before. Many people would outsmart themselves trying to take shortcuts. They would try something new on the fly, hoping for a better result. Disciplined people knew outcomes were always up in the air to a certain extent. They relied on tried and true practices to see them through. Or put another way, you don’t run a new play at the end of the big game. Stroke, kick, stroke, kick. That was all he thought about.

	His increase in Agility did make a noticeable difference. He moved a bit easier through the water, and each kick took him slightly farther. It compensated for the extra length he was swimming. It just didn’t compensate enough. He was at least forty yards away from the frothing water of the falls when his stamina bar began dropping. He kept swimming, though. Kick, stroke, kick stroke. The effects of his decreasing stamina made him clumsy again. His rhythm was disrupted and his forward movement stalled. With his stamina was almost completely gone, it felt like he was moving through quicksand, and he was still at least ten yards away! He couldn’t go back to the surface, though. For all he knew the injuries he had received from the red lightning might have been on the lower end of its damage range. He had to keep going!

	Then his stamina fully depleted. The waterfall was right in front of him! With the lack of stamina though, he could barely move and his efforts seemed to do nothing at all. His health bar began dropping. It wasn’t steady decline of his stamina bar, though. It was better described as a red plummet towards death. At the rate it was decreasing, his entire 430 health points would be gone in less than ten seconds. And of course, the predictable pain came as well. The vice like grip on his lungs made him feel like he was being crushed in the fist of a vengeful god! The pressure in his lungs built and built. Rational thought left him, and despite his depleted stamina, and animal instinct deep inside of him awoke. He thrashed and kicked not even knowing if he was going in the right direction. He only knew he needed to live! A final kick moved him forward a meager foot, and then he was pushed down and forward by the force of the waterfall. He grabbed a rock on the cliff face in front of him and pulled himself upward, past the surface of the water and into clear air!

	Richter passed out.

	When he came to, he was laying on in a shallow pool behind waterfall. He screamed for the second time in an hour. His health bar was not as low as it was from the lightning strike, but still, the pain was horrible. He cast Slow Heal and resigned himself to the agony of the next ten minutes.

	When he finally got up he was standing in near complete darkness. The waterfall blocked almost all light from the outer chamber. He cast Night Vision and everything took on shades of green or black. The chamber he in was about five by fifteen yards. Looming above the level of the pool he was standing in was a ten-foot tall wall. It was only two yards in front of him and it ran the length of the room. In the middle of the wall was a set of large stairs leading up to the chest. The top of the wall formed a ledge the same elevation as the chest.

	Richter saw all of this in an instant, but was distracted by a skeleton that lay at the bottom of the stairs. It wore moldy clothing and various types of armor.

	Three thoughts went through Richter’s mind:

	 	1) Oh goodie, the treasure is still here.

	2) Oh shit, whatever killed that guy is probably going to kill me!

	3) Is this thing going to come alive and kill me?



	Poking it with his dagger pretty much ruled out the third point, but that didn’t completely set his mind at ease. If there is one thing that everyone who has played a dungeon crawler knew, it was that if you start seeing random skeletons, something deadly was in the neighborhood. He examined the room more closely. The skeleton was laying right in front of him. The stairway leading up to the chest had five steps total. As he looked at the steps, a red glow developed in front of the first step. Soon two more spots glowed red on the top of the second and the fourth step. There was no red glow on top of the first step, so it looked safe, but if when Richter examined the position of the skeleton it had one foot on top of the first step. Richter was missing something.

	He raised his wand and shone it in front of him. Just above the first step, a white glow appeared. It was strange seeing a white light when everything else was green from his Night Vision spell, but as long the wand warned him of danger, Richter wasn’t going to complain about the color scheme. A thin white line extended across the step like a laser. Leaning in, but staying well clear of the traps, Richter could see a small divot in the stone. Inset into that divot was a smaller version of the lightning crystals that lined the wall of the outer chamber. If it wasn’t glowing in the light of Richter’s wand, he never would have seen it.

	Tricky, tricky, Richter thought. Anyone seeing the first trap would jump over it and try to either disable the second trap or jump over it as well to the third step. Richter kept scanning the steps with the wand. If the booby-trappers were extremely crafty and devilish, they would put another lightning crystal rightttt… there it was! Embedded in the wall to the left of the third step was another lightning crystal. It sent a white line across that length of the step too. Richter was sure the fifth step was trapped as well.

	Okay, he thought. I found the traps they wanted me to find, and the traps they didn’t want me to find. Now where are the traps that kill me, because now I’m a cocky bastard? Not moving, he shone his light around and saw pale white lines crisscrossing the room. Some extended vertically, other horizontally and still more at random angles. Whoever had devised this cockamamie dungeon needed a good kick in the teeth! Richter was just glad that he had cast Night Vision and not Far Light. Who knew what he would have triggered if the ball of light had crossed one of the white beams. Maybe these crystals released an AoE spell and not just a straight bold of lightning. The only good thing was that there didn’t seem to be any white lines on the ledge the chest was sitting on.

	Richter slowly made his way to the right side of the chamber. He chose that direction because the density of white lines was less on that side. Once he got to the corner, he did a kick step that would have made Jackie Chan proud. Facing the corner, he jumped towards the wall on his left, kicked off with his left foot towards the other wall, landed his right foot on that wall, kicked off again and then used the last of his upward momentum to grab the lip of the ledge, pulling himself up.

	He hunched down shining his wand from his new vantage, but thankfully still didn’t see any other illumination on the rocky shelf he was laying on. The ceiling was only four feet above his head so he crab walked forward with the wand held in front of him. When he got closer to the chest, he saw a white glow above the chest, set into the wall. It was a crystal that looked different from the others he had seen, and there was no white line or sheet extending from it though. Examining it triggered a prompt.

	Activation crystal.

	Steeling himself, Richer placed his hand on the crystal.

	Would you like to deactivate defenses? Yes or No?

	“Yes,” Richter shouted as he mentally indicated his decision on the prompt. The activation crystal flared once, but nothing else happened. When Richter swung his wand over the room though, all of the white lines had disappeared. He took a deep breath and released it. Until that moment, he hadn’t realized how tense he had been for the last hour until that moment. The red glows on the steps were still there, but they were easily avoided.

	Now that the danger from the crystals was past, he cast Far Light several times. Then he got back to business. Richter stared at the chest for a solid five minutes and checked it with his wand at least three times. When no white lines or red glow appeared, though, he gingerly grabbed the front of the lid and pried it back. He smiled when it was fully open. It was time for his reward!

	You have found: Bag of coins.

	You have found: Magic bracelet.

	You have found: Magic Book.

	You have found: Magic Potion.

	You have found: Iron dagger. Damage 4-6. Durability 8/10. Item class: Common. Quality: Poor. Weight 1.0 kg.

	You have found: Studded leather gloves. Defense +4. Durability 14/14. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight 1.2 kg.

	You have found: Black Pearl

	You have found: Topaz

	Not at all bad, Richter thought with a smile. The simple gear was crap, but the contents of the chest should prove a good cash infusion for the village. Also, who knew how good the magic items would be? He emptied the chest and stared inside to make sure he couldn’t see any hidden compartments. He even ran his hands along the inside of it, but didn’t detect anything. He closed the chest once he had emptied it. Then he eased himself down off of the ledge, avoiding the steps all together. Richter had considered trying to pry the activation crystal out of the wall, but decided to leave well enough alone. He couldn’t take the chance that it would turn all of the lightning crystals back on.

	The last thing he had to do before swimming back was to examine the skeleton. Most of the clothing had rotted away, but several items remained.

	You have found: Ruby earring.

	You have found: Magic High Steel Dagger. Damage 9-11 (Max damage 11-13). Durability 19/25. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.5 kg.

	You have found: Magic Steel Dagger. Damage 7-9 (Max damage 8-11). Durability 16/20. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.6 kg.

	You have found: Runic Studded Leather Chest Plate. Defense +9. Type: Light Armor. Durability 30/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 4.2 kg

	You have found: Signet Ring. Durability 100/100. Item class: Rare. Quality: Masterwork. Weight: 0.3 kg

	You have found: Pouch.

	You have found: Bag of Coins.

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 15/15. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight: 0.1 kg

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 18/18. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg

	You have found: Magic Ring. Durability 25/27. Item class: Common. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg

	You have found: Magic Belt. Durability 35/35. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight: 0.8 kg.

	You have found: Diary. Durability 4/10. Item class: Common. Quality: Poor. Weight: 0.1 kg.

	You have found: Small picture. Durability 6/7. Item class: Common. Quality: Above average. Weight: 0.1 kg.

	It was a lot more than Richter was expecting. Who had this guy been? He obviously wasn’t just some average adventurer. The signet ring had a stylized K on top. It was made of multiple precious metals and was heavier than it looked. The magic items he put to the side, Futen would identify them soon enough.

	The diary was small like one of those pocket bibles they sold at every gas station in the Midwest. It was bound with faded red leather and a white K was on the front cover matching the signet ring except for a small “S” that was in the corner of the large letter. No time to dive into that now, he thought.

	The picture was only a finger length long. The frame was black metal and composed of three parts, a larger middle piece which the picture was set in and two smaller pieces that hinged like double doors, blocking the picture from view when closed. The picture was of a smiling young woman. It was clearly a treasured keepsake of the fallen adventurer. He placed it in his Bag. The bag of coins was full to bursting and not a small amount was gold. There were also three gold bars like the ones that Hafiz had given him. Each bar was worth one hundred gold coins!

	As happy as Richter was to find the money, though, the other pouch was equally wonderful.

	You have found: Lock picks. Durability 25/25. Item class: Common. Quality: Superb. Weight: 0.01 kg. x 30

	You have found: Dart trap. Damage 3-5. Durability 10/10. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. x 2

	The leather armor had a white circle attached to the front. The disc was about four inches across and had a glyph carved into it. The glyph shone white in the wand’s light, and the quality of the armor was quite good, but otherwise it was unremarkable.

	Richter gave the chamber a final once over, and then walked towards the waterfall. The cave extended farther to the side than the waterfall reached on the left. He was able to look out over the lake. He hailed the sprites who shouted and cheered once again. Shining his wand across the water, he didn’t see any sheets of white anymore. Just to be sure he cast Ice Dagger. The one-foot long ice projectile flew forward, past the first crystal and then second. No red lightning shot out to atomize it. Richter smiled and dove into the water.

	He enjoyed the easy swim this time, and just made nice leisurely strokes. There was no way he could bring all of the loot with him during the swim, and anyway, it would have risked damaging the diary. Instead, he just piled the loot from the chest with what he found on the skeleton. He left it all on a dry spot well back from the waterfall. He would have to swim back with his Bag of Holding and load up. When he got back to the ledge, and Yoshi helped pull him out of the water.

	“Was it worth it,” the sword adept asked.

	“I think so,” Richter said. He explained what had happened from disarming the lightning crystals to finding the loot. He left out his second brush with death. No reason to get people upset, he thought. They all made camp on the ledge for the night. It made sense with the access to fresh water.

	Richter pulled the sleep rolls from his Bag and then jumped back into the water. The swim back and forth didn’t take too long, and he stopped at the island to grab the bone handle, map and key.

	When he was in the final stretch back, he noticed that on the far wall, one of the lightning crystals was set low near the water line. He knew it was a bone head idea, but he couldn’t help himself. He swam over and examined it. The crystal looked like a clear pyramid. It was set into a black circular bracket, which was in turn set into the wall. Being so close to the destructive device made him uneasy, but the potential reward was well worth it. Before he could second guess himself, he grabbed a rocky protrusion on the wall to anchor himself, and with his other hand drew his glass dagger.

	“What are you doing,” Sion shouted.

	“It’ll be fine,” Richter shouted back. Then he focused on the task at hand.

	First, he tried wedging the blade into the space between the pyramid and the bracket. The tip of the knife couldn’t find purchase. It seemed that the bracket was set snuggly over the crystal like a hilt over a blade, and the pyramid continued on past what was visible from the outside. Next, he tried to fit the blade between the bracket and the wall. The entire rim was set flush with the wall, though, and he didn’t make any headway. That left only one choice. Hoping that the durability of the glass dagger he started stabbing it into the junction between the wall and the bracket. After several strikes, the first chips of rock fell free. Taking that as a good sign, he kept at it. After ten minutes he had made a small hole in the wall that revealed an empty space. He wedged the knife into the hole widening it until a portion of the blade could fit behind the bracket. Then, making sure he was braced well on the wall, he applied as much pressure as his 29 points of Strength allowed. His muscles strained and veins started to bulge in his neck. With a loud crunch, the pyramid came free of the wall.

	The circular bracket fell away. It turned out to be nothing more than a rim of metal. The crystal was actually a double pyramid, the half that had been hidden in the wall, a mirror image of the portion that had been sticking out. Richter looked at the item in dismay. The crunch he had heard had apparently been made not just by the wall giving way, but also by his glass dagger piercing the pyramid. An irregular hole marred the surface of the crystal, destroying it symmetry. Gritting his teeth in irritation, Richter swam the rest of the way back to the ledge with the device held out of the water.

	When he was back on the ledge he examined it closely.

	You have found: Lightning Prism (broken). Durability 47/80. Item class: Epic. Quality: Exquisite. Weight: 3.7 kg. The Prism is a marvel of magic and technology. It will focus raw magic into a bolt of extreme damage and power. This prism has been damaged, and cannot be used.

	He looked into the small hole and saw thin clear filaments creating a delicate web inside of the double pyramid. Sighing at the loss of such an artifact, he put it into his Bag anyway. Maybe something could come of it later. The sprites were gnawing on jerky, watching him moon over his broken toy. Alma was eating too, but it was clear from the glares she was shooting his way that she still wasn’t happy about the dried meat.

	“Congratulations,” Yoshi said. “You found junk.”

	Richter just glared at him before quickly drying off. Then he donned his underclothes and armor. He would have preferred to sleep without it, but this dungeon was no joke. He wouldn’t be caught wearing just his skibbies if the eaters came back. He laid down on his sleep roll to just relax a moment, but was soon fast asleep.





CHAPTER 18




	Richter woke an undetermined amount of time later. He shivered slightly in the cool air. The temperature was lower near the water than it was in the central chamber. With nothing to burn though, they had to make do without a fire. He took stock of himself. A flashing prompt showed that his Endurance had increased by +1 from his exertions. When he sat up, he heard a squawk and he got a stream of air in his face. Alma flew up from where she had been sleeping on his armored chest and glared at him from midair. Waving away his prima donna familiar, he looked around and saw Daniella looking at him.

	“How long was I out?”

	“Five or six hours,” she said. “Yoshi and Sion already took a shift standing guard. I’m just starting mine.”

	“Why don’t you lay down for a bit longer,” Richter said. “I won’t be able sleep anymore, and besides, I feel completely rested.”

	“Are you sure,” she asked. At Richter’s nod, she smiled and laid back down on her sleep roll.

	He called Futen over and removed the items he needed identified. He started with the loot from the chest. The remnant flared white, and then Richter knew the items’ properties.

	You have found: Shadow High Steel Dagger. Damage 9-11 (Max damage 11-13). Durability 19/25. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.5 kg. Ignores 10% of target’s defense.

	You have found: Steel Dagger of Life. Damage 7-9 (Max damage 8-11). Durability 16/20. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.6 kg. Bestows +1 life damage upon successful strike (+5 to Death creatures). Charges 20/20.

	You have found: Bracelet of Health. Durability 10/10. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Traits: Increase maximum Health by +40.

	You have found: Book of Minor Life Aura. Surrounds the caster’s body with the aura Life magic. This is aura will cause damage to Death creatures if there is direct contact, and will cause lesser Death creatures to shy away.

	Richter wasted no time in reading the spell book. Just as with previous books, the pages began turning faster and faster, until the book was done. It crumpled to dust, and Richter had a new spell.

	You have learned the spell: Minor Life Aura. The caster’s body is surrounded by a golden shield of pure Life energy. Any nearby Death, dead or undead creatures will be discomforted. Any actual contact with the shield will cause damage to the undead. Cost 50 mana. Duration: 15 minutes. Range: self. Cast time: 2 seconds. Cooldown: 20 minutes.

	Last but not least, the potion:

	You have found: Potion of Luck. Taking this potion will increase Luck by +30 for one hour.

	The new spell alone was worth the effort of getting behind the waterfall! When you added the potion, there was no doubt in Richter’s mind that he had made the right choice. He pulled out the items from the skeleton. Futen flashed white again.

	You have found: Minor Ring of Stealth. Durability 15/15. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. +8 to concealment while stealthed.

	You have found: Fish Ring. Durability 18/18. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Allows wearer to breathe underwater for three minutes.

	You have found: Minor Stamina Ring. Durability 25/27. Item class: Common. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. +30 to stamina

	You have found: Sustenance Belt. Durability 35/35. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight: 0.8 kg. The belt makes your body more efficient in managing its basic needs. While wearing this belt, you require 50% less sleep and 50% less food and water.

	Hmmm, whoever that skeleton had been, these items seemed like a bit of a cheat. Fish Ring? Way not to almost die twice making it to the waterfall, guy! Richter shook off his grudging feelings that the adventurer hadn’t had to go through what he himself just had. After all, the guy was, well, dead.

	He instead focused upon his good haul. Overall, the items would be more than useful. What was really strange was the amount of money the man was carrying. The signet ring indicated he was some type of nobility, but still, he was walking around with more three hundred gold coins. That equated to more than thirty thousand bucks!

	Last, Richter examined the leather armor with the rune attached.

	You have found: Runic Studded Leather Chest Plate. Defense +8. Type: Light Armor. Durability 30/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 4.2 kg. Contains rune of Chuthriom.

	A rune of Chuthriom? Well, Richter thought, that’s certainly helpful information! Except, not at all since he didn’t know what a ‘Rune’ or a ‘Chuthriom’ was. Shrugging, Richter shoved it back into his Bag. Having nothing else to do, Richter opened the diary. The strange squiggles resolved into legible words after a moment or two. The book turned out to be a play by play of the man’s life. It mostly confirmed what Richter had already suspected. He was a noble. More than that, he was part of the ruling family of Kailand. If Richter remembered correctly, that was a country on the western side of the River Peninsula.

	There was frustratingly no mention of the adventurer’s name, but that wasn’t too surprising. How often would someone write their own name in a diary? Someone named ‘Kerita’ was mentioned prominently, though. Richter skipped to the end, having no real desire to delve into the man’s personal life. Only the last few pages were about the dungeon. He had been searching for some artifact that mattered to his family. It didn’t say what it was, he only referred to it as “The Link.”

	Richter put the diary away. He was sure that Randy would make better sense of it than he could. He decided to do something he had been putting off recently. He pulled out the book of magic history that Leandra had sold him and started to read. He had left off when the book was talking about ‘The Basic Elements.’ The same topic Zarr had touched on before.

	The Basic Elements are the most widespread use of Power in The Land. This is because of the readily available sources of this type of magic that cross The Land as ley lines. The Basic Elements are Dark, Light, Earth, Air, Water, Fire, Death, and Life. Each Element has its own strengths and weaknesses. It is often said that Light and Life are the province of good, and Death and Dark are the domain of evil. All Powers are neutral, however. The ill or good that each power may cause lies in practioner…

	Richter kept reading for the next few hours until the sprites woke up. As per usual, the sprites seemed to have no interest in the loot. He did give Yoshi half of the higher quality lock picks, but they wanted nothing else. Richter really appreciated being with The Land’s version of a socialist hippie. It definitely made his pockets fatter, but he did find it creepy to be with people who didn’t want money. How could you ever trust someone who didn’t want to cheat you?

	Richter donned the Bracelet of Health and put the rest of the items back into his inventory. He showed the sprites the contents of the first chest, and all agreed it was obvious the handle was meant to open the bone door. No one had a better idea of how to use the key than Richter, but agreed it would most likely come in handy down the road. They all broke camp and started walking back towards the central chamber.

	Yoshi and Richter led their other two party members along the path of disabled traps, and soon they were standing in front of the bone door again. Richter inserted the long part of the handle into the door’s recessed cavity, lining up the metal square at the end with the recessed square imprint he had seen earlier. Right after the handle touched the metal indentation, four triangular blades of bone slammed into the handle. They converged on the groove in the bone. The tips of each had a smaller circular indentation still allowing the handle to turn. Any one that had stuck a hand inside the door, though would have lost that part of their appendage. Richter turned to Yoshi with a smug expression on his face, the sword adept just stared back stone-faced.

	“Everybody ready,” Richter asked, gripping the handle. He was about to turn it to open the door when Yoshi stopped him.

	“Wait, remember the inscription. ‘remove the distractions of the past or suffer the error of youth. Death comes on swift wings, causing a terrible storm,’ Yoshi recited from memory. Richter stared at him impressed. The adept just stared back and said, “I’m nice like that.”

	“So what does it mean,” Daniella asked.

	“I’m not completely sure, but think about the phrase ‘distractions of the past.’ Look what is behind us. A floor still full of traps. If we need to retreat when we open that door, we will be in an extremely bad position.”

	Richter’s stomach fell, “You’re not saying-”

	“We need to disarm the rest of the traps,” Yoshi said.

	Richter looked at the seemingly countless circles left to disarm on the floor and groaned. It took three more days to disable all of the traps. Except for Alma driving them all to distraction the days passed without incident. Thankfully, Richter figured out that if ordered it, Futen would let himself be chased by the psi dragonling, which kept her occupied. It was actually kind of fun watching her zip through the air after the glowing orb.

	Richter’s Pierce the Veil, Trap and Trap Disarm skill reached level 20 and went beyond. He took a Potion of Clarity each day, so he got the bonus 25%. The 12,500 experience points brought over the top, and he reached level 15! Also, even though the experience from each disarmed trap was modest, it added up over time. A final cherry on top was that he gained five more traps.

	You have found: Razor Wire Trap. Does 11-14 damage. Durability 8/8. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight 0.1 kg. Once triggered, three razor sharp wires crisscross at ankle level. Possibly will cause Hobble status.

	You have found: Dart trap. Damage 5-7. Durability 10/10. Item class: Common. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Once triggered, will fire a dart. x 2

	You have found: Sticky Trap. Durability 7/7. Item class: Rare. Quality: Above Average. Weight 0.1 kg. Once triggered, will trigger explosion of sticky threads that have a chance to immobilize anyone within ten feet of the trap.

	You have found: Shrink Trap. Durability 15/15. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.3 kg. Will cast Shrink on the creature that triggered it. Creature’s size is halved. Spell lasts twenty minutes.

	When they were finally done, something unexpected happened. The center of the room had been the only part of the room devoid of random shapes. It was instead a golden eight-pointed star about two feet across.

	When Richter deactivated the final trap, the star rose into the air. It turned out the star was only the top of an entire column of gold colored metal. When it stopped rising, it filled the room with light the color of honey. When Richter examined it, two prompts came up.

	Pillar of Life. Lvl 3. Stationary object that emits the Light of Life.

	You have been exposed to the Light of Life. All Healing 30% more effective. Special abilities of Death creatures negated. Extra damage to creatures of Death.

	That effects from the column were remarkably like the Life Aura spell. It seemed Yoshi was right about needing to clear the traps before opening the skeleton door. Coupled with the fact that he had found the Life dagger in the chest behind the waterfall, Richter had no doubt that the Life Magic was going to important for whatever they were about to face.

	Richter called Alma down from her fun with Futen. She landed on his shoulders, tail wrapping around his arm. Everyone had taken a Potion of Clarity, and he had given another to Alma. Sion cast Haste on himself and Daniella. Richter did the same for Yoshi and himself. He then cast Barkskin and Minor Life Aura. The last two spells made Richter’s skin feel thicker and surrounded his entire figure in a golden glow, respectively. He wished he could have taught the aura spell to Yoshi and Daniella, both of whom said they could use Life magic. As he lacked Mastery in Life magic, though, it wasn’t possible. He considered replacing his sword for his bow but decided having two melee fighters was a better idea. Sion and Daniella would provide the ranged backup.

	Richter had Futen hover in front of him again. Even though the remnant wasn’t needed for light anymore, Richer still intended for him to lead the way. Yoshi stood next to Richter, with Sion and Daniella behind, bows nocked. With his sword in his right hand, Richter turned the handle with his left.

	A gale of wind exploded from the door as soon as the handle was turned. The door slammed against the nearby wall, the bones falling apart from the impact. The force of the gust took the entire party off of its feet. They flew back several yards before landing in a heap. Richter threw his sword to the side before he landed, afraid of inadvertently hurting himself or his comrades. Luckily Alma launched into the air and wasn’t crushed beneath them.

	The wind continued to blow for a solid minute. Even though they landed a good way away from the doorway, the force of the air coming at them was still strong enough to keep them from standing upright or opening their eyes. The all huddled on their knees with their arms held in front of their faces until the miniature hurricane subsided.

	Once the wind stopped, they got back to their feet. All that was left of the skeleton door was a pile of bones strewn across the floor. A wailing could be hear coming from the tunnel, and it was getting louder. They all gathered their weapons and prepared to meet whatever was coming. By silent agreement, they positioned themselves as far from the skeleton door as possible. The wailing grew more shrill as, whatever they were, came into the room!

	The light from the golden column only extended about fifteen yards, and it left the end of the room shrouded in shadow. There was enough light to see their dark forms if only barely. They looked like nothing so much as floating black cloaks with hoods raised. No legs or feet protruded from the bottom of the cloaks, but they did have hands. Two black arms extended from each cloak. They didn’t hold any weapons. Their hands were oversized and were tipped with black talons. The insides of their cloaks were pure blackness, and nothing could be seen of their bodies. The wailing grew in pitch now that they were in the room.

	Both Daniella and Sion fired imbued arrows immediately. The creatures they shot at disappeared right before impact, the arrows flying past and impacting against the wall. The monsters reappeared a moment later and kept flowing forward at the speed of a brisk walk. The others didn’t pause and still moved forward undaunted. Richter used Analzye.

	Fade. Level 14. Health 310. Mana 150. Stamina 180. Disposition: Hatred. Fades are the tortured souls of the once living. They have a hatred for all life and rend it with their hardened talons at every opportunity. It is said that those killed by a Fade are destined to become Fades themselves.

	The fades continued forward, and several more arrows were shot with no better result. Richter had no idea how they were going to kill close to twenty of the spectral creatures, but he would go down swinging if it came to it. He and Yoshi readied themselves to attack an enemy that could disappear at will when the first fades crossed within fifteen yards of the golden column. The light made them appear more substantial than before, then two things happened. One, the fades raised their hands against the light and slowed, hissing in pain. Two, Sion and Daniella’s imbued arrows struck the chest of a fade, and it didn’t disappear! The thing wailed even louder, and the blackness on the inside of its cloak and cowl lessened somewhat showing the faint outline of a skeleton.

	Richter turned to Yoshi, “They are vulnerable while they are near the light. We can’t let them get to the other side!”

	The two melee fighters waited within the light for the fades to come within reach. The light slowed the monsters enough for Sion and Daniella to be able to whittle down their number. Sion struck the already injured fade again, and it collapsed into ash. It took twenty seconds for the fades to cross the range of the light. In that time, five more fades were destroyed. Richter was surprised that creatures with such high health were dispatched so easily. He checked the combat log from one of Sion’s strikes though, and saw that the light from the column gave a 300% damage bonus against Death creatures! There was no more time for further investigation. The battle was joined!

	Yoshi had both swords out. He slashed down and to the left with both blades. The fade he struck wailed piteously as the blue blades slashed across it. He ducked under the swipe of its claws and then spun to the right, bringing one blade straight up in a vertical line. The creature crumpled to ash.

	Richter was at his side and attacked with the Life dagger. While the sprite’s arrows were more than effective, and Yoshi’s ice swords made short work of his enemy, the dagger when coupled with Richter’s Minor Life Aura was cataclysmic!

	He cast Soul Trap right before he began his attack. He lunged toward the first fade with the dagger leading in his right hand, and his glass dagger held in a high cross guard. He caught the fade’s overhand swipe on the dagger. The blade bit deep into the monster’s wrist. It bent the same hand forward and scraped the back of his arm with its talons. Richter’s bracer and gauntlet stopped the damage almost completely. He only suffered a small gouge at the break between the two pieces of armor. Immediately after blocking with the glass dagger, he drove his Life dagger into the center of the fade. It punched straight through and out of the back of monster. The part of Richter’s arm that was inside the fade felt intensely cold, like he was plunging his arm into a lake that had frosted over. With a strong twist of his left wrist, the glass dagger separated the fade’s hand from its body. The falling hand was ash before it struck the ground. At the same time, he yanked the Life dagger up and to the side. The frozen feeling vanished as the fade dissipated. Richter was left covered in the specter’s remains. The rainbow torrent of light from its captured soul swirled around him for a spilt-second before disappearing into his Bag.

	Sion and Daniella had spilt to stand in opposite corners so they could keep firing with minimal risk to the melee fighters. While Richter and Yoshi had destroyed their first enemies, they had continued shooting imbued arrows. Sion was supporting Yoshi’s side and was focusing on one enemy at a time, destroying each with three to five shots. Daniella was instead spreading her shots out among the enemies. Each arrow staggered the fade it impacted and kept Richter from being swarmed. It was definitely the right strategy. While Richter’s Life dagger was deadly to the fades, he was still not as dangerous as the sword adept wielding his ice swords.

	Yoshi spun between two fades. He ducked his head to avoid the swipe of one their claws and extended his blades straight out swiping through the monsters. Both shrieked and fell away from the stinging blows before coming towards him again with a vengeance. He wove one blade in a flourished figure eight, keeping the monster on his left at bay. The fade on his right however, scored a hit on Yoshi’s back. He rolled with the blow and flung himself forward towards a third fade. He plunged both blades into the front of the fade’s cloak. At least two feet each blade sank into the creature, but nothing protruded from its back. No matter where the blades went though, they clearly caused a great amount of pain and damage. The creatures wail became a shriek. He yanked both blades opposite to one another, first diagonally and then horizontally. The fade collapsed into particles of soot.

	The sword adept bent one arm over his head, placing a blade behind his back vertically. The sword arrived just in time to block the attack of one of his first opponents. Once he had stopped the blow, Yoshi drew his arm up and forward scoring deeply against the inside of the fade’s palm. It withdrew its hand, and he turned quickly lowering his body to stab low in the monster’s cloak. As he stood he brought his hands together, fist to fist. His blades spun in a pinwheel striking the fade twice and sending it off to whichever hell it had come from.

	The first fade Yoshi had attacked rushed towards him and struck. It hit him in the chest, wrapping its arms around his chest and lifting the half-human up in the air. Yoshi was crushed against the frigid netherspace in the center of the cloak. He screamed in pain, straining his neck to keep his face free of the fade’s cold center. One of his arms was trapped against his side by the fade’s embrace, but his other blade was free. Yoshi reversed his grip on sword, and drove it through the monster’s neck and down into its body. The fade shrieked, and released its grip. He released his sword, leaving it stuck in the fades ephemeral body. With his remaining weapon, he slashed. Once, twice, thrice! Both of its arms fell to dust and then the adept drove his sword into the monster’s chest. As it completely turned to ash, Yoshi caught his falling blade before it could strike the ground.

	Meanwhile, Richter was busy fighting for his life on the other side of the column. He swiped a fade his Life dagger and missed. His followup swipe missed as well. The fade struck at his leg gouging three furrows into the back of his thigh. Luckily they were shallow, and he wasn’t hamstrung. As he fell to the ground, blood flowed freely down his calf and into his boot though. When he hit the ground, the fade was looming over him. He threw his glass dagger at the fade and it struck his cloaked foes shoulder. The thing hissed and reared back. He scrambled to his feet.

	Another fade surged forward, arms extended. Richter grabbed one by the wrist and hacked at its arm with the Life dagger. He got to sever his second monster hand in the fight. The monster reared back, but Richter didn’t let it get away. He drove his golden weapon into its face, killing it. Unfortunately, the distraction of dispatching the second fade, let his first opponent strike his leg again. It tore deep into the same thigh, and the limb collapsed under him. It followed him to the floor and took another swing with its talons outstretched. Richter swung his knife across his body, causing himself even more searing agony as he wrenched his leg. The blade sank easily into the fade’s dinner plate sized hand. It predictably wailed in pain and tried to retreat from the pain of the Life dagger. Richter saw the glass dagger still sticking from its shoulder, though. He reached out and grabbed the hilt with his free hand. As it stood, he maintained his grip and it pulled him upright. The strength of the monster was the only reason he could stand on his ruined leg. He yanked the Life dagger out of its hand and drove it into fade three times in quick succession. As he listened to its death shriek, he shouted, “How you like me now?!”

	It disintegrated in front of him, and he collapsed back to the ground. He caught himself with his arms before he collapsed completely, but another fade reached for him barely a foot away. Its claws were so close that he knew there would be no chance to avoid its attack. He braced for the pain of black talons ripping out his throat, but then two imbued arrows struck it. The backlash of the impact knocked him flat and robbed him of some health, but he was still rewarded with the sight of the monster being knocked into the air. A dark blue streak crossed Richter’s vision, and it transformed into one of Yoshi’s swords. The sword adept’s blade struck the fade in the chest, and with a last wail it collapsed into dust.

	Richter invoked the healing power of his ring, trying to look everywhere at once. All the fades had been vanquished and everything was silent. Richter cast Slow Heal and drank a healing potion, laying his head back onto the ground. It was eerily quiet after the specters’ wails, but only for a moment. He started to laugh and threw his fist into the air.

	The motion reminded him of one of his first fights in The Land. He had killed a wolf that had been inches from ripping his throat out. After he had stabbed it to death, he been left lying on his back. Richter had thrown a fist into the air in celebration, just like he was doing now. Immediately afterwards however, he had been torn apart by two more wolves that he hadn’t seen. Sion might have been able to save him, but the sprite had just stood by let him be killed. Even though the sprite was physically nearby, Richter had died horribly and alone. That wasn’t the way of things anymore, though.

	Looking at the three sprites who had just saved his life, he knew he wasn’t alone, and as long as Sion lived, he would never be alone again. He locked eyes with his Companion and nodded. The sprite nodded back, a sure smile on his face. Richter looked back at the ceiling and laughed again, “My name is Richter you buttheads! You mess with me; you mess with my boys!”





CHAPTER 18




	Richter healed himself over the next five minutes. By the time he had gotten back onto his feet, Daniella had healed Yoshi from his cold burns and Sion from a swipe he had taken across the abdomen. The blow must have been hard because it had scored the sprite’s is armor and punctured it in one place. Sion didn’t seem any the worse for wear though and was walking around to the piles of dust the fades had left. He sifted through the ash and scooped a pinch of a sparkling purple powder into an empty vial.

	Richter looked at the pile of ash at his feet. Slowly sifting through the dust, he found a small amount of the purple dust as well. Examining it, a prompt appeared. His rank as an apprentice in Herb Lore came into play, teaching him three potential uses.

	You have found: Spectral Dust. You have the feeling this could be used in an invisibility potion, a spectral poison, or the component of making a Blur item.

	He examined the other prompts that came up during the fight.

	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Dual Wield. You can use a weapon in both hands. Accuracy decreased in both hands, worse in nondominant hand. At least one weapon must qualify as a light weapon until skill is leveled appropriately. Ignoring this constraint will greatly increase drop in accuracy.

	Richter looked closer at his combat log from when he was fighting with both daggers. Accuracy was decreased 25% in his right hand and 50% in his left! No wonder he had been missing so much!

	Congratulations! You have reached level 2 in Small Blades. +2% attack speed. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached level 4 in Life Magic. New spells are now available.

	The bump in attack speed was nothing to sneeze at. All things being equal, daggers and short swords would likely never completely match longer weapons in raw damage potential, but if you were able to make twice as many attacks in the same amount of time, then who cared?

	Richter let Sion collect all of the spectral dust since. He made sure to tell the sprite about the three qualities he had identified. The fades hadn’t dropped any other loot. Alma dropped down to his shoulders. He had told her to remain above the fray with Futen. The temperamental psi dragonling had of course ignored him, and he had seen her sweeping down to use her psi blast. Unfortunately, it had no effect on the fades, perhaps because they were pure spirits. She had narrowly avoided being caught on razor sharp claws. After that she had decided the smart move might be to hover above the fray.

	The party gathered and looked at the open skeleton doorway. Richter convinced the others to remain behind while he scouted ahead. The plan was for Futen to turn invisible, and lead the way. When Futen had first been summoned, he couldn’t be more than one hundred yards from Richter if they weren’t in the village. That range seemed to have expanded to more than twice that. Either way, Richter didn’t want the remnant more than one hundred yards ahead. If there were any more lightning crystals or other magical traps, Futen could come to a bad end.

	Richter moved to the doorway, cast Night Vision, and then walked into the dark hallway. He tried to activate his stealth skill, but was unsuccessful. More accurately, he could Stealth but the “eye gauge” remained wide open. When he was in stealth mode, if he was successfully hidden then an icon with a closed eye appeared at the corner of his vision. The less effective he was in concealing himself, the wider the eye grew until it was fully open. The eye was still green meaning he wasn’t being directly visualized by an enemy, but he was a bit concerned that his ability was on the fritz. Suddenly he realized there was more light in the tunnel than there should be. Slapping his hand to his forehead, he dismissed Minor Life Aura. After that, he was easily able to cloak himself in shadow. Between Futen as his early warning system, and the shadows hiding him from view, he felt well protected.

	The hallway was made of long bones. Richter had to be careful of his footing, the knobs at the end of each bone made walking somewhat treacherous. He walked slowly though and avoided any noisy falls. He continued walking straight for a bit less than half an hour, and then the hallway opened up into a large stone room.

	Horizontal alcoves were carved into the walls. Any given section of wall had three stacked, floor to ceiling. Most were filled with corpses or skeletons. What captured Richter’s attention though, was the mass of fades in the room. There were multiple dooways leading off at odd points from the chamber. The fades were slowly moving in and out of the room and into the adjacent corridors. At most there were fourteen or fifteen in the room at one time, but sometimes there were only five.

	Richter mentally summoned Futen back, and then made his way back to the rest of the party. He related what he had found, and a quick discussion ensued. They didn’t have a sure way to attack the creatures since they could phase in and out. The best option would be to draw them back into the central chamber, and into the light of the column. Richter had the best movement speed, and so it was decided that he would draw the fades. The other three situated themselves in the light of the column at the far end from the skeleton door.

	Richter was about to start walking back down the bone hallway when Yoshi stopped him. “I saw you recharge the wand. Do you have any spare soul stones to do the same for my swords?” Richter nodded and Yoshi handed him one of his swords. At first it showed up as ‘Magic sword,’ but Futen flared and Richter got to see the weapon’s real stats.

	Quicksilver Rapier of Frost. Damage 32-41. Durability 86/100. Item class: Rare. Quality: Exquisite. Weight 1.9 kg. +5 Frost Damage per strike (+12 vs. Fire creatures). Charges 48/70.

	Richter’s eyes widened at the weapons stats. He looked at Yoshi, who gave him a smug look, then closed both eyes nodding slightly. Richter just chuckled a bit. No matter how much he and the adept fought, they apparently had one thing in common. They both liked a good blade.

	Richter willed one of his basic soul stones to power Yoshi’s sword. The ribbon of light flowed into the weapon, replenishing fifteen charges. Richter figured that was enough for now, and handed the sword back. He did the same for Yoshi’s other blade, replenishing twelve charges. He could have maxed the charges out on both, but only had two basic soul stones left. He decided to use one more basic stone on his Life dagger, bringing it back up to full charge. He checked to see what the Fade had awarded him, and was pleased to see that he had captured a common level soul.

	Once he was done with his enchanting duties, Richter went back down the hallway with an invisible Futen leading the way. He made his way back to the room unmolested.

	When the four of them were discussing the best way to proceed, they had decided to draw the smallest amount of fades as possible. He watched for several minutes until only six fades were present. Not wasting any time, he shot the closest with his bow. Surprisingly, it didn’t phase out of view. It must be an active ability, Richter realized, meaning the fade had to will it to happen. The arrow struck and immediately they all began their horrible wailing.

	The fades moved towards him, but again not overly fast. Richter retreated up the tunnel. He would run twenty or thirty yards, and then stop, waiting for them to close part of the distance. He didn’t want to lose them. He kept firing back periodically. His first shot missed as the fade phased out of sight. He learned that if he targeted the same fade again in succession, though, his arrow would connect. Thankfully, it seemed that their ability had a cool down period.

	Once Richter made it back to the central chamber, he dismissed Night Vision and rejoined the sprites. He quickly recast his buffs, and then turn to meet the fades. The monsters didn’t even make it to the central column. Once they were within the radius of the light, they slowed just like the previous slain fellows had. Under the fire of three bows, soon all that remained were piles of dust.

	Richter repeated the process five more times. On his seventh trip down the tunnel, he watched the chamber that he had been drawing the fades from for ten minutes, but he didn’t see any more activity. Futen also didn’t see any as he invisibly searched the side rooms, so Richter felt relatively safe that all of the fades had been dispatched.

	He collected the sprites, and soon they were all standing back in the sepulcher.

	“So who is up for a bit of grave robbing,” Richter asked, gleefully rubbing his hands together. They split into two groups, Yoshi and Daniella in one, him and Sion in the other. That way each group had someone with the Pierce the Veil skill. Richter and Sion explored the right side of the room. His wand was out and the blue light swept every surface. Nothing flared white, though. They began to inspect each skeleton and found a collection of copper and silver coins. Every so often they found a semi-precious gem.

	The doorway to the next room led to another crypt chamber with three more doorways leading off. They looted the chamber and the ones to the right and left. When they approached the doorway of the last room though, it wasn’t a simple stone arch like the rest. It was at least twice as wide as the others and was constructed from a type of matte black stone. Sion and Richter could easily see into the room, illuminated by Futen’s light, and the Far Light balls Richter cast periodically. The bodies were much better preserved than they had been in the previous rooms. There was no sign of obvious decay, the corpses just looked desiccated. Each was wearing hide or leather armor and had a weapon either at its side or crossed over its chest. The alcoves were also upright as opposed to horizontal. Four armored corpses stool sentinel on either side of a central closed crypt. Richter used Analyze.

	Draugh Elite Guard. Level 18. Health 740. Magic 0. Stamina 390. Draugh are warriors who willingly consign a portion of their souls to be bound to their bodies after death. All personality and individuality are gone, but what remains is a fierce determination to protect the place of their rest. For this reason, draugh are normally placed to protect the burial chambers of their former masters. Beware the fierce strength of the undead.

	Sion was about to step into the room when Richter grabbed his shoulder and pulled him back.

	“Something not good is going to happen if we step in there,” Richter said.

	“How do you know?”

	“You mean other than the fact that there are eight undead warriors guarding a crypt which clearly has a boss inside?”

	Sion looked at him sheepishly, “Well if you say it like that, then of course it sounds like a dumb idea.”

	“Let’s just go find the others.”

	Richter and Sion walked back towards where they had split with Yoshi and Daniella only to find the sprites were already walking back towards them as well. Yoshi had made a makeshift torch with what looked like a bit of old cloth wrapped around the head of a leg bone.

	“We found something,” Yoshi said. Daniella handed over what she and Yoshi had collected from the bodies. It looked to be the same type of loot that Richter and Sion had found. He put it in his Bag.

	“Us too,” Richter replied. He told the sword adept about what they had found. Yoshi nodded.

	“There is a room this way,” Yoshi said pointing back the way he had come. “It has a chest in the center, but the room is absolutely bristling with traps.”

	“Show me,” Richter said.

	Yoshi led the way through three rooms still holding the leg bone aloft. Richter asked him if he planned to wash his hands before he ate. Yoshi just looked back at him with a deadpan expression and kept walking. Richter couldn’t resist annoying the half-sprite by shooting a ball of light ahead of them, just to prove how useless the torch was. Yoshi ignored him.

	After passing through a few rooms, they arrived at a doorway lined with white stone. It was larger than the other doorways in what looked to be exactly the same proportions as the black doorway leading to the boss room. Richter gazed inside. At first, nothing special jumped out at him, but then random flag stones began to glow red. The chest itself glowed red as well. No magic glowed in the room, other than the chest itself.

	Richter looked at Yoshi and said, “Let’s get to work.”

	It took a little over two hours to disarm the traps in the room. Richter was definitely able to deal with traps faster than he had a few days ago. There were a few traps to the side of the room that they could have avoided, but Yoshi figured better safe than sorry. The gold column had only appeared when they had disabled all the traps in the central chamber after all, and there was no denying that the Light of Life had been pivotal in defeating the fades. The adept also raised the point that the initial wind that blew them down once they had opened the skeleton door would have made them land on traps if there hadn’t all been disarmed. If they hadn’t taken the time to remove potential dangers before proceeding, it would almost certainly have meant all of their deaths.

	Once they had finished with the floor, that only left the chest. Richter hoped it would be an easy task, but doubted it. It had taken Killik and Leandra an entire night to safely open the chest from the Night Blades’ hideout. He looked at Yoshi who had a stern look on his face as examined the chest. The sword adept looked up and said, “I will need some time.”

	Richter nodded and stepped back. Yoshi had started moving towards the chest when Futen spoke.

	“I would advise against touching the chest”

	“Why,” Richter asked.

	“There are protective wards set on the chest, my Lord.”

	“Show me.”

	The light at the heart of the remnant glowed brighter, and a series of overlapping circles appeared on the chest. It looked like some interwove, and other were merely laid on top or bottom of the others. Yoshi not only arrested his forward movement but jumped back sharply at seeing the now visible magical traps.

	“What the hell,” the Warrior swore.

	“Okaayyy,” Richter said. “Can you disarm the wards, Futen?”

	“I am unsure, my Lord. I have the ability to disarm any one ward, but I believe they must be unraveled in a certain sequence. Otherwise to affect one would trigger a cascade that would make the rest discharge. The specific result would be unpredictable, but it would most certainly violent.”

	“What would happen if we just triggered them on purpose,” Daniella asked. “We could set them all off and then open the chest once they were discharged.”

	“Among the wards present are Ravaging Frost, Explosive Heat, and Chain Lightning. Those wards alone would be enough to destroy the chest and its contents. If all of the wards went off at once, the destructive energy might be enough to destroy the integrity of this cave system, and bury all of you alive. That is, if your bodies were not already reduced to their most base constituent parts,” Futen answered in his deadpan tone.

	Richter shook his head, “Total protonic reversal. That’s bad. Okay. Important safety tip. Thanks Egon.”

	The sprites were used to ignoring Richter when he started speaking nonsense at this point, so Daniella just kept trying to find a solution. “There has to be a way to open this,” she said. “We just have to look.”

	And so they looked. And they looked. And they LOOKED. Every skeleton was removed from every cubby. Richter stared at the chest for an hour. He had hoped that his Pierce the Veil skill would reveal a hidden compartment somewhere, but nothing happened. It was about as boring as watching paint dry… only without the paint. Then he stared into every cubby and alcove, but again, nothing. The only interesting thing that Richter discovered, was that the bones weren’t human like he had originally thought. They were similar in shape, but were longer and far heavier. Seeing as how he wasn’t an archeologist though, it wasn’t much help. He even leant his wand to Sion who shone it against every surface and floor a second time. Still nothing.

	The search went on for the rest of that first day and through another. Both nights they bunked in the central chamber under the glow of the golden column. Yoshi had resolved that when they woke again, they would need attack the room with the draugh guards. It was the only place they hadn’t looked.

	Richter couldn’t quite get to sleep that second night, his mind searching for an answer, and his shoulders tense with irritation from night finding one. So he just laid on his back, staring up at the ceiling of the central chamber. It was a mosaic that showed the life cycle of a tree. The ceiling was divided into nine equal squares, in a 3x3 grid. One square showed the tree with full green leaves and birds flying around it. The second was of a darkened sky, the tree draped in shadow. The next was the tree bending under a strong wind. The one after showed a rain storm and the tree had been struck by lightning. In the fifth, the tree was on fire. The following picture, the tree had burned down and only ash remained. The next showed the sun rising over the horizon, and in the last a new green offshoot had sprung up. Richter stared up ceiling, and something tickled his memory.

	He opened the Lore book, and read again about the Basic Elements. Earth, Air, Water, Fire, Light, Dark, Life and Death. Eight Basic Elements. Eight tiles surrounding the central symbol of a sun. He stared back up at the ceiling… it couldn’t be that easy! Could it? What was the order, though? He looked at each tile for a number system or some indication of order, but nothing leaped out at him. The only other thing up there was the center tile of the eight pointed star… that matched the column on the ground.

	Richter jumped up, and ran over to the column. He didn’t see anything on top, but when he shined the wand down on it the whole thing lit white, and white numbers appeared etched into the surface. Each number was by one point of the star, and each point indicated a square of the mosaic. This had to be it! The last piece of the puzzle was to ask Futen how many wards were on the chest. The remnant answered that there were eight wards, and each was cast in a different type of magic. Ya Ta!

	He turned to the sprites who were staring at him at this point.

	“I’ve got it,” he said excited. “The wards need to be disarmed in the order of the mosaics on the ceiling. We can do this!”

	They all raced back to room with a chest.

	Richter started giving orders, “Futen, disable the wards in this order, Life, Fire, Water, Death, Dark, Air, Light, Earth.”

	The white light at Futen’s center started pulsing, and the lines of symbols surrounding the golden rune began spinning like a tumblers on a safe. All three layers of symbols stopped moving, and then the golden lines comprising the ward thinned until it disappeared completely. Richter waited a moment, but when nothing happened, he gave a cheer.

	“Thank god that worked!”

	“What?!” That question came from all of the sprites at once. They hadn’t known that he was only mostly sure his reasoning was right.

	“Relaaxxx,” Richter said. “Everything worked out.”

	Yoshi opened his mouth with an angry expression on his face, but Richer interjected, “Shhhh. Don’t distract Futen. If he loses focus, we could all blow-up.”

	Futen spoke in his emotionless voice, “I will not be distrac-”

	“Shhhh,” Richter interjected again, “just get back to work.”

	In less than ten minutes, all of the wards had been disabled. Richter gave a flourishing bow. The sprites had apparently not forgot that he had just gambled their lives on a hunch, though. Yoshi just brushed past him and started examining the chest, muttering under his breath. Sion and Daniella walked away saying they were going to gather the bedrolls they had left in the central chamber. Richter sat down with a satisfied sigh, reflecting on something he had heard long ago. The saying was true, there was only one thing more satisfying than solving a puzzle, and with the puzzle you didn’t have to buy dinner first.





CHAPTER 19




	Richter woke to a hand shaking him. He looked up into Yoshi’s face, and the sword adept was actually smiling. The scar on his face made the expression more than a little creepy. Not exactly the visage Richter would have chosen to wake up to.

	“What’s up,” he asked.

	“I need your help,” Yoshi said, extending a hand to help Richter up.

	Richter stood and walked across the room to the chest. Only one area of the chest was still glowed red when he looked at it. A one foot by three-inch rectangle.

	“The release points are at each corner of this last trap. Do you see them?” After a moment, Richter nodded. “All of the points need to be pressed simultaneously. I could do it myself, but it’s easier with help.”

	Richter placed his picks, and Yoshi did the same. At Yoshi’s direction, he sunk both lock picks into the tiny holes of the mechanism. There was an audible click and the red rectangle of the trap faded away. Richter shared an excited grin with the half-human swordsman and gestured magnanimously to the chest. Yoshi surely deserved the reward of opening it after having spent all night disarming the traps.

	Sion and Daniella had awoken at hearing their conversation and now stood behind the kneeling members of their party. Yoshi put his hand on the chest lid, and they all held their breath with the anticipation of children on Christmas morning. They were not disappointed.

	You have found: Enhanced Health Potion x 4. Will restore 120 health points over 6 seconds.

	You have found: Basic Life Oil. Apply to weapons for increased damage against Death creatures.

	You have found: Bag of Coins.

	You have found: Book of Flame. Shoot a weak gout of flame from your hand.

	You have found: Bone Key.

	You have found: Hatch Wheel.

	You have found: Iron chain. Damage 7-9. Durability 20/20. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight 2.4 kg.

	You have found: Wooden Shield. Defense +6. Durability 40/40. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight: 3.4 kg. Type: Light armor.

	You have found: Recipe: Potion of Stagnation. Halts health regeneration.

	You have found: Recipe: Basic Health Potion. Restores 80 health points over 6 seconds.

	You have found: Gold figurine

	Richter was happy that Futen had followed his direction to start identifying unknown objects without prompting. It was kinda irritating always having to ask. The haul from the chest was amazing! Of course, after two solid days of work! The amount of effort that had been required to navigate the traps was maddening. Richter could very well see why this dungeon had been locked to him until he reached a level 10. Even at his current level, he couldn’t have soloed it. The enemies, puzzles and traps would have stopped him before he even got to this point.

	He handed the recipes to Sion, who immediately started pouring over the stagnation recipe. Richter didn’t really have a use for them yet. His Alchemy skill was still at level one. The sprite already knew the recipe for weak health potions, but the basic potion would be a step up. Richter handed the health potions out equally. The weapon and shield didn’t seem like anything special, but he had never seen a chain weapon before. It had a baseball sized weight at the end. Actually, it looked like the weapon Gogo used to fight Black Mamba, but a lot less graceful, Richter thought. It should have a good reach, he reflected.

	The Book of Flame he put reverently to the side. He had been dying for a flame spell, but first there was a mystery to figure out. The hatch wheel could be expected to open the round door in the central chamber, that was obvious. They had also just found the key for this branch of the dungeon. Now unless there were two keys to find in this section of the dungeon, (which was usually not the way these things worked, at least when The Land had just been a game) it seemed like there was absolutely no reason go into the room with the draugh. He thought about it for a few seconds then shrugged and just loaded the rest of the loot into his Bag. He reached up to close the lid, but when he touched it again, the bottom of the chest blazed with light.

	Oh crap, he thought. He shut his eyes against both the glare and the expected pain from whatever trap he had just triggered. Nothing happened, though. Richter opened his eyes and saw words inscribed in flickering purple flame on the floor of the chest. As he read, a prompt appeared.

	You have been offered a Quest: When Good Men Do Nothing. All souls deserve rest. In the far chamber, noble warriors are trapped by the desires of an evil creature. Will you free them from their servitude? Yes or No? Reward: Unknown.

	‘The only thing necessary for the triumph of evil is for good men to do nothing.’ That was the quote Richter remembered from English class. The quest was a paraphrase of the old quote, bascially acknowledging that he had everything he needed to keep moving forward in the dungeon. He didn’t need to fight those draugh in the other room. He could forget about those ‘noble warriors.’

	Richter stared at the bottom of the chest, and then looked at his Companions. They had seen the same words that he had, but they just looked at him, waiting to follow wherever he led. There wasn’t a clear decision. They had already been in this dungeon so long. It was extremely tempting to just keep it moving. Who would he be if he did that, though? Was he just living this new life for himself, or would he actually stand for something? Richter selected ‘Yes.’

	The words at the bottom of the chest winked out. He took both keys and the hatch wheel out of his Bag and extended them to Yoshi. “I know you don’t want to wait to keep moving forward. I accepted the quest, not you. What I’m trying to say is this is on me. You don’t need to help. You can keep working on getting out of here. I’ll catch up if… when I can.” Richter lifted both hands farther towards Yoshi in an attempt to hand the items over.

	Sion immediately stepped forward and started arguing, but Yoshi held up his hand sharply quieting the sprite. He looked Richter in the eye. They held each other’s gaze for a full minute. Then Yoshi raised his hands, but he didn’t take the key or the wheel. He pushed Richter’s arms back down to his sides. “It is true that the eaters need to be dealt with. It is also true that sometimes hard choices need to be made, and certain sacrifices must be allowed. That should be the exception, however, not the rule. I am proud to fight alongside a man who would help those who cannot help themselves.”

	Your relationship with Sword adept Yoshi had improved from Neutral to Friendly.

	They did not go to black archway immediately. Yoshi had not slept for a long while, and everyone understood they would need to be at their best for the upcoming fight. The men lay back down while Daniella stood guard over them. Richter closed his eyes, his last sight was of her smiling down at Sion.





CHAPTER 20




	After Yoshi awoke, they discussed their plan of attack. Richter also took the time to learn the Fire spell. Once they had agreed on the roles they would play, they wasted no more time walking to the large black doorway. Richter restocked his ally’s quivers from Bag of Holding. They all applied the Basic Life Oil to their weapons, including the arrow heads. Then they cast whatever buffs they could. Even Alma cast Haste and zipped through the air above their heads. Last, they all drank a Potion of Clarity. It was time.

	Sion, Daniella, and Richter situated themselves ten yards back from the doorway, the maximum distance the configuration of the rooms allowed for them to still have clear shots. They drew their arrow and began to Imbue. Sion and Daniella’s arrows took on a blue aura that grew brighter and more intense as they poured in more mana. The glow around Richter’s arrow began as a warm golden glow. It didn’t stay that way for long, however. For some reason that Sion couldn’t explain, as he invested more mana into the arrow, black streaks began to play over the gold aura. The streaks moved faster, and a barely perceptible hum filled the air. They were still within the boundaries of the village, so he used the village’s mana pool to power the arrow, leaving his personal mana stores relatively intact. The streaks of black were moving so fast that they gave the appearance of having stabilized into a solid whirls over the golden surface. Framed on either side by the bright blue glows of the sprites arrows, Richter poured mana into the arrow until it felt like it was vibrating off the string. He released. The sprites’ arrows fired right after his.

	Daniella’s arrow struck the warrior on the left closest to the doorway. Richter shot the next one, and Sion’s arrow impacted the one after that. As soon as the arrows crossed the threshold, the draugh warriors came awake. The guards moved quickly, but not fast enough for the three warriors that had been targeted. All of the arrows struck their targets in the head, causing critical shots. All three collapsed to the ground. Richter stole half a second to check his combat log.

	Richter shot Draugh Elite Guard for {[(Base damage from Recurve bow of the Wood Sprite (16) + damage from Sprite Arrows of Nature (1)) * Archery bonus (1.18) * Dexterity modifier (1.24) * basic life oil damage multiplier against Death creature (3)] + damage from imbued mana (228 * (0.12)} * critical strike multiplier from Recurve bow of the Wood Sprite (2.2) = 224.36 damage.

	Not a bad opening salvo, he thought with a little smile. His target wasn’t dead yet, but it was well on its way. Then there was no more time for gloating. The four warriors on the right, and the remaining unscathed warrior on the left had stepped down from their alcoves and had already crossed half the distance to the black doorway at a run. This brought the draugh on the right closer together, which was exactly what Richter had been hoping would happen.

	His arm shot forward as cast Grease, and they all collapsed into one another, unable to maintain their footing on the now slick surface. He had aimed his spell so that the tail edge of the 10x10 foot oily surface would appear in front of the guards, causing them to collapse into the center of the spells AoE. Richter wasn’t done, though. He extended his other hand and cast Flame. For as long as there had been day there had been night, for as long as there had been internet there had been porn, and as long as there had been grease spells, there had been fire spells to burn sumbitches up!

	A jet of flame shot from Richter’s hand and the slippery circle became a round inferno. It would continue to burn for until the thirty-second duration of Richter’s Grease spell elapsed. The draugh had been silent up unto that point, but if there was one thing all undead agreed upon, it was that they hated fire. Inhuman screams filled the air when the dried flesh of the draugh became like so much tinder. Despite the damage they were suffering, they weren’t out of the fight. They weren’t called elite guards for nothing.

	All four got back to their feet and continued running forward weapons raised. One fell again, but the rest successfully kept their balance. Sion shot another with Stun shot, causing it to collapse back into the circle of flames. The other three kept coming though. Meanwhile, Daniella had been staggering her fire among the four on the left, but the one closest to the center had almost made its way out of the room. She wasn’t able to put much mana into each shot because her rate of fire. As soon as it crossed the threshold, though, Yoshi was there to meet it.

	This was no polite dance or formal duel. The draugh elite guard and the half-sprite warrior met blade to blade. Only one would survive the encounter. The draugh warrior had a hand and a half sword which it jabbed forward towards Yoshi’s chest. Yoshi caught the blade on one of his swords to parry. That looked like it had been the plan anyway, but he hadn’t taken the draugh’s immense strength into account. The blade continued forward, and it was only a quick move that allowed Yoshi to avoid being skewered.

	When it became clear that he couldn’t parry the blade, in the split second he had left, the adept slapped his second blade against the draugh’s sword as well. He contorted his body and braced against both swords to push himself to the side. Though he avoided being maimed by the draugh’s opening salvo, the undead’s sword still sliced into the outside of Yoshi’s right bicep. The adept hissed in pain as blood started to flow down his arm. He ducked quickly to avoid the draugh’s followup stroke and took a step back to reset a proper stance. Then his two quicksilver swords flowed towards the draugh again.

	Sion used Stun Shot a second time, trying to catch another draugh leaving the circle of fire. Unfortunately, the guard caught the arrow on its buckler. The attack wasn’t without cost. It consumed 35 stamina every time he used it. In a fight, depleting your stamina was as good as a death sentence. Sion switched back to firing imbued shots.

	The three draugh that had escaped the Grease AoE, were no longer on fire except in thumb nail sized spots here and there. The three enraged undead ran towards Richter. They were too close! He cast Troubled Sleep, but the draugh guard shook off the effects of the spell. He immediately cast Charm on another. Gahhh, no effect! In desperation, Richter used a spell that he had never cast before, Cloying Darkness. A cone of thick billowing blackness shot from his hand. The good news was that all three were caught in the spell. Their movement and attack speed were reduced by 20% and they were momentarily blinded by the cone. The bad news was the spell only had a range of ten feet, which meant they were right on top of him!

	As Sion and Daniella kept up a withering fire on the four draugh still in the room attempting to finish them off quickly, Yoshi’s battle with the lone draugh continued. The sword adept had not made the same mistake of trying to match strength with his undead foe. He realized that the draugh could easily best him in that kind of contest. Thankfully, Yoshi’s prowess as a Warrior did not rely on brute force. At the start of the second exchange, he proceeded to systematically take the elite guard apart. He moved into form The Lady’s Fan Opens, which brought him to the monster’s right. Now on the outside of the draugh’s attack radius, he committed to the aggressive form Reaping Wheat, followed by the Crane’s Neck, which brought him up to full extension. The draugh threw an elbow towards his face, but Yoshi had already moved into Setting Sun, which flowed naturally into Scorpion’s Kiss. Each form morphed gracefully into the next, and each movement either scored a hit against the draugh or perfectly positioned him for another strike. The draugh may have beaten the half-human in raw power, but Yoshi more than made up for it in skill, speed, and grace.

	The draugh roared in anger as it took another swing at Yoshi. Yoshi having seen the shift in the undead’s hips was in motion before the sword had even moved. By the time the blade was in flight, Yoshi had executed the form The Orc’s Hammer. The draugh’s sword arm fell to the ground. Yoshi finished the battle with The Drunken Barber. One blade struck the draugh’s neck biting deeply and sliding free. His second sword finished the decapitation, and his foe’s body collapsed.

	The second phase of Yoshi’s fight took 18.4 seconds.

	Richter’s situation was not nearly as rosy. The three draughs’ disorientation was short lived. Even though the slowing effects of Cloying Darkness lasted ten minutes, the actual physical manifestation of the darkness began to dissipate after only one second and was completely gone after three. Richter had used the time to pull out his Life dagger and move far to the right. When the monsters brought their weapons down to strike, they found his former space empty. Their decreased speed coupled with the fact that Richter was hastened gave him an edge. He attacked the draugh closest to him. He struck low and his Life dagger cut deeply into the back of the draugh’s heel. Even though the draugh was undead, it couldn’t ignore anatomy. With it Achilles tendon severed, it was not able to support itself, and toppled to the ground. The other two turned to face him. One swung a buckler at his face while the other swung its axe horizontally. Richter hopped back and cast Ice Dagger. The spike of ice struck the left draugh in the shoulder. The damage caused was negligible, but the point of casting the spell wasn’t to cause harm. The purpose was to keep its attention on him, and not on Yoshi moving quickly up behind it. Alma helped by striking both draugh with a psi blast, staggering them.

	Two swords erupted from the draugh’s chest. One was completely in line with its heart, but blood had long since stopped pumping through its body, and so the hit didn’t register as critical. The draugh turned quickly to reach Yoshi, but he jumped with his swords still inside of its chest. His body moved with the twist of his enemy’s waist. As he moved, Yoshi kicked the other draugh that was in the process of swinging its axe at Richter again. It overbalanced and fell on top of the draugh that Richter had initially crippled.

	That stumble gave Richter the opening he needed. He fell on top of the draugh’s back and slammed his Life dagger into the side of its head. It struggled to get up even with a blade in its head, but in its awkward position, he was strong enough to stab it twice more in the head and once at the base of the skull. The dagger went into its brain stem. The draugh fell limp. Richter was about to given the draugh on the bottom of the pile the same treatment. With a loud crash though, the stone coffin opened.

	Richter looked up and took in the scene. Sion had fired an imbued arrow at whatever had emerged from the crypt. Daniella was firing at one of the first three draugh they had attacked. One of the others was sprawled at an awkward angle, impact burns all over its body. The third was alive, but missing a leg as it clawed its way toward the sprites. The draugh Sion had hit with Stun Shot lay unmoving. The grease fire had gone out, but not before it had burnt the guard to a crisp. Yoshi was standing over the kneeling body of his opponent. His blade was covered with congealed blood and was immediately to the right of a stump that had been the draugh’s neck. As Richter watched, the head was toppling to the floor.

	The most important thing to see of course, was the monster emerging from the sarcophagus. A stream of black necrotic energy shot from her hand impacting Sion’s arrow in midair. It decayed the arrow to ash immediately, and even most of the infused energy seemed to be consumed as it let off a impotent bang, rather than the normal loud boom of an imbued arrow’s impact.

	The creature was thin to the point of being emaciated. Its elongated face had an overly large mouth with four large fangs framing a set of sharp teeth. Its arms hung past its knees, and the marfanoid fingers were tipped with sharp red nails. The body was the gross caricature of a woman. The horror of her other features was offset by full high breasts and shining long black hair. No clothing covered her smooth grey skin. Completely naked, she leered as and squeezed one breast while taking in the scene of violence in front of it. Richter Analyzed it.

	Crypt Mistress. Lvl 29. Health 1100. Mana 800. Stamina 360. Crypt mistresses are the bastard cousins of succubi. As opposed to seducing the living though, they seduce the dead. Crypt mistresses will invade the halls of the dead and undead and then bend them to their will. Even other demons are disgusted by their perverted pleasures.

	“It’s a magic user,” he shouted.

	The crypt mistress extended one hand, and with a deepening of her horrid leer, eight streams of inky black fluid shot out from her hand. They curved and contorted through the air. Two rushed directly at Richter. He tried to dodge, but the ribbons reached him before he could move. He wasn’t the target, though. None of the party was struck by the crypt mistress’s spell because it wasn’t an attack.

	The ribbons struck the chest of every draugh warrior, even the fallen. As one they roared. Not in pain, but in strength. The bellow came from five throats though, not eight. The two that Yoshi had decapitated didn’t revive. Neither did the draugh that Richter had stabbed in the brain. When the mistress saw that some of her guards were irrevocably destroyed, she hissed in displeasure. Both hands began weaving in a second spell casting. Alarmed, Richter started to get up to attack her, but there was movement underneath him. The draugh on the bottom was lifting both him and the dead draugh in all of their armor! WTF?! How had it gotten so much stronger? Analyze gave the answer. It was level 20 now! Either those oily ribbons had buffed the draugh, or it was an area effect of the crypt mistress. Whatever the reason, these bastards had bulked up.

	Richter was going to shout out the new danger, but a quick look around showed that his party had already figured it out. Sion shot another arrow at the crypt mistress disturbing its casting when it was forced to defend itself. He had to drop his bow and draw his sword though, as he fought a defensive battle against two draugh. Yoshi fought the other two, and scored hits, but his blade didn’t cut as deeply as it had only a moment ago. Alma was helping by flying around administering psi blasts, but they seemed to have less effect than before.

	While Sion and Yoshi engaged in hand to hand combat, Daniella was firing as quickly as she could at the boss. Initially, each arrow was met by a viscous stream of black liquid. Even though her shots weren’t connecting, her arrows at least served to keep the crypt mistress occupied. That changed when the leering demon cast a spell, and a black circle flared into existence around it. Daniella’s next shot splashed harmlessly the circle of protection. Only a distortion in the air, that soon vanished, showed that her arrow had any effect at all. The crypt mistress started her spell again.

	None of this was Richter’s immediate concern, however because the draugh underneath him had gotten one arm free. It reached up and grabbed his left forearm in a punishing grip. He cried out in pain as he felt his bones grind together. If it wasn’t for his bracer they would probably had been snapped in half. That was when his light shield when out. He raised his light dagger to stab the draugh, but then something occurred to him. His Minor Life Aura had a 15 minute time duration. That meant that his Charm spell which had a 10-minute cooldown could be cast again! The problem was the lower level draugh had resisted his spell, so why would it work now? Its broad resistance had probably increased. The only way it would work was if it was distracted, or weakened, or…

	*Alma! Brain Drain!*

	As fractious as the psi dragonling could be, Richter would never question her loyalty. As quick as an arrow, her hastened body shot towards the draugh that held him. She latched onto the undead’s desiccated head. The draugh released its grip on Richter and immediately reached towards the dragonling’s small body to crush it to jelly. Richter saw it move and he became laser focused on one fact. This thing would not hurt Alma!

	Focusing his will on that personal truth he shouted the incantation for Charm invoking the spell. The draugh’s hand froze only an inch from Alma, as the spell struggled to override its will. It worked! The draugh relaxed its hand.

	*Alma stop*, he thought desperately. If she continued attacking the draugh, it might break the enchantment, and their new found ally would go back to its old pastime of tearing them apart barehanded.

	*Go help Sion*

	She unwound from the draugh’s head and flew back to strafing the guards fighting his Companion. Richter looked down into the face of his charmed enemy, “And you, you little shit. Go kill your old friends.”

	He rolled off, and the elite guard easily pushed the dead weight of the draugh off of it. It stood, and ran towards the back of one of the guards fighting Yoshi, weapon raised. The sword adept had cut the head off of one of his opponents by the time Richter’s charmed monster joined the fray. Yoshi hadn’t escaped unscathed, though. One arm hung limply at his side. Blood still flowed from the wound in his other shoulder, and also from a cut on his scalp decreasing his left sided peripheral vision.

	Despite his injuries, Richter trusted the Warrior to survive. Yoshi was tough as nails. Richter turned to face the crypt mistress. He knew that he had to stop her before her spell was completed!

	Richter’s thought happened about half a second before she finished casting.

	The demoness ended her incantation with both hands clasped at her breast as if cupping something. Then she flicked both wrists towards the ceiling of the room Richter was standing in. A speckled white globe, whose surface looked like a mushroom top, moved almost lazily away from the horrid creature. After it passed the black portal, it swelled to three times its original size and then exploded, filling the air with millions of tiny white spores. Richter tried to hold his breath, but the spores found their way into his nose anyway. Immediately his throat started swelling and his body was racked with violent coughs. His lungs convulsed trying to expel the foul things, but each cough caused a small involuntary inhale, bringing more of the filth into his lungs. On his third cough, a gobbet of bright red blood made its way into his mouth. He tasted pennies. What was happening? He accessed his combat log.

	Crypt Mistress has cast unknown spell.

	Richter hit by unknown spell now identified as Cankerous Hell Spores for 230 damage. Damage Type(s): Death (70%)/Earth Magic (30%). Death Magic damage 161. Earth Magic damage 69 reduced by Earth Resistance (20%) to 55.2. Total damage: 216.2

	Constitution decreased by 1 every minute for the next 10 minutes. Endurance decreased by 1 every minute for the next 10 minutes. Loss of Health cumulative with initial attack.

	He blinked the prompt away. 216 health lost in one AoE spell! To make it worse, he was about to lose another one hundred health over the next ten minutes. They had to end this fight now! He quickly drank the enhanced health potion, and his breathing eased. When he looked back at the hag, she had already started casting another spell. She gave him a wink as she made eye contact.

	A cry of panic drew his attention as Sion was clubbed over the head with a mace. His helmet dented from the draugh’s mighty blow, and he fell to the ground unconscious. Richter realized the cry hadn’t come from Sion, it had come from Daniella. As the draugh raised its mace to deliver a coup de grace to his Companion, she drew and released an imbued arrow into its face. She succeeded in driving the draugh away from Sion, but she paid for her heroic act with her own body. The distraction was all the opportunity the draugh she had been dodging needed. With a powerful thrust, it stabbed its sword into her belly. The tip ripped through her and came out of her back. She coughed out blood as tears fell from her eyes, and a wretched groan came from her throat.

	A twist of the draugh’s sword caused a second gout of blood to explode from her mouth. The rent in her stomach causing the sanguine fluid to shoot up her esophagus and out on the floor. The wound in her abdomen, coupled with the damage of the spores, rendered her unconscious. The draugh let her slide off of his sword. She hit the floor and a quickly expanding pool of blood formed on the floor under her.

	Yoshi leapt towards draugh standing over her. He had finished with his other opponent, half of its face and skull sheared away. Ricther’s charmed draugh joined the battle. Meanwhile, Richter ran at the guard that was once again raising its mace to bash Sion’s skull in. He knew the crypt mistress was still the real threat, but he couldn’t just let his Companion be killed!

	*Brain Drain!*

	Alma flew in and wrapped her small body around the draugh’s head, while Richter was still two steps away. It stumbled in a daze towards where Yoshi and the charmed draugh had just disarmed their target. Once again, Richter had to watch a freakishly strong creature reach its damn hand towards his familiar. He wouldn’t have made it in time, but then Yoshi’s blue blade struck the draugh’s free hand, scoring deeply and leaving frost in the wound. It gave Richter the time he needed. One step, and he recast Minor Life Aura. With his second step, he was in position behind the draugh. Richter wrapped one hand around its face, and with the other drove his Life dagger up through the base of the skull into the brainstem. With a faint crunch, the blade entered the cerebellum as well. A twist of Richter’s wrist was all that it took for it to collapse to the ground.

	Yoshi and the charmed draugh had finished the last of the guards. An icy sword cut had started the process of severing its head, and the charmed guard’s massive strength ripped the head the rest of the way off the body. Once the draugh was decapitated, Richter could hear the sound of congealed blood and flesh falling to the ground. Yoshi drank his enhanced health potion, and his left arm quickly regained some mobility. Before the six seconds required for the full effect of the potion passed though, he pointed at the demon and shouted, “We have to overwhelm her protection! We need to wear down the shield’s HPs befo-”

	A black and purple beam of light exploded against Yoshi’s chest. His body immediately arched back to full extension. The adept’s head was thrown back in silent scream and his arms were down and out to his sides, fingers curled against the pain. Muscles bulged, and veins stood stark against his skin. Then it got worse. Purple boils rose and popped over his skin, over and over in quick succession. The adept’s skin looked like bubbles breaking in a glass of milk someone blew air into. A scream finally rose from his body, and he collapsed bonelessly to the ground.

	Richter took stock of the situation. All of his sprite allies were down and dying, if not already passed from this world. He stood against a demon who had yet to suffer a simple scratch. His only remaining allies were a small dragonling familiar and a charmed creature that in less than an hour’s time would try to kill him. Richter fixed a defiant grimace on his face. None of that mattered. He was still going to choke this bitch out!

	First he had to help his comrades thought. He ordered the draugh to protect him, and then took a step towards his fallen party members to heal them.

	“What are you doing, my pet,” a sultry voice asked him.

	Richter look at the crypt mistress in shock.

	“Yesss, my beautiful boy. I can speak, I can think,” she placed two fingers inside of her sex, “I can feeel. Hehehe,” she giggled.

	He recoiled in revulsion.

	“Oh, don’t worry,” she said. “I have no interest in you right now, flesh bag. Not while your disgusting little heart still beats. After thoughhhh,” she dragged the last syllable out, giggling once again.

	While had been speaking he kept walking. He cast Slow Heal on Yoshi, but didn’t take his eyes from the demoness. From the periphery of his vision, he saw that Sion was awake, and was crawling over to Daniella’s still form.

	The crypt mistress’s eyes narrowed, “But I see you’re being naughty.” Somehow she arranged her freak show of a mouth in to a pout. The expression didn’t last long because then she smiled evilly and said, “I’ll have to punish you.” A chant began to ensue from her mouth.

	“Kill it,” Richter cried.

	The charmed draugh guard picked up a mace, and ran into the room with the demon, slamming heavy blows against the circle of protection. The chanting didn’t cease.

	Dreading that he wouldn’t have enough time, he ran after it and threw the Life dagger at the horrible creature. The blade didn’t reach its grey skin, but it did penetrate the shield and stuck there, seeming to hover in midair. Apparently feeling the Life energy in the weapon, the demoness broke of her chant, and shied to the side to avoid being struck. The draugh continued beating at the barrier with its mace, and now faint spider webs of damage could be seen emanating from where the life dagger had caused a break in the circle of protection. Every heavy blow made the cracks slightly larger. When the crypt mistress saw that the blade had weakened, but not completely penetrated her defense, she turned her attention to the draugh. A wave of its hand, and several whispered words, were all that was required to shoot black lightning at the guard. The electrical strike hit the draugh in the chest, it dropped to the ground twitching. The threat now past, the demoness started furiously chanting again. There was no leer on her face now, as she stared at Richter with deadly intensity.

	The few seconds the draugh’s life had bought served one major purpose, it disrupted demon’s casting. Knowing this was his only chance, Richter had picked up his bow and nocked an arrow. Before she had looked up at Life dagger hovering in midair, a golden glow had already surrounded his arrow. By the time the crypt mistress figured out that the magic in the Life blade couldn’t reach her, black streaks had appeared. The scant seconds she invested in attacking the charmed draugh, saw the black streaks speeding quickly over the arrow’s gold aura. When she began her spell again, the aura was equal parts shining old gold and ebony black.

	Richter had opened up the mana stores of the village. The magic of the village answered the call of its Master as 100, then 250, then more than 400 mana wove into this one strike. He felt like he was holding a severed power line. The arrow seemed to buck and spit in his hands. The arm holding the bow was having trouble bracing enough to keep the string drawn, but he forced through the pain. He knew that if he lost control, all of the power he had invested into the arrow would be unleashed on him instead. The gold aura now only seemed to peak through in spots. At that pivotal moment, Richter looked into the eyes of the crypt mistress. Eyes that were brimming with hate as she frantically cast her spell. He released. The arrow crossed the twenty yards in less than a second.

	It struck right beneath the web of cracks that stemmed from the Life dagger. The resulting explosion flung the draugh guard’s body through the air, and into the wall, leaving a sizeable dent in the masonry. The weakened circle of protection crumpled under the inexorable force of Richter’s attack, and the demon was thrown to the floor. Expecting the backwash of force when the shield collapsed, Richter had hunched down and braced himself as soon as the arrow was released. While the force of the explosion was strong enough to rock him back, he was on his feet a second later and running towards grey creature.

	*Brain Drain!*

	Alma swept in and wrapped herself around the mistress’s head. The demoness screamed at the psychic attack, not paying attention to anything except removing the source of her pain. This was probably why Richter was able to pour the entire vial of Basic Life Oil down her throat.

	A screech of pure agony came from the crone, and golden light began peeking through her grey skin in spots. She fell back scrabbling. Red tipped claws drew great rents in her flesh as she tried to remove the offending agent, but it was no use. More gold light leaked through the new wounds. As horrible as the agony the demoness was experiencing though, she found no sympathy from Richter.

	While she was distracted, he cast Soul Trap. Then with a look of utter contempt on his face, Richter reached down and grabbed the hair on the back of her head with one hand. He yanked back, causing the horrid mouth to fall open farther and exposing the vulnerable soft palate at the roof of her mouth. He spoke softly, “You’re done.”

	With that, he rammed his fist into her open mouth, driving the blade of his glass dagger through the roof of her mouth, past the crunching bones of the skull and into her brain. A rainbow of colors exploded from the body, and for the first time in what seemed an eternity, all was quiet.





CHAPTER 21




	Richter left the dagger in the crypt mistresses mouth, and ran back to help his comrades. He heard a faint sound and saw the charmed draugh weakly pick up its head. Analyze showed it barely had any life left. With a dismissive sneer, he cast Soul Trap and had Alma drain it. Alma disengaged from the dead monster, and flapped along behind him. Sion was cradling Daniella’s head in his lap and pouring a health potion down her throat. He cast Slow Heal on her and then ran over to Yoshi.

	The bubbling effect had stopped, but the sword adept’s skin was still covered in weeping sores. Yoshi was unconscious, but Richter was thankful to see that his chest still rose and fell. A ribbon of light heralded the last draugh’s demise. He cast Slow Heal, then dragged Yoshi’s body over by Daniella and Sion. Richter slipped in something, almost falling. When he looked down he was appalled to realize it was the cooling blood from the young sprite that Sion cradled.

	Sion was still slowly pouring healing potion into her mouth, but Richter couldn’t tell if it was having any effect. If her chest wasn’t rising weakly, he would have thought she was dead. He settled next to his Companion, and cast Slow Heal on Daniella. He alternated casting the spell on Yoshi and Daniella once per minute, until finally first Yoshi’s breathing eased and hers did as well. Against Sion’s protests, Richter then cast Slow Heal on him, and made him use the healing ring. Feeling exhausted, he told Futen to stand guard. Then he let the stress and demands of the battle pull him into unconsciousness.

	No time at all seemed to have passed when he opened his eyes again. Sion was sitting in the same place with Daniella’s head in his lap, but now he was smiling. The female sprite’s skin was still far too pale, but her eyes were open and she was speaking softly to Sion. Yoshi was still sleeping, and thanks to Richter’s healing spells most of the sores on his skin were gone. There was still a duskiness to his skin though. It was a bit hard to tell because Futen’s light gave everything a washed out appearance, but he thought he saw the same duskiness in Sion’s and Daniella’s skin too. Resolving to ask them about it later, he put the thought from his mind. Richter didn’t want to disturb the quiet moment the two sprites were sharing, so he quietly cast Slow Heal again on the adept, and then examined his prompts.

	Quest Update: When Good Men Do Nothing. The draugh you defeated were all honorable men who had fought for their people millennia ago. You have freed them from the demented control of the crypt mistress. To claim your reward, place the remains of their former queen in the central sarcophagus. The location of her remains has been marked on your map.

	You have been award 6,300 (base 252,017 x 0.02 x 1.25) experience from Brain Drain against Level 20 Draugh Elite Guard.

	You have been award 12, 848 (base 513,900 x 0.02 x 1.25) experience from Brain Drain against Level 26 Crypt Mistress.

	TRING!

	You have reached level 16! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	Your familiar has reached level 4!

	You familiar has reached level 5!

	You familiar has reached level 6!

	You familiar has reached level 7!

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 6 in Analyze.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 10 in Archery. +2% bonus to aim. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Archery. 50% chance to retrieve special arrows after they have been shot.

	You have received 2,500 (base 2,000) bonus experience for reaching level 10 in the skill: Archery.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 5 in Imbue Arrow. +5% damage. +5% speed of mana flow.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 2 in Small Blades. +2% attack speed. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 3 in Small Blades. +2% attack speed. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Small Blades. +2% attack speed. +2% bonus to damage.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 5 in Life Magic. New spells are now available.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 4 in Air Magic. New spells are now available.

	Congratulations! You have reached skill level 8 in Light Armor. +2% to defense of all light armor.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 5 in Grace in Combat. Dodge increased by 14%.

	Congratulations! You have reached subskill level 6 in Grace in Combat. Dodge increased by 15%.

	You are Diseased! You have contracted Cankerous Rot! Your Constitution and Endurance will remain reduced at their current level until you are disease free. Contact with the uninfected may spread the disease. Constitution -10. Endurance -10.

	You have suffered a broken bone. The ulna of your left arm has suffered a hairline fracture. Decreased strength in that arm until healed. Strength -35% in left arm.

	The last prompt made it clear why his arm was still in pain, and also why holding the bow had been so difficult. It was the diseased prompt that was alarming, though. He didn’t even take the time to allocate his new points. He quickly scrabbled back from his others. Sion and Daniella looked up in alarm.

	“Stay back,” he said. “I have a disease!”

	The two sprites relaxed, “We all do,” Daniella said weakly. “Cankerous Rot. That’s why our skin looks darker. It’s from that accursed hag’s spell.”

	Richter was relieved that he wasn’t a danger to friends, but understandably concerned that they were all suffering from this infection. “So you all have minus ten to Constitution and Endurance?”

	“Yes,” Sion said. “Daniella already tried the cure disease spell she knows, but it wasn’t strong enough. We will have to wait to get back to Hisako or Sumiko. They will be able to help us.”

	Richter nodded. He told the two that he needed to finish the quest, and to just stay where they were. They agreed, and soon were speaking softly to one another again. He got up and accessed his map. The bones he needed were only two chambers away. While he was walking, Alma landed on his shoulders and nipped at his ear. He absently reached into his Bag, and withdrew a bit of dried meat. She snapped it from his fingers, and then flew off with her prize.

	He quickly arrived in front of the alcove. There was nothing to distinguish these bones from any of the others, but there was no doubt that they were the remains marked on the map. He carefully put each bone into his Bag, and then walked to the sarcophagus. The remains of the dead draugh were starting to smell, but it was nothing compared to the fetid corpse of the crypt mistress. The flesh that had given her soft round curves had apparently dissolved, and all that was left was loose skin over an elongated skeleton and a pool of thick midnight black liquid in a pool around the remains.

	Richter was about to walk by, just trying not to gag, when a prompt came up.

	You have found: Crypt Mistress Ichor. You have the feeling this could be used as a Death magic poison, as a corrosive acid, or to make a potion to lure the undead.

	Richter’s mouth fixed into an expression of distaste. Not just for the vomit inducing stench, but also for what he knew he was about to do. He removed almost all of empty vials, and carefully collected some of the ichor. Inevitably some got on his fingers. The tingling feeling made his skin crawl on an instinctual level. It also started to decrease his health slowly at one point every seven seconds. A minor irritation to be sure, but he hesitated to think what would happen if it was ingested. He was just thankful that the acidic property his apprentice skill level in Herb Lore had detected was apparently not active in the ichor’s base form. After filling the vials, he just couldn’t stand touching the liquid any more, and the pain from the tactile poison was becoming more than just a minor irritation.

	He wiped the vials and his fingers on the fur armor of one of the draugh. After placing the vials in his Bag, he watched the green skull and bones icon on his personal interface, and thankfully it faded after a few seconds. He cast Slow Heal to replenish the small amount of health he had lost, and then turned away from the crypt mistress’s remains. It was time to finish the quest.

	Richter walked over and squatted in front of the sarcophagus. He slowly and reverently removed each bone and placed them at the bottom of the coffin. Last, he laid down the skull of the long departed queen. The bones began to emit a soft white glow. The light each bone emitted was siphoned into the air forming an inverted funnel. It began to coalesce into a ball which grew bigger as the light continued to be leached from the remains. This continued for half a minute, until the bones looked normal again. Then surprisingly, the sphere grew smaller and smaller until it disappeared.

	Richter looked around wondering if that was it. It wasn’t. A rippling line of white appeared in the air. A second line appeared parallel to it, and then two more lines materialized creating the outline of a large diamond. Initially, Richter could see straight through to the back of the chamber, but the space in the diamond began to flicker and distort. He was looking at the sarcophagus, then for a split second Richter could see… somewhere else. He didn’t get any true idea of what he had seen, but pink light etched itself onto his vision. The flash happened again, and this time a soft purple light shone into the room. The flashes came faster and faster until the scene stabilized.

	Richter was looking at a skyscape with a configuration of stars that he had never seen before, either on Earth or in The Land. Large silver black clouds floated along, and huge crystals stuck up from the tops of the clouds like towers. Periodically the crystals would blaze with a random color, or the sky would light up like when lightning flashed over the horizon.

	You have been exposed to the light from the Crystal Spires of Meiyo. All martial skills increased by 25% while exposed to the light of this plane regardless of alignment.

	He watched this tableau for about five minutes. Clouds floated by in random directions, until one that looked much like the others, floated directly towards the portal. When it was closer, he could see that the crystals on top were not random collections of spires however, but instead a carefully constructed fortress. The true size of this cloud was not immediately apparent, but as it drifted ever nearer, it became clear that it massively dwarfed the others that Richter had seen. It took up the entire diamond shaped window, and the leading edges of the cloud moved past. Richter looked around expecting to see the cloud filling the room he was standing in, but the scene impacted his reality no more than moving scenery on a television. The speed of movement increased. The view flew past the crystal fortress, and continued on over rivers of luminescent orange water and forests of black stone trees. It began to slow again and a small palace of blue crystal could be seen. A tall woman, not quite human, not quite an elf, stood regally with a detached expression on her face. The portal stopped in front of her. In one hand she held a massive sheathed blade. Her other hand she extended towards Richter, stopping just shy of piercing the plane of the diamond shaped portal. Without thinking of the consequences of his action, he reached through the doorway and clasped her warm, strong hand.

	Without having seemed to move at all, she was suddenly standing in the chamber, directly in front of him. When he analyzed her, he couldn’t see here specific stats, but learned she was from a race called the Tefonim. She looked him over, wearing same cool expression. Then she looked at the destroyed bodies of the draugh, Yoshi’s sleeping form, and Sion and Daniella’s wide eyed expressions. There was no change in her demeanor, until she saw the crypt mistress. The transformation in her expression was frightening. A snarl took over the face and she drew her weapon. It was a glowing white broadsword with black runes inscribed down the blade. She drove the point strait down into the grey skinned skeleton. With a shout she unleashed the power of the weapon, and white, wraithlike flames enveloped the blade and the demoness’s body. After a few seconds, all that was left was ash. Richter was glad he had collected the ichor earlier. Somehow he didn’t think he should share that fact with the Tefonim queen, however.

	Once the body was gone, she turned towards him, her face still full of righteous anger. Richter braced himself, thinking he might have made a mistake bringing this statuesque creature from her home plane. She closed her eyes though, and collected herself. When she opened them again, Richer was surprised to see a touch of kindness on her face. When she spoke, the soft elegance of her voice was surprising.

	“I thank thee, warrior. I know well that freeing mine warriors from the clutches of that foul temptress could not have been an easy task. Stand and witness the good that comes from your labors.” She began to sing.

	The language of her song had not been heard since before the world’s oldest kingdoms were born. Ancient sleeping creatures of unimaginable power stirred at the resonance of the primordial words stirring The Land again, before resuming their eternal slumber. She sang of a kingdom dedicated to strength and of a people dedicated to honor. Of betrayal leading to its destruction. A small amount of the kingdom’s people were saved by fleeing to another land. She sang of the sacrifice of loyal guards that stayed behind to ensure the safety of their people. More than just the loss of warriors, she conveyed that love was sacrificed as well. Her mate stood with his men on the wrong side of the portal. Finally, she sang of love reunited.

	During her song, white light rose from the bodies of each of the eight warriors one by one. Each light coalesced into a sphere, just it had over the queen’s bones. Instead of disappearing this time, each ball of light expanded to form the bodies of warriors. These were not wretched undead. The light was pure Spirit energy. The pellucid bodies showed the strength and nobility that these men had possessed in life. The last spirit to form was half a head taller than the rest. His regal bearing matched the warrior woman who stood before Richter. At the end of her song, a single tear escaped her eye. It traced down her cheek, and threatened to fall off her face. Her lost love caught the tear with one finger however, and with that act, in the light of the portal, the warrior became flesh again. The two shared the deep kiss they had been waiting for, the kiss that not even death could forestall. The broke apart and looked at him. The queen spoke again.

	“So long have I waited for my love. We are reunited again because of your courage, most noble warrior. We must depart this plane, but before traveling, I would grant thee a boon. We come from an ancient race of warriors and builders. The abilities that made us an unparalleled force in The Land cannot be shared, as they are bound to our souls. The skills that we learned however, were bound to the bodies which we will soon leave behind. I offer you one skill from any of us that you choose.”

	All nine figures looked at him and extended a hand.

	You have completed the Quest: When Good Men Do Nothing. Your efforts have reunited two long lost loves, and noble warriors with their people. Reward: 5,625 (base 4,500) experience. Personal Reward: A new skill! Touch the hand of any warrior to view the skills they developed in life. You may receive any one skill and all of the leveling associated with it.

	Still not exactly sure what to make of this, Richter walked up to the first warrior and touched the proffered hand. Despite that fact that the Tefonim still appeared to only be composed of white light, the warrior’s hand tightened firmly around his own. At that contact, he looked Richter squarely in the eye. Richter sucked in his breath sharply. Suddenly he knew!

	The warrior had specialized in fighting with the staff. He could hold back an army if he had the room to move. He was also a cook though, and had delighted his friends and comrades many a night with savory fare. He was trained in medium armor and crossbows as well. His uncle had taught him to fish, and he knew where to stand to catch the largest iron finned trout in the river near his home. Richter released the warrior’s hand. He exhaled forcefully, and took a step back blinking rapidly. He had not expected such insight into the man’s past.

	He stepped to the next man, mentally preparing himself before he accepted the proffered hand. This man was an excellent horse man, and wielded a saber. He had an ability that let him bond with his horse almost to the level of reading its thought. It made him exceptionally dangerous as a mounted fighter. Richter couldn’t learn this, but for a few short seconds he lived through the feelings of unity the man had experienced when in the saddle. Despite not being able to get the ability, the man’s master level horsemanship skill was nothing to sneeze at. He was also highly trained in the spear and the javelin. Both of which would have suited his mobile style of combat. And so it went. Each warrior had his own weapon specializations and odd skill sets as well. Why would the thin fighter with the high level assassination skill, also be quite advanced in playing the lute? Or the dual knife wielder, have something similar to the dwarven ability to sense precious metals? Several journeyman and adept level skills leapt out at him, but he still didn’t make the mistake of choosing too quickly. There were also several skills that seemed somewhat silly. A master debater? Why would you want that? Richter always thought being a cunning linguist was a great idea, but in school, saying you were joining the debate team was like the rallying cry of the lonely. Arguing all the time just annoyed people, so you were really just fucking yourself.

	Richter saved the queen and her consort for last, and when he finally got to them, he realized they were worth the wait. The consort was a master in Heavy Armor and Swordsmanship, an adept in Shields, and apparently horrible at weaving with a skill level of 2 and only 48% affinity. The queen’s skills were the crème de la crème, however. She was a master of several fighting styles, but she was also apparently well versed in the building skills of her people, Castle Building, Tunneling, Portal Construction, Field Fortification, War Camp Creation… hold the phone!

	Richter spoke up, “Portal Construction?”

	For the first time, a faint smile touched her face. It wasn’t a kind smile, but neither was it cruel. “Ahhh, the choice of ruler. Are you sure, noble warrior? That was not my most advanced skill.”

	If there was one thing Richter had remembered from history class, it was that empires flourished on their ability to be mobile. Rome had built roads to conquer the known world. Britain had built ships to become an empire. The Western confederation had won WW III because they mastered orbital flight. If Richter could build portals, then nothing would stop him from doing just that.

	“I’m sure.”

	“Very well,” she said. She put both of her hands on his head, and his mind was ripped apart. Years of experience, and massive amounts of knowledge poured into his head. Complex magical calculations and theories of spatial displacement became as easily understandable as left from right. She took her hands away and Richter fell to one knee, gasping. The disorientation cleared after a second, and he looked up to see the warriors crossing through the portal. As each entered they became flesh. More of their kind ran up and greeted loved ones lost eons ago. The queen and her consort were the last to go. The tall warrior bowed deeply to Richter, and with a soft touch to the cheek of his beloved, crossed through the dimensional door. She looked fondly after him, and then turned to Richter, “Use this gift well, but never forget that a doorway opens both ways.” She turned to leave, and then looked back at Richter one last time. Pointing one finger, she indicated the central crypt, with a small smirk and then entered the portal. The doorway faded from view leaving the crypt once more, silent as the grave.





CHAPTER 22




	Congratulations! You have learned the skill: Portal Construction. Magical portals were reportedly once common place, but now only a few are reported to exist. You now have the knowledge and skill to create a magical portal. This will allow for instantaneous travel between this portal and a second one. Creating a second portal will allow for travel between those two points instantly. At the level of Novice, you can travel only between two points on the same ley line.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Novice to Initiate in: Portal Construction. You can create portals to allow travel between any two points on the same type of ley line.

	You have received 2,500 (base 2,000) bonus experience for reaching Initiate level in: Portal Construction.

	Congratulations! You have advanced from Initiate to Apprentice in: Portal Construction. You can create a portal that can exit onto multiple types of ley lines. This can only be built at a Place of Power.

	You have received 6,250 (base 5,000) bonus experience for reaching Apprentice level in: Portal Construction.

	TRING!

	You have reached level 16! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	You have either characteristic points or skill percentage points to allocate from the previous level. Now that you have progressed again, you must allocate your points within the next week or they will randomly be assigned for you.

	Richter got back to his feet. He had lost track of his leveling, just trying to survive the dungeon. Now that he had two levels worth of points to invest though, it wasn’t something he could put off. He could just see himself losing track of time and then, whoops! He’d have twelve more point in luck.

	His first impulse was to invest in one of his combat skills. He already he seemed to have a penchant for daggers. The increase in speed could be amazing at high levels. Besides, EVERYBODY knew that Chun li was a better choice than Ryu! He couldn’t do it though. He was only two skill levels away from level 40 in Herb Lore, and all the sweet experience that came with it. So he invested the 50% there bringing his skill level to 39. Seeing as how he was here to unlock another of his powers, he decided to invest all twelve of his points into Intelligence. A quick check of his status page revealed how he had grown.

	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 16, 11%

Status Alterations: Cankerous Rot

Health: 330 Mana: 420 Stamina: 110

Strength: 29

Agility: 24

Dexterity: 34

Constitution: 15

Endurance: 11

Intelligence: 35

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 24

Luck: 15

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Psi Bond

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 39; 17% to next level

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level

Analyze Lvl 6; 4% to next level

Pierce the Veil Lvl 23; 45% to next level

Stealth Lvl 4; 91% to next level

Traps Lvl 21; 87% to next level

Trap Disarm Lvl 21; 99% to next level

Archery Lvl 10; 24% to next level

Imbue Arrow Lvl 5; 18% to next level

Focus Lvl 3; 78% to next level

Double Shot Lvl 3; 31% to next level,

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 40% to next level

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 15% to next level

Small Blades Lvl 4; 43% to next level

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level

Light Armor Lvl 8; 18% to next level

Grace in Combat Lvl 5; 38% to next level

Air Magic Lvl 4; 19% to next level

Life Magic Lvl 5; 50% to next level

Earth Magic Lvl 3; 32% to next level

Water Magic Lvl 1; 23% to next level

Dark Magic Lvl 3; 78% to next level

Light Magic Lvl 1; 56% to next level

Fire Magic Lvl 1; 22% to next level

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 14; 86% to next level

War Leader Lvl 2, 43% to next level

Enchantment Lvl 1; 44% to next level

Portal Construction Apprentice

Marks:

Master of Mist Village

Blood Oath

Resistances:

Air 50%

Earth 20%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 3 “You seem like someone worthy of my attention.”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





	There seemed to be a new dimension to his page, ‘Status Alterations.’ His disease, Cankerous Rot, was listed and he could see that his Endurance and Constitution had dropped by ten points each. He had to get cleansed! He had cast his spell Cure, but it did nothing. He hadn’t expected it to, but he had to try. Since he couldn’t do anything about his disease right now though, he pushed it out of his mind.

	His new Portal Construction skill didn’t have a percentage next to it. He knew somehow that it didn’t level like his other skills. It required a mixture of knowledge, practical experience, and an innate ability for mana manipulation. From the information the queen had given him, he knew that the skill would only be increased by building portals and learning more about the concepts that now filled his head. Discovering more Lore was now a high priority as well. Why the hell did it seem like he had fifty high priorities, he bemoaned silently. He was not looking forward to how much it would probably cost him to buy the books that would give him the info he needed.

	He continued scanning through the information when something clicked. All gates required two types of keys: activation and destination. The activation key was unique to each portal, and looked a jewel. It was set into the archway of a portal and without it neither incoming or outgoing gateways were possible. The destination key though, looked remarkably like the rune that was attached to the armor he had found. He pulled the leather chest plate out of his Bag of Holding. With his new knowledge it was clear that they rune was a destination key. So wherever this Chuthriom Gate was, the rune would grant him access. Provided the activation key was present in the receiving portal that is. It was a good bet that it would be somewhere near. The adventurer’s gear had seemed custom tailored for this dungeon. He would have to keep an eye out.

	Richter got to his feet, and quickly scanned through the new knowledge in his head. There was way too much to completely go through now, so he was just about to shut it from his mind, when the list of building materials of a novice gate came to mind… Ten pounds of gold? A soul stone with a special quality soul? HOW many rubies enchanted with durability spells??? This thing was going to cost a mint… and he had to build at least two! Those Potions of Clarity better start selling, or he was going to end up turning tricks on the corner to pay for this thing! He threw his head back and raised one fist to shoulder height, and shook it slightly in frustration.

	“Are you okay, my friend,” Sion asked.

	Richter looked back, and saw that Sion had walked up behind him. Daniella was propped up comfortably on a pack, looking at him in concern as well.

	He realized how strange he must look staring at a disappearing portal, shaking his fist in the air. He was basically screaming “KHAN” into a communicator… this was not a good look! A rueful smile found its way to his face, “I’m fine. The queen indicated we should take a closer look at the sarcophagus. Give me a hand.”

	Richter and Sion went over the sarcophagus inch by inch. At first he didn’t see anything, but then he looked at the junction where the white stone coffin was bound to the grey slate wall. Stylized filigree adorned the side of the marble casket, and a one-inch section of the stonework started to glow blue. He never would never have seen it if the queen hadn’t told him to specifically look. Richter ran his fingers over the area looking for a latch or switch. With some manipulation, it depressed at an angle. He pushed until he heard a click. As soon as the mechanism was triggered, dust shot out from every edge of the coffin that was touching with wall. There was a corresponding sound of compressed air being released. Richter and Sion looked at each other, then both grabbed a side of the coffin and pulled. The thing was massively heavy, but Richter braced one foot against the wall to increase the strength of his maneuver. The coffin slowly slid away from the wall. They kept pulling for several minutes, and they were able to move the heavy slab two feet away from the wall revealing a hidden alcove. Try as they might, the coffin didn’t move any further.

	Being the smaller of the two, Sion sidled between the coffin and the wall. He called for light and Richter sent Futen inside. The sprite started laughing and told Richter to come in. Squeezing into the small space, he followed his Companion. With some manipulation he found himself in a small room. There was still a good deal of dust in the air, which triggered a coughing fit in Richter. It soon passed, though. When Richter raised his head and saw what was in the room, he started laughing as well. Sion raised his hand in a gesture he had learned from his friend, and Richter slapped palm to palm giving his bestie a high five.

	“Yes,” Richter shouted. “It’s a festivus miracle!”

	Bags of coins sat on the shelves to the left. Some were cinched tight while others lay haphazardly on their sides, spilling their contents onto shelves or the floor. The right shelves had jewelry of various types strewn across them. The wealth would go a good way to funding his new building project, Richter thought with a smile. Despite that it wasn’t the gold or jewelry that really captured his attention. It was what lay directly in front of the two Companions. An iron shelf was set into the wall. Above and below it were neatly stacked ingots of metal. The largest piles were stacked on the floor. He recognized the first as high steel. It had the same faint blue reflection as his long sword. The next bars of metal were white as cream. Moonstone his prompt told him. On the shelf, were two smaller piles. The first was smoky grey, and had faint swirls worked into the metal. The next pile looked like silver and though the bars were not moving, they had a shimmering appearance as if they might run off the shelf at any moment and pool at his feet. Cobalt and quicksilver he discovered. At the top of the wall was a final small alcove, and inside were ten bars of what looked like dark green glass. Each was crystal clear with no impurities. When he examined them, he learned that the metal was something he had never heard of before. Elementum.

	He looked at the treasure of the Tefonim queen, and understood them better. While gold and jewels were valued by them as much as they were by any race, what took a place of honor was the metal. A race of builders and warriors, the potential of good materials was cherished.

	Not wasting any more time, he began shoving all of the loot into his Bag of Holding. He was never so thankful for the weight reduction properties of the Bag. Without it, he would have had to leave most of the treasure behind. He poured all of the coins into the bag, letting the Bag’s autosort do its job. Then he scanned all of the jewelry with his wand. None shown white, but they would sell all the same, he thought happily. He took it all. Everything except a gold bracelet beset with amber. That Sion said he would like to keep. Having a good idea who would be receiving it as a gift, Richter agreed with a faint smile. Sion just huffed when he saw his friend’s grin, and went back to shoving the jewelry into the Bag.

	When they were done with the side shelves, they started loading the ingots. The large piles disappeared into the black bag which never seemed to get any bigger. To Richter though, it was clearly getting heavier. When he touched the moonstone pile, a screen filled his vision.

	Quest Update: The Right Tool for the Job. You have found a higher quality metal. Bring this metal back to the dwarves of your village. Once you have picked which metal you will use to create your Magic Forge, your quest will be finished. Make your Forge, and collect your prize.

	My thoughts exactly, Richter thought with a smile. They loaded the rest of the metal, and left the treasure room. The Bag was extremely heavy now, but it was still well below his max carrying capacity of 290 kilos. Daniella had fallen back asleep, and was snoring ever so softly. Yoshi’s chest continued to rise and fall regularly, but he still hadn’t woken up. The smile slipped from Richter’s face when he saw his injured comrades again. Despite having restored their health points as much as he could, some things apparently still took a while to recover from. Whatever toll the crypt mistress’s last spell had taken, Yoshi would still need more time. As for Daniella and her wan complexion, healing did not replace the blood she had lost. The smurfette would need to replenish her fluids.

	Richter looked at Sion, whose own mood had sobered as well, “We need to get out of this dungeon. We can’t just sit, and wait for them to heal though. Who knows if this disease will ever heal on its own? It might even get worse. I say we open the next hatch and face what comes.”

	Sion nodded, his face firm, “The two of us have always been enough in the past. We will be equal to whatever challenge comes our way.”

	Richter nodded and set Sion to gather their things. He moved around the rooms and collected the weapons and armor from the fallen draugh. Nothing was left of the crypt mistress but ash. His dagger was laying in the remains. The queen’s spell had removed sixty durability, but the impossibly hard glass dagger still had 73/250 durability left. He resheathed the weapon at his waist and moved on. The draugh had a combination of bronze, iron and steel weapons and their armor was iron, leather or hide. None of it was noteworthy, but ‘waste not want not’ was Richter’s policy. His Life dagger had not fared so well as its glass counterpart. Only 10% of its original twenty durability remained. He knew he couldn’t trust it in a fight again. Not that he would have even if he could. Both daggers’ attack stats had decreased with their drop in durability. He placed the Life dagger in his Bag nonetheless, in case it could be repaired by his smiths. By the time he was done, Sion had rolled up his bed roll and gathered up Daniella’s items, now ready to move.

	She gave a slight whimper as he picked her up, but otherwise didn’t complain. Richter picked Yoshi up in a fireman’s carry and started walking back towards the central chamber. Sion followed quickly behind, and Futen hovered above them, illuminating their way. Alma was flying ahead crooning in delight. When he asked why, she sent him an image of a stunned rat. The dragonling had apparently found something to break her fast of dried tack, and her recent feast had put her in a grand mood. Soon all of them were back in the light of the golden column.

	They left their wounded comrades right next to the column, but they arranged them so that the column was between them and the hatch. If any enemies emerged from the soon to be open round door, maybe Yoshi and Daniella wouldn’t be noticed at first. Every second they went unseen was another second that Richter and Sion could deal with the potential threat.

	The two friends buffed up, and then stood in front of the hatch. Richter also allocated Alma’s new points. Staying with the same plan, he increased Brain Drain by two levels, using all five of her unused points.

	You have chosen to increase your familiar’s ability: Brain Drain to level 3. Successful kills will now give 3% of total experience to both you and your familiar. Drain occurs faster. Stun can occur on enemies level 11 and below.

	You have chosen to increase your familiar’s ability: Brain Drain to level 4. Successful kills will now give 4% of total experience to both you and your familiar. Drain occurs faster. Stun can occur on enemies level 16 and below.

	Richter would have to wait four more levels before leveling Brain Drain again. Luckily there didn’t seem to a time limit to allocating points for his familiar, like there was for himself. He checked her status page.

	 		 			 Name: Alma

Level: 7, 7%

Health: 170 Mana: 170 Stamina: 170

(Unused level points: 0)

Abilities:

Psi Bond – Lvl 1, points to next level: 1

Psi Blast – Lvl 1, points to next level: 1

Brain Drain – Lvl 4, points to next level: 4

Can use:

Air Magic

Resistances:

Mental: 100%

Air: 50%

Race: Psi Dragonling





	He was happy to see her basic stats had increased with her level. Also she remained disease free. Either she had been immune to the demon’s disease spell, or she had avoided it all together. She hovered in the air above his head, ready to face whatever danger was about to come. The hatch wheel easily fastened to the indentation set into the round door. Sion stood several steps behind him and to the right. An arrow was nocked and partially drawn. With a last nod to his Companion, Richter took a deep breath and twisted the wheel. He yanked the hatch open, ready for battle!

	There was no one to fight. Taking deep breaths to calm his racing heart, he looked at Sion and laughed shakily. The sprite was clearly relieved as well. All that the hatch revealed was a narrow tunnel slightly smaller around than the hatch itself. Brown vines hugged all surfaces of tunnel that Richter could see. Having a high suspicion of what to expect, he immediately shone his wand on any surface it could reach. Words were soon revealed, emblazoned on the stone around the lip of the tunnel. The area had been completely hidden by the edges of the hatch, but it now revealed their next riddle.

	As we all enter, so do we all leave. Obey this truth or be crushed by your weakness.

	Richter looked at Sion confused. He was really getting tired of riddles. His Companion looked back at him with a sure expression.

	“Alone.”

	“What,” Richter asked.

	“Alone,” Sion repeated. “We all enter this world and leave it the same way. By ourselves. The riddle means only one of us can enter at a time.”

	Richter grimaced. He didn’t like the idea of splitting up. This dungeon had almost killed them plenty of times, but the fact remained that they had to get out of this place. If there was one thing that had held true so far though, it was that obeying these riddles would keep them alive. He nodded and began to take off his arms and armor. The tunnel would be too small for him to crawl through wearing what he had on. Sion stopped him.

	“I am the one that should go,” the sprite said. Richter shook his head and prepared to argue, but Sion cut him off. “You know that in that small space, I’m the better choice. You were already about to remove you weapons. I don’t like the idea of us splitting up either, but the idea of going into a new area of this dungeon without protection is insane. I will handle this. You focus on protecting our friends.” Sion gave him a cocky smile, “This is what we do, brother.”

	Richter couldn’t keep the smile from his face even though he tried. He agreed on the condition that Sion tie a rope around his waist. If he got into trouble, Richter could pull him out quickly. Sion agreed, and handed him his pack. Richter gave him two health potions just in case. After slipping the potions into a belt pouch the sprite got into the tunnel and started walking forward at a crouch.

	The tunnel couldn’t have been longer than fifty yards. Richter cast Far Light, anchoring the ball of light half way down the tunnel. Richter watched his Companion move forward, ready to pull him back in an instant. After Sion had crossed the half way point though, suddenly Richter couldn’t see him. The sprite hadn’t disappeared. Instead, the tunnel now ended in a blank wall, illuminated by a hovering ball of white light. The rope led directly into the rock.

	Alarmed, Richter shouted and tried to pull the rope. It was like he was trying to rip a piece of a mountain off. There was absolutely no give no matter how hard he pulled. Dropping the rope, he started to climb into the tunnel. As soon as his hand crossed the threshold though, a grinding noise ensued. The tunnel started constricting like an iris. It wasn’t just the opening though. Richter could see that the entire length shaft was getting smaller. He withdrew his hand quickly. He didn’t have more than a fingertip in for more than two seconds, but the tunnel had perceptibly shrunk. There was no way he could reach Sion before the tunnel was completely shut, let alone have enough time to bring him back to safety. Richter had no idea how solid stone could flex like a muscle, but he did know that his Companion was on his own.





CHAPTER 23




	Sion didn’t hear anything strange, but he sensed something was amiss. He looked back and saw only a blank wall of brown stone. His heart started slamming painfully inside of his chest. He couldn’t be trapped! Not again! His fear threatened to incapacitate him, but then he heard the trilling call of a forest lark.

	Sion turned his head back forward. He was confused but was intending to scramble the last distance out of the tunnel, but stopped, shocked by what he was seeing. He was in the forest, on an exceptionally beautiful day. It was autumn and the beauty of the changing leaves complemented the smells of the changing seasons. There was the sweetness of decay from the fallen leaves. The somehow sharp scent of cooling wind down from the mountains. He didn’t understand what was going on, but there was something familiar about the scene.

	“Sion! Why didn’t you wait for me? I told you I was coming too!”

	When he heard that boyish sprite voice, and even greater feeling of dread rose in his breast. He turned, and saw the face of his best childhood friend, Kurian. The sprite’s youthful cheeks were somewhat ruddy from both the run he had just finished and the brisk chill in the air. Sion now knew what day this was. It was the one day he spent his entire life trying to forget. The events of this day were why he had let Richter be torn apart by wolves. This was the day that he had killed his best friend.

	The one thing that all sprites learned from an early age was to avoid human lands. It was drilled into them again and again. Sion had needed to prove himself, though. So he goaded his best friend into coming with him on a horrible misadventure.

	Seeing Kurian again after so long, Sion’s spirit tried to shout, ‘Turn back! Don’t do this,’ but he had no control over his younger body’s actions. He was trapped as a spectator, just along for the ride.

	“Don’t take so long next time, Kurry,” young Sion said laughing. “I heard the hunters talking about how they had seen humans at the boundary of the forest. Are you ready?”

	Despite his earlier protestations, Kurian’s face adopted a doubtful expression, “Yeah. Of course, I am! But maybe we should go tomorrow or the next day. Elder Yamin is making sprangle berry pie today, and-”

	Sion cut him off, “If you are too scared, just stay behind.” He turned to go, but waited expectantly before starting to walk again. Kurian immediately hurried to catch up to him, espousing his limitless courage. He fell into line just as he always did when Sion bated him. Just as Sion knew he would.

	The two boys ran through the forest. The sprite’s racial ability of Concealment made it easy to avoid any predators. They were instinctually in tune with forest around them. They also knew that they would not be missed anytime soon. It was the nature of sprites to wander the woods communing with nature, so their absence for a day would not raise any suspicion. All the elements for their trip were in place.

	That night they drank sweetberry juice that Sion had stolen from his mother’s larder. They praised themselves for embarking on such a grand adventure. What brave explorers they were! When it was time to sleep, both climbed into the limbs of a massive oak. Well hidden by the changing leaves, they both let themselves be carried away into dreams of adventure.

	The next morning, Sion awoke first and nudged his friend. After performing the necessary functions of every morning, they resumed their great quest to see the humans. They played tricks on each other while the traveled. Kurian would peg the back of Sion’s unsuspecting head with a mud pie. Later during a noon nap, somehow a newt wet from the river would make its way down Kurian’s shirt. Sion looked on with a shocked and innocent expression while his friend shrieked and cursed. They both enjoyed their journey, and nothing seemed to be able to ruin their mood. That was when they found the body of a deer.

	Both were confused by what they were seeing at first. It had been killed by an arrow, that was clear enough, but the body hadn’t been treated in the way they had been taught. Instead great hunks of meat had been cut off with no concern towards saving the pelt. Much of the deer had been left to rot as well. It was in opposition of everything they knew. Death was part of life, that truth had never been hidden from the young sprites. Killing another living creature was not to be taken lightly, however. Hunting was both a responsibility and a sacred honor. No part of an animal was ever wasted. What they saw before them was… savagery.

	Their mood now somber, they continued to follow the trail that led from the carcass, ever farther from the Hearth Tree. Another few hours of travel brought them to the camp of the humans. The smell was what they noticed first. The humans seemed to have just emptied their bowels and bladders in random places rather than create a proper site to dispose of their waist.

	They stayed hidden as they walked through the trees. When they were closer, Sion heard squeals of pain followed by cruel laughter. The smell of cooking meat drifted through the woods, and they caught the first glimpses of the camp through the trees. Another minute of walking, and they saw the most horrible sight of their young lives.

	There were four, no five, humans in the camp. Two wagons were nearby filled with stacked cages. More than half were filled with some of the more dangerous creatures of the forest. Feline brown fangs, red forest dogs, chittering skree, and even several skeelings. They were all caged separately and seemed furious about their situation.

	The squeal of pain they heard though, was from a cave badger. The humans had made their camp beside a small crevasse that was about seven feet deep. Both entrances were blocked with rocks preventing escape. A badger huddled near one entrance. Its body was pressed up against the rocks in an attempt to avoid the other denizen of fissure.

	The humans had driven a spike into the ground near the other entrance. A heavy length of chain was attached to it. The other end of the chain was tied around the neck of a razorling. Five feet long, the razorling stood on four paws. Each finger was tipped with a curved and wicked talon. The creature’s body was thin and clearly built for speed. Its mouth was filled with razor sharp fangs that were snapping open and shut, only inches away from the badger.

	Even sprites avoided packs of these sadistic hunters. The razorlings gained their name by the tendency to toy with prey. They never killed quickly if they could avoid it, but instead would disable. Then, to the sound of their cackling laughter, would swipe at the body of their victim making small razor sharp incisions. The sprite hunters had told Sion it could take near an hour for the razorlings to finish their kill.

	The chain was short enough that the badger was safe, but only so long as it huddled at the far end of the crevasse. Unfortunately, that wasn’t enough entertainment for the humans. Four of the filthy men were standing around the lip of crevice laughing and hooting. The fifth was down in the crevasse, but on the other side of the stone wall from the badger. The men had left a small hole in the wall, and they used it to poke a spear at the poor creature. Never too deeply, but enough to cause it to shy away from the weapon. That would of course bring it closer to the razorling, who would struggle to reach the badger with renewed vigor. The fear of the predator would overwhelm the pain of the spear, and the badger would huddle against the stone wall again. All of this happened to the cheers and horrible laughter of the men, drinking from jugs and slapping each other on the back. After a minute, one would shout in common tongue, “More!” The man behind the wall would jab the spear forward, and the entire travesty would start again.

	Sion and Kurian watched this with horror. They had never been exposed to wanton cruelty before. They both lost their innocence that night, watching while the men tortured the cave badger for mere amusement.

	It wasn’t long before even the small squeals of pain and terror the men were eliciting weren’t enough to quench their appetites. One of the men, with a large scar on his face, took a long pull of whatever they were drinking, and said, “Finish it Rall.”

	The man stabbed the badger again, but instead of withdrawing this time, he continued to push the animal forward. The badger squealed in panic, but the pain of the spear tip kept it from retreating. With a forceful jab, the badger jumped away from the weapon. And into the reach of the razorling.

	“No,” Kurian shouted.

	Sion clapped his hand over his friend’s mouth, afraid to draw the attention of the evil humans. One of the men looked up to locate the source of the noise. Luckily, the other drunkards were too obsessed with their vicious sport to hear. Soon the one man who had taken heard Kurian looked back to crevasse to enjoy the dying screams the forest animal. The two boys huddled in the undergrowth afraid to move, and learned that the sprite hunters had been wrong.

	The screams of the badger only lasted half an hour.

	Night was falling by the time the men walked away from their amusement. The walked over to where they had been roasting their meat, and settled down with a fresh jug.

	“Did you see all that blood,” one man with a scraggly red beard asked. “We will get a great price for that thing in the pits!”

	“Hahaha,” another replied. “I say we throw something else in later.” The other men cheered and agreed.

	The man with the scar stood up. “Now listen you motherless pigs! A bit of fun is one thing, but I won’t have you cutting into our profits! Now get some sleep, because we leave in the morning. We have enough in the cages, and I’m tired of these stinking woods. Rall, you have first watch.”

	One or two of the men grumbled, but no real dissent was raised. They settled in for the night, except for Rall. He sat with his back to the fire, looking disinterested in his duties as guard.

	Once Sion heard the sounds of snoring, he motioned for Kurian to follow him away from the camp. They stayed silent until they were several hundred yards away, then Sion paused and whispered urgently.

	“Stop Kurian!”

	“What,” his friend hissed back. “Why? We need to get away from here!”

	“They are going to torture and kill all of those animals. We have to free them.”

	“No,” Kurian said, shaking his head. “When we can get back we can tell the warriors. They will be able to stop them.”

	“Those humans are leaving at dawn,” Sion argued. “They might leave the forest before the warriors can catch them.” He drew himself up, puffing out his chest. “It is our duty to protect the forest and its creatures.” He had heard his mother say the same thing many times. Sion knew full well that she had not meant for two sprite youths to risk death against a band of cut throats, but he wouldn’t let that stand in the way of his youthful bravado.

	“Sion,” Kurian pleaded, fear evident on his face, “there are only two of us. Those humans are full grown, and they have weapons.”

	Sion expression became condescending and judgmental, “Iiiii will do my duty as a sprite. You can leave if you are afraid.” He turned and started walking back to the camp. Kurian fell into line just as he always did when Sion bated him. Just as Sion knew he would.

	Watching this memory unfold, Sion’s spirit struggled with renewed fury to take control of his younger self. He didn’t want to see what was about to happen. Living through it once was more than anyone should ever have to endure! Despite his efforts though, he remained only a spectator.

	The two sprites walked back towards the camp. When they got closer, they circled around to come at the wagon from the opposite direction. Sion’s plan was simple. They would sneak up to the cages, keeping the wagon between themselves and the men as cover. All of the cages on one side were locked with the same chain. Sion would break the lock and Kurian would pull the chain. They might not free all of the animals, but they would free most. In the chaos afterwards, the two boys would fade back into the forest, and then go back to the Hearth Tree to warn their people.

	At first, it looked like Sion’s plan would work. The two boys made their way to the wagon undetected. The lock did not seem too large, and Sion was already wearing Strength enhancing armor, a perk of being the son of the Hearth Mother. He thought one blow from a rock would break it. With a last look at Kurian to see that he was ready to pull the chain, Sion raised the stone in his hand. That was when Kurian screamed.

	The cage that Sion’s friend was standing in front of apparently contained a nettler. The over large spider was named after the spikes sticking randomly from its body. It had reached through the cage and stuck one of its spikes into Kurian. It quickly its injected venom, and he fell to the ground, paralyzed. Sion bashed the nettler with his rock, making it withdraw back into the cage, but the damage was done. He was reaching down to carry his friend away when he heard a sound behind him. Looking back, all he saw was something falling towards his face, and then, blackness.

	When Sion came to, he was bound in front of the fire. Kurian was tied up on the ground next to him. The boy was awake. Nettler venom, while potent, was also short lived. His friend was struggling to shout, but was gagged as well. Kurian’s face was bloodied and one eye was swelling shut.

	“Look! The other one is up!”

	The face of the scarred man came into Sion’s view. “Well hello little guy,” the man said with false kindness. “Now we haven’t been introduced. I am Broyin, and these are my men,” he said with the mockery of a flourished bow. He loosened Sion’s gag. “What is your name?”

	Sion looked up at the man, defiantly not speaking. Broyin smiled happily, and slapped Sion soundly across the face. The sprite saw stars and tasted blood in his mouth. He blinked his vison clear and focused back on the man’s face. He steeled his expression, and looked back into Broyin’s eyes with his lips pressed firmly together.

	The man laughed loudly and was joined by his men. “Well you have some fire in you, I’ll give you that!” He slapped Sion again, harder this time. The sprite’s head fell back and bounced off the ground. He might have lost consciousness for a short period. When he was able to focus, he realized that he was gagged again. He looked about and saw that Broyin was standing over Kurian.

	“There you are! Thought I might have hit you too hard, little guy! Now Sion,” the sprite’s eyes widened. “Yes I know your name. Kurian here was much more cooperative than you were. He told us your name, about the Hearth Tree, AND he told us something else. It was your idea to come and try to steal the results of our hard earned labor.” Kurian was staring at Sion, tears running down his face. His eyes silently begged for his friend’s forgiveness. Sion tried to communicate with his facial expressions that there was no need to even ask. It was clear that the men had been abusive.

	Now that makes you the leader,” Broyin said. “The boss! The shot caller! Him that lays down the law!” The man laughed. “Now as one boss to another, let me take this opportunity to teach you something. It is important for a boss to consider all of the angles. You need to expect the unexpected. You didn’t expect the spiked spider to be in that crate, which is why Kurian here was paralyzed, which is why Rall was able to slam his truncheon into your face. Do you understand?” Broyin looked at Sion’s angry face and smiled.

	“Good! I’m glad you’re listening! Now the next thing you need to know as a boss, is that it is important to keep your men happy. My man Tic over here…,” Broyin indicated one of the other men. “Wave to Sion, Tic. That’s nice. As my mam used to say, good manners cost nothing, but bad manners might cost you your balls. Now where was I? Oh yes! As I was saying, Tic here wanted another show tonight. Earlier, I said no, because I thought it might be wasteful. These animals we caught are precious cargo. BUT!” Broyin walked back over to Sion and stooped down. His voice lowered and his smile turned evil, “We have more options now, don’t we?”

	Standing quickly, the man clapped his hands together, walking back over to Sion’s friend. His voice was magnanimous once again, “Now the next thing I want you to learn isn’t a boss to boss lesson. It’s more of a man to boy type of lesson.” He picked Kurian up by the throat, and removed his gag. The boy struggled to breathe, but still couldn’t catch his breath in with Broyin’s hand tight on his neck. “This lesson is called: ‘If you make a mistake, sometimes others pay the price’,” and with that, he dragged Kurian across the camp, and dumped him into the crevasse.

	There was a moment of stillness, as if The Land itself was taking notice of the atrocity being committed. Then there was a low growl. After that, the night filled with screams. Four of the men ran over with torches to watch the show, hooting and hollering. Not Broyin though. He just stared at Sion the whole time, that evil smile on his face. He watched the sprite struggling to get free, screaming against his gag, threatening muffled curses with one breath and tearfully begging for his friend’s life the next. Through it all Broyin just watched, unmoved and still smiling. Through it all, Kurian screamed Sion’s name, begging his friend to save him.

	The razorling wasn’t starving anymore, so it didn’t rush. Kurian didn’t stop screaming for a full hour. At least that is the way it seemed to Sion. It was hard to tell though. He reached his emotional limit before it was done, like a rag completely rung of water. Though Sion didn’t have the word for it at the time, he later realized he had fallen into a glassy eyed form of shock. Blessedly, the pleading screams of his best friend being eaten alive stopped searing his soul after a time.

	After the Kurian was dead, Broyin came up to him and started talking again. None of it registered to Sion, but several hard slaps later, he was forcefully brought back from the stupor he had retreated to.

	“Stay with me boy,” the man said. The pleasant tone was still in his voice. “It’s time for your final lesson. Are you ready? Good!” He loosened Sion’s gag again. Then he picked the boy up by the throat, holding a torch in the other hand, “Now pay attention because this is the last thing you will ever learn. No one messes w- Gak!” Broyin’s hand loosened its tight hold on the young sprite’s neck.

	Sion looked at him confused, and realized Broyin’s last words had cut off because of the arrival of the arrow that was now protruding through his neck.

	Broyin’s grip slackened further, and they fell apart. Blue streaks struck the other four men in quick succession. Barely any of the men had time to do more than start begging for mercy before a second, then a third volley hit, claiming their lives. The only one left alive was Broyin. Face stuck in a half snarl, half bloody grin, he reached his hand towards Sion’s face. In the flickering light of the dropped torch, Sion could see a small tattoo at the juncture of the man’s index and middle finger. It was a hexagon, with three circles in the center. He couldn’t look away from that small tattoo, while the killer’s hand grew steadily larger in his vision. Sion still felt fear, but more than that he felt a hate that would fester in his soul for many years to come. Past Broyin, he saw a sprite warrior walk up with her weapon raised.

	Sion screamed, “Nooo!”

	Her blade plunged down, and Broyin’s hand fell limp to the ground. His eyes stayed open staring at Sion and at eternity. His mouth kept that same insane bloody rictus. In the days and years following the incident, the story came up from time to time. Some mused that Sion had screamed ‘No’ because he was begging for the man’s life despite what the human had done. Others wondered if he was mad with grief, and had thought the sprite warrior was coming to kill him and not Broyin. He never told anyone that he screamed ‘No’ for one simple reason. He had been hoping the razorling was still hungry.





CHAPTER 24




	Sion’s mind was back in the present day. The weight of what he had just lived through caused his shoulders to droop, and tears fell down his face. He curled up onto the floor of the tunnel. Alone he wept for remembered pain and forgotten guilt.

	Behind him, there was still only a blank wall. In front of him, was a tangle of roots. They writhed across the entire shaft, stopping any possibility of forward movement. The random motions steadied into the form of an expressive face. He would not have been able to see anything if not for the moss attached to the roots. They gave off a soft green illumination. It was more than enough for him to see his immediate surroundings, but the end of the tunnel disappeared into darkness.

	“Why did Kurian die,” the face asked in a rich, deep voice. The words echoed quietly, fading into a distant rumble. As it spoke, some of the words of the surrounding the banded door appeared in front of him. The glowing blue letters hung in midair:

	The passage of birth is the loss of the womb. The safety of illusion is shattered by the truth of pain. Any being would be crushed, to carry the world on his shoulders. Know thy limitations to transcend them.

	Sion didn’t answer at first. This can’t be happening, this can’t be happening, he thought over and over.

	“Why did Kurian die,” the voice repeated.

	“What do you want me to say,” Sion asked in a quiet voice.

	“Why did Kurian die?”

	“I don’t know! I didn’t mean for it to happen,” he cried out.

	The face just stared at him, and he heard a forest lark.

	“Sion! Why didn’t you wait for me? I told you I was coming too!”

	Not again! Not again, he thought over and over. Sion’s spirit struggled and fought, but had no more control this iteration of memory than he had the last. He was forced to watch his long lost friend through young eyes again. He relived their halcyon days spent in search of adventure. He sat through the horrors that can come from men’s dark desires. He felt hate again take root in his soul at the agonizing death of innocent Kurian.

	He was back in the tunnel. The blue words hung in front of him.

	“Why did Kurian die?”

	Sion looked up, his tears making streaks in the dirt that caked his face. “I killed him,” he screamed in anger. “My best friend is dead because of me! Is that what you want to hear?”

	The face took on a regretful expression. A forest lark sang. Sion’s eyes grew wide in panic. He raised his hand in protest and entreaty, a shout on his lips. Suddenly though, he was in a forest.

	“Sion! Why didn’t you wait for me? I told you I was coming too.”

	“Don’t take so long next time, Kurry,” Sion said laughing. “I heard the hunters say they had seen the humans at the boundary of the territory. Are you ready?”

	Sion’s spirit began to fray as he had to sit through this cruel farce yet again. As he sat vigil over his younger self for a third time, he wondered if he was losing his mind. Was that the point of this latest test? Was it actually a trap meant to wear down the mind and spirit of anyone who dared to try and conquer this dungeon?

	Broyin’s hand fell limp into the dirt, a bloody sneer on his face.

	A deep voice asked, “Why did Kurian die?”

	Sion could barely summon the strength to reply. He knew that he had to try though. Opening and closing his mouth to moisten it, he spoke, “I’ll give you anything you want. Just tell me what to say,” Sion cried softly. “Please! Please just stop!” He tried to put strength into his last words, but it came off as exactly what it was, begging.

	The face stared at him, blue words hovering in the air. Was that a sympathetic expression on its face?

	He smelled decaying leaves. Mud hit the back of his neck. They found a slain deer. Kurian screamed his name, until the sounds he was making turned into wet burbles, which then turned into nothing.

	“Why did Kurian die?”

	Sion’s shoulders slumped, defeated. Did repeating that painful day cause measurable damage to him, or did he feel like this just because of the strain of what he was going? In either case, he had nothing left. Sometime during the last cycle of events he had soiled his real body. Even that didn’t merit an emotional reaction, though. He had lived through Kurian’s death four times, five if you counted the time it had originally happened in real life. The second time had not been easier. The third time was just as wretched, but the fourth removed any hope he had of escape. He felt the emotions just deeply as he had all of those years ago. Kurian’s screams tore at his soul just as painfully, every time.

	“I can’t tell you, but one should have to endure this,” Sion breathed. He didn’t even bother looking at the face. He knew that nothing would stop this so he quietly asked, “Please just let me die.”

	A bird called.

	Sion waited to hear Kurian speak. He thought about an eternity trapped, reliving the worst day of his life in an endless loop. Then he decided to not play this sick game anymore. He couldn’t control what his younger body would do, but he could control how it affected him. If he had to spend time with his best childhood friend, then he would enjoy the experience as much as possible.

	“Sion! Why didn’t you wait for me? I told you I was coming too.”

	Sion finally let himself feel joy at seeing his old friend.

	“It’s good to see you Kurry,” he said with a smile.

	What?!? That wasn’t what he had said! After reliving the events four times in a row, he knew every word, every nuance and inflection. That was definitely NOT what he had said!

	“Okayyy,” Kurian said with a confused expression. “I just saw you an hour ago.”

	Sion lost his focus, confused by what was happening.

	“Don’t take so long next time, Kurry,” his younger self said laughing. “I heard the hunters say they had seen the humans at the boundary of the territory. Are you ready?”

	Kurian looked doubtful, “Yeah. Of course, I am! But maybe we should go tomorrow or the next day. Elder Yamin is making sprangle berry pie today, and-”

	Sion committed to the moment again, “You might be right.” He paused a moment, “I think that I have to go, but you could stay.” He gave a small laugh, “Maybe just save me a slice of pie.”

	Sion didn’t know what was happening, but maybe, just maybe he could save his friend this time.

	Kurian stared at him for a moment, confused that his friend was being so gracious, but also delighted that for once, he might avoid being caught in one of Sion’s hair brained schemes. After thinking it over, though, he just gave Sion a roguish smile, “Naw. Her pie isn’t that great anyway! Let’s go see some humans, haha.”

	Sion’s spirit took a back seat again, and events unfolded the way they always had. As the two boys were walking, Sion wondered how he had forgotten what a troublemaker Kurian had been. At least half of the trouble the two boys had gotten into had been because of something Kurian himself had come up with. Mentally shaking his head, he held true to his decision to stay in the moment. He laughed with his friend, telling funny stories and lame jokes. Unlike the last four times he had relived these days, Sion’s spirit fully committed to sharing the joy of his younger self. He didn’t let the events he knew were coming tomorrow, ruin his proverbial today.

	The two boys came upon the human camp and had to listen to the badger’s violent death. Sion just felt sympathy for his younger self and friend. He stood witness with them as they waited for the men to fall asleep. They ran from the camp, and his younger self grabbed the other sprite.

	“Stop Kurian!”

	“What,” his friend hissed back. “Why? We need to get away from here!”

	Every other time, Sion’s spirit had tried to force his younger self’s body into actions that would have been unnatural at that age. Sion decided not to make the same mistake again. He thought he finally understood.

	This time, he immersed his spirit in the moment. He embraced the feeling of fear that was making his younger self’s heart hammer almost audibly. He admitted to himself that he was ashamed that he had just sat by while that badger had been tortured. By surrendering to the pull of events, he found the strength to change them slightly.

	“I feel horrible about what those men are doing,” young Sion said.

	“I do too,” Kurian said panting.

	“I can’t just let it happen. I’m going to sneak back and try to free the animals.” Sion paused, “Those men need to be stopped, though. Maybe you should run back to the Hearth Tree, and alert the warriors.” Sion’s spirit held its virtual breath. Was he really about to save his friend?

	Kurian’s face was torn with indecision. He looked in the direction of the sprite community and then looked back towards the humans’ encampment. He was clearly wrestling with what he should do, but then his face firmed. He looked Sion directly in the eye.

	“No,” Kurian said, shaking his head. “I was feeling the same way. Honestly, if you hadn’t said something, I was probably going to speak up in a few minutes. Like the Hearth Mother always says, it is our duty to protect the forest and its creatures. I’m going back with you.”

	“You don’t have to,” young Sion said. His spirit was silently pleading for Kurian to just keep walking away. He literally couldn’t say any more though.

	“Of course I do,” Kurian said with his rakish grin. “We meet every danger together til death. Or have you forgotten the oath we swore under the Hearth Tree?”

	Sion’s spirit reeled with shock. He had forgotten! There was no oath more serious for their people. Years before the events Sion’s spirit was being forced to relive, the two boys had drawn blood from their fingers and mixed it with the dirt beneath the Hearth Tree. Then they had sworn eternal friendship and allegiance, with the earnestness that only children can produce. Their mothers had tanned their hides when they found out they were making oaths at such a young age, but it hadn’t deterred them. THAT was why Kurian always followed Sion on his adventures, and why Sion did the same when the situation was reversed.

	The two boys started walking towards the camp. The following events played out as scripted. They were still captured. Kurian was still tortured before death, and hate still wormed its way into Sion’s young heart. A hate that would ultimately lead him to let a good man be eaten alive while he stood by and did nothing. The outcome had not changed. For the first time, though, Sion realized that maybe changing history wasn’t the point of… whatever this was. Perhaps the point was to change who he was in the present.

	“Why did Kurian die?”

	Sion was laying on the floor of the tunnel. He couldn’t seem to scrounge up the will to move. Or maybe he lacked the strength. The distinction didn’t seem important right now. His lips were sore, and when he ran his tongue over them, they felt like dried meat. When he first tried to respond, only a squeak came out. The face made of roots seemed to understand that he was trying, and didn’t repeat itself. It merely waited. Sion was in a daze and nothing seemed quite real. He became aware that both his health and stamina bars were perilously low. There was an icon that looked like a pile of salt next to each of them.

	He mustered the strength to drink one of the healing potions Richter had given him. He barely had any rise in his health bar. The portion of the bars that weren’t filled with color weren’t just empty. They looked greyed out like nothing could fill them. When he examined the pile of salt icon, he learned what it meant. He was dehydrated. He was literally dying of thirst. Sion knew he wouldn’t survive another cycle of memories, but he accepted that.

	Even though he was still impossibly weak, he tried to sit himself up. That did not work out well. When he regained consciousness, he realized that he must have passed out from the strain. After that, he decided that he could give his answer lying down. He raised his head slightly and saw that the face was still looking at him. The health potion had at least served to moisten his mouth.

	“Why did Kurian die,” Sion repeated. “He died because he and I were too dumb to listen to our elders. He died because we put ourselves in a dangerous situation. And he died, because we were unlucky enough to stumble across evil men. My best friend died because of who I was, and because of who he was, and because sometimes things just fall apart. It doesn’t matter why he died. What matters is that I will remember him.” He mustered his remaining strength for what could be his last words. “So you do whatever you need to do. It does, not, matter, why my friend died. It matters how he lived.”

	With those last words, Sion’s head dropped back down to the floor of the tunnel. He kept his eyes on the face made of roots, but he was completely exhausted. The face just smiled, though, and then the roots unraveled, leaving the way to the next chamber open. A prompt filled his vision.

	You have just completed the secret Quest: The Wisdom to Tell the Difference. You have delved deep into your worst pain. This trial by fire did not destroy you however, it tempered you into a better version of yourself. In every life, there will be sorrow. Some choose to run from it, others assume responsibility for that which was always out of their control, many hide behind excuses, and still more try to force an outcome that is beyond their ability. You have taken a finer path. You accepted both the good and ill that you have committed. You have proven that you have the ability to face the truth. May your insight serve you well. Reward: 5,000 experience. Personal reward: Wisdom +10. Personal reward: A new Ability.

	You have received the Ability: Know Thyself. You faced your internal demons and controlled them. As such, you will be much more resilient against spells or effects dealing with the Enchantment School of Magic, ie Charm, Daze, Compulsion.

	He had barely finished reading when he heard, “Sion? Sion?! SION!!! Yoshi! Daniella! I can see him! Come quick!” Then he was moving backwards. He would move and then stop, move and then stop. He realized he was being pulled by the forgotten rope Richter had tied around his waist. He also realized for the first time that he was not about to die. The emotional drain of his ordeal had let him ignore the demands of his body. Now that he again had hope, though, that separation from reality dissolved. He began to feel every ache that his prolonged immobility had caused. Also, the dry parchment that comprised his throat felt like daggers sliding against each other when he swallowed.

	In no time at all, Richter had pulled his Companion free of the tunnel. In no time at all after that, he was peppering the sprite with questions.

	“Where have you been? What happened? What’s with this secret quest? Are you alright? WHY AREN’T YOU TALKING?”

	Sion just stared up at his giant of a friend. Richter was sitting on the ground, half cradling his friend. The sprites legs sprawled across the floor while his back leaned against Richter’s chest. The support was welcomed because otherwise he would be probably just be lying helpless and flat on the floor. Despite that, after everything he had just gone through, Richter’s exuberance was a complete overload of the senses. Not having the strength to curse his friend’s attentive but irritating behavior, he just let the twitch in his left eye communicate that for him. He also decided to succinctly verbalize his most heartfelt desire. “Waaater,” he croaked.

	Richter immediately reached into his Bag, and brought out a water skin. Placing it to Sion’s lips he let a slow trickle of water flow out.

	Sion hacked and coughed up that first sip. It made the pain in his throat increase exponentially. A few scant drops were swallowed though, and some was even greedily absorbed by the tissue of his pharynx. The small amount of moisture he retained let him swallow more of the next sip, though he still coughed some up. It was as if his body refused to believe in a world that he wasn’t dying of thirst. By the third sip, he was able to keep from coughing and a few precious drops slid down his throat. When he drank a fourth time, he swallowed a whole mouthful and a sensation that could only be called bliss permeated his every cell. He closed his eyes and heaved a sigh of relief.

	When he opened his eyes, he saw his three comrades staring down at him anxiously. For their benefit, he gave a weak smile. They all visibly relaxed. He closed his eyes again, and Richter put the water skin back to his lips. For a while, that’s all he did. Slowly sip water, and enjoy the sensation of bringing his body back from the brink of death. When he had his fill, he looked at the rest of his party and said, “I have been on a journey. Several in fact. And while I will eventually tell you everything that happened, I can’t right now. The experience is too fresh, and sharing it might break my heart.” Daniella reached out and held his hand, squeezing lightly.

	“Besides,” Sion continued, “I seem to be lying in my own feces. Would you help me,” he asked Richter, somewhat embarrassed.

	“Of course,” his friend said. Moving slowly so as not to jostle his Companion, Richer stood and cradled Sion, carrying him to the pool of water. With a wry smile, Richter said, “I was trying to be polite and not mention the smell.”

	“Oh, is that why you looked like that? I thought you were just constipated,” Sion replied. Richter gave a small chuckle and started walking toward the underground lake.

	Sion looked up at his best friend and thought how lucky he was that in only one lifetime, he had found two men who were like brothers to him. Then another thought occurred and he said, “If you tell anyone you carried me like this, I will literally cut your balls off.”

	Richter just laughing and kept walking.





CHAPTER 25




	After Sion was cleaned, he promptly fell asleep. He drifted in and out of consciousness over the next day or two. While he was awake, he told his group about how he had been reliving the past. He didn’t include every minor detail, but he did share the salient points. He answered their questions as best he could, but much of what he had experienced was indescribable. When he was done speaking he further explained how the events of those long lost days had contributed to his initial animosity towards Richter for being a human. He asked for forgiveness. Richter, of course, said it wasn’t necessary, but thanked him for the apology and looked away. Sion saw a faint glisten in his friend’s eye before he turned his face.

	Daniella was feeling much improved and had more color in her face. Yoshi still looked wan, but at least was able to walk and talk. He wouldn’t discuss exactly what the demoness’s last spell had done to him, simply saying he would be fine.

	Sion also explained the secret quest. Apparently all of the party members had been notified that the quest had been completed and gotten the experience, but not the personal reward. Richter complained jokingly that next time Sion finished a secret quest to let him drink a Potion of Clarity first next time. Right after that though, he shared with a big smile that the quest had let him reach level 17.

	Sion received a shock when he was told that he had been in the tunnel for almost three days! It was no wonder he had almost died of thirst. Daniella told him that through the entire first day, Richter had barely looked away in hopes that he would reappear and he could be pulled to safety. Daniella had tried to convince him to leave the hole the next day by saying she would watch. Yoshi had awoken so he offered to help too. Richter still wouldn’t agree until Yoshi pointed out that standing around wasn’t helping his friend.

	That reasoning apparently worked because against both Daniella and Yoshi’s protests, he had walked up to the sigil-inscribed door and walked in. Yoshi was mustering the strength to go in after him when, surprising both sprites, he walked back out five minutes later with a key in one hand and a tube in the other.

	“What happened,” Sion asked. “How did you beat the last door so quickly?”

	Richter smiled, “It was a riddle. When I walked through the first door, it shut behind me and vanished. All that was left behind me was a blank wall.” Sion nodded in sympathy knowing exactly what that was like.

	“In front of me were two more doors. Each door had a sculpture attached to the front. The one on the left was a blond haired angel, dressed in white. The door on the left was a redheaded succubus. Dressed in nothing,” he gave Sion a wink. Daniella sniffed in the background.

	“Well, they both started talking in sync. The jist of it was that one door led to safety and the other led to certain death. No matter what question was asked, one statue would always tell the truth, and the other would always lie. Trick was, I didn’t know which statue was the liar.”

	“Sooo,” Sion asked drawing the word out. “How did you figure it out,” he asked impatiently.

	“Well,” Richter exclaimed, clearly enjoying torturing his friend a little bit by drawing the story out. “I just asked one what the other would say if I asked what the right door was. Then I went through the door opposite to what she said.” Richter’s tone was offhand as he relayed the solution, as if such logical leaps were commonplace.

	Sion face screwed up as he tried to work his way through his Companion’s reasoning. It had obviously worked or he wouldn’t be here, but thinking through the various permutations was starting to make his head hurt. “How did you figure that out so quickly,” Sion asked.

	Richter laughed loudly, then extended two fingers on both hands in what he told Sion were called ‘peace signs.’ He slapped his fingers together twice quickly, and said in a gruff voice, “Hashtag DavidBoweLabyrinthBitch!”

	He reached into his Bag, and pulled out the pipe he had found, showing it to Sion. It had four grooves cut into it, and the handles of each the three keys they had collected fit perfectly into one of the grooves. One end of the pipe had a lens, and the other end had a stylized eye etched into it. When he had gone through the door (the succubus one, Richter added with another wink), there had been a small room with just the key and the pipe. He had then walked back the way he had come. The door back to the central chamber had reappeared by the time he tried to leave.

	“So you just sat around waiting for me to come back? I guess you missed me,” Sion said with a little grin on his face.

	“Well! I did take the finish my first Lore book, and I gained the skill. I also, cough, took the time to do some training,” Richter said examining his nails.

	“He’s been casting nonstop! Light spells, his Grease spell, moving around hasted! The worst has been that damn fire spell,” Yoshi snapped. “He would shoot one of those icicles, and then melt it. Over and over! It’s not like the smell in here was that great to begin with!”

	“So that’s why it’s so muggy in here,” Sion said with a laugh.

	“What else was I supposed to do with time to kill and an entire village mana pool to play with,” Richter said laughing too. Then he sat down next to Sion, and the levity left his face, “That just leaves your key. After we pulled you out I tried to crawl into the tunnel to get to the chamber on the other side. When I put so much as a hand inside though, the tunnel starts closing shut. I looked at the writing around the hole again, and it had changed. Now it says, ‘Only the proven may pass.’” He looked earnestly at his friend, “I know you have been through lot, but will you try to get the key again?”

	Sion nodded, “I don’t think there is anything left to fear. Let me try now.” His health and stamina were back to full strength; the pile of salt icon had disappeared after the first day.

	Sion walked over to the open hatch and climbed into the shaft. He couldn’t lie and say that his heart didn’t start pounding harder when he reached the halfway point, and he couldn’t help but steal a glance backwards. The tunnel remained open though, and the roots remained in place. He made it to the end of the shaft and saw a brown key hanging from the wall. There was nothing else in the room. He climbed back into the tunnel and was soon standing with his party again.

	Richter took the key and put it with its brothers in the pipe. When the last key was in place, all four moved of their own accord and locked into position perpendicular to the pipe. Two keys stuck out from each side. They all walked up to the banded door, Alma draped over Richter’s shoulders. He held one end of the pipe up to his eye as indicated and looked down the length, through all four keys holes. Richter gave a surprised grunt and walked up to the right side of the door. Choosing a spot somewhere in the high middle, he raised one hand, the other still holding the pipe up to his eye. After moving his hand back and forth slightly as if looking for the exact right spot, he pushed his bare palm against the door.

	Both Daniella and Sion reached forward in protest. Clearly Richter had forgotten about the deadly shriek venom. He didn’t fall to the ground screaming, though. In fact, his hand seemed to disappear into the metal of the door up to his mid-forearm. Richter strained for a second and then gave a grunt, turning his wrist slowly the right. He kept up this slow rotation until his wrist had turned ninety degrees, then pulled his arm back out. Immediately a large clanging could be heard. Richter quickly stepped back.

	The bands of metal vibrated, and then the entire door started turning to the left. The grinding sound of metal continued. The movement of the door acquired an upward component, and it became clear that what they were seeing was a giant sphere. After minutes of watching the slow rotation change direction several times, it finally stopped. A doorway was set into the part of the sphere they were finally presented with.

	Four key holes were present in the door. Each one followed the next making a diagonal. The keyholes were distinct colors making it easy to see which key went where. After removing them from the pipe, Richter placed each key in the correct slot. When all of them had been turned, there was a loud thunk, like a bolt drawing back and the door swung open.

	Congratulations! You have finished the quest: Unlock your Power II. As you have already mastered Air Magic, you may now choose another of the Powers that comprise your domain. Your options are Life, Dark or Water. Which path will you choose?

	Reward: 11,250 (base 9,000) experience.

	Choosing a Power will give you a +50% effectiveness increase to spells of that branch. You will also have +50% resistance to spells of that Power. Unique to being a Master of a Place of Power, however, is your access to each Power’s specialized ability.

	Life Ability: “Bounty of Life” +30% growth for the physical manifestation of your Place of Power

Dark Ability: “Hidden Treasures” +30% yield from treasure

Water Ability: “Tranquil Soul” -30% mana cost for spells

	Richter had already made his choice before he started the quest. Tranquil Soul was obviously tempting. He wouldn’t always be able to rely on his village’s mana pool. In the upcoming fights with the bugbears, it would be a real boon to be able to cast more spells. Water magic was not his choice, though. Similarly, Hidden Treasures was a hard offer to pass up. What mattered though, was preparing his village, and the people in it, for the future. He chose Life.

	You have chosen Mastery of Life!

	Congratulations! You have obtained the Ability: Bounty of Life. +30% growth for the physical manifestation of your Place of Power.

	Congratulations! You are a Master of Life Magic. All Life spells cast by you are 50% stronger. You have 50% resistance to Life magic. You can teach the skill Life Magic to anyone with over a 50% affinity for the skill. You can teach specific Life spells to anyone with the appropriate skill level to learn them.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Courage! Improves your Fighting Spirit by +50. This is a spell of Life. Cost: 25 mana. Duration: 15 min. Range: self. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 15 min.

	Congratulations! You have learned the spell: Minor Life Armor! Defense of all armor pieces increased by +1 (+4 vs Death attacks). Cost: 40 mana. Duration: 30 min. Range: self. Cast Time: 1 seconds. Cooldown: N/A

	You have been awarded 12,500 (base 10,000) experience for your new Mastery.

	Congratulations! You have unlocked the Quest: Unlock your Power III. Your village will increase your power, but you must care for it in turn. Currently, there is a local dungeon that needs to be cleared out. Reward: Unlock one of the Powers. Yes or No?

	TRING!

	You have reached level 18! Through hard work you have moved forward along your path. As a Chaos Seed, you gain 6 points to distribute to characteristics instead of the usual 4. You also get 25% advancement to the skill of your choice! Crush your enemies, honor your allies, LIVE!

	You have either characteristic points or skill percentage points to allocate from the previous level. Now that you have progressed again, you must allocate your points within the next week or they will randomly be assigned for you.

	Richter didn’t know what was more exciting. The boost his village was about to get, all of the new points he had to allocate or the fact that they were finally getting out of this dungeon. Freedom! The idea of it almost made him giddy. All of the party was ready to see blue skies again! He quickly chose ‘Yes’ to accept his new quest, and got moving. He would ask Futen about it later.

	They wasted no time and started walking down the narrow hall. Richter was pulling up the rear and was about to enter, when Futen spoke.

	“Are you sure that you wish to leave the column behind, my Lord?”

	Richter looked at the remnant from the doorway, “You mean I can take it with me?” That thing would pay for the portal construction all by itself if he melted it down! “Hold on guys,” he called out.

	He walked over to the column, and lowered his center of gravity by bending at the knees. His dad had warned him early and often of the dangers of lifting with your back. He wrapped his arms around the column, and then heaved!

	“My Lord,” Futen began.

	“I got this,” Richter wheezed. He stopped his pull, and reset his body. Taking a deep breath, he tried to pull the column out of the ground again. Veins stood out in his neck and his face turned red. The other members of his party delayed their exit to watch.

	Richter tried one more time. If this didn’t work, he would invest his twelve free characteristic points into Strength. “Cooommeee onnnnn!” He pulled with everything he had. He felt like he was squeezing the column so hard that something was going to shoot out of it. Turns out, he had it backwards. He straightened quickly, just hoping no one had heard.

	“Futen! How am I supposed to take this thing? It weighs a ton! It’s like when you asked me to grab the altar…,” Richter’s lips pressed together in an embarrassed moue. “Never mind. I’ve got it.”

	He simply placed his hand on the column, and willed its interface to come up. Now that they had defeated the dungeon, at least this level, he should be able to give it commands. At least that was how it had worked with a Dark Altar from the first quest to unlock his power. Sure enough, when he focused, he could now access the column’s prompt. He chose ‘Remove Core’ from the available options.

	A hole appeared at the top of the column. The Core rose out of it, and hovered six inches above the column. When he picked it up, the column lost its gold color becoming nothing more than the same grey stone of the walls. For the first time in days, the central chamber wasn’t bathed in golden light. None of that mattered to Richter though because of what he now held.

	You have found: Magic Core. Durability 15,000/15,000. Item class: Epic. Quality: Masterwork. Weight: 12.7 kg. Magical Cores can be used to power any number of devices.

	Richter held the clockwork sphere above his head, its red and white internal light painting the walls. He aimed a huge smile at Sion. Sion smiled back and said, “I heard you, stinky.”

	Richter’s grin slipped into an expression of mild irritation, “Let’s just get out of here.”

	“Whatever you say Captain, Toots,” Sion said happily.

	He tried to brush past the sprite, but Sion stopped him, an aggrieved expression on his face. “What are you thinking,” he asked Richter. “Don’t walk try to walk past me while you trailing fire!” Sion took point and the other sprites followed leaving Richter to pull up the rear. When he arrived at the other side, he saw a second staircase leading down that hadn’t been visible from the central room.

	Sion and Daniella hadn’t even paused and were already climbing the stairs to get out. Yoshi had stopped though, and staring down the dark staircase. His hand was slowly opening and closing into a fist. The adept didn’t seem aware of the motion. Richter walked up beside him.

	“I know what you’re thinking. I haven’t forgotten about the eaters either, but we are beat all to hell. We need to have our disease cured, and,” Richter pulled Yoshi’s shoulder to make the man look at him, “I know that whatever spell you got hit with at the end of the fight took a serious toll on you.”

	Yoshi looked back at the stairs again, still unconvinced. Richter tried another tack, “Someone once told me there was no honor in pushing through a bad position. The faster we leave this dungeon. The faster we can mobilize both of our peoples to deal with this threat.”

	Yoshi stared at the stairs a while longer, then nodded, “You are right, Lord Richter.”

	Richter raised an eyebrow. “Lord,” he asked.

	“I didn’t know what to make of you when we first met, but we have fought side by side. I now know you are a man of honor, strength and courage. I call you Lord Richter because you deserve it.”

	Richter was taken aback by the sword adept’s praise. He reached out his hand, and Yoshi extended his own, both men gripping the other’s wrist. They gave a small squeeze then Yoshi said, “But don’t think this gets you out of sword practice.”

	Richter struggled to keep a grin off of his face, “Of course not. Tomorrow morning bright and early. You, me, and our cankers.”

	Yoshi nodded and released his grip. He walked past to the stairs, but not before Richter saw him crack a faint smile. Richter followed after. The stairway wound like a corkscrew going ever upwards. They also moved somewhat at an angle however, so the ascent took longer than it otherwise would have. After walking for almost an hour, Sion called out “I see a door!”

	“Yes,” Richter shouted. His enthusiasm made his voice echo loudly in the confined space of the stairwell, but everyone was so excited to be outside again that no one complained. “I’m ready for bright blue skies and sunshine! Now who’s with me?”

	Daniella and Sion cheered, and even Yoshi had a bit of pep in his step. They hurried to open the door and rushed outside… and it was nighttime… and it was raining. Richter looked up at the sky and said, “Universe, you’re a dick.”





CHAPTER 26




	Despite the fact that it was raining, they still decided to make their way back. With Futen hovering above, there was more than enough light. They all had reasons to hasten back to the Mist Village. Richter was somewhat concerned about running into something big and bad at night, but Alma flew over watch. He felt better knowing that she should be able to detect the psychic emanations of most predators or humanoids, and there weren’t any flying predators that should be a threat to her. That’s what Richter hoped anyway.

	After an hour the sky was a slightly lighter shade of black which Richter took to mean daybreak was near. It was tough to tell though, because the rain had started to fall even harder. All of them were completely drenched by that time. They slogged along in silence. Even though none of them were comfortable, they were still in fine spirits because every step they took was a step closer to healing and shelter.

	The rain did provide an excellent opportunity for Richter to train his skills. He maintained Stealth almost the entire time. With his improved Herb Lore, the world was also alive with slightly glowing leaves, flowers and roots. Richter realized that this was the first time he had been out in the forest at night since planting the Quickening. It was true that useful plants would glow in the day as well, but they were so much easier to see at night. He plucked a good many while they traveled. Remembering his difficulty with retrieving Dark Moss when he first came to The Land, he was delighted that the herbs seemed to basically leap into his hands at this point. The gain in his Herb Lore skill was minimal unfortunately. Leveling the skill now that is was level 39 was exponentially harder than it had been at the early levels.

	*Men*, Alma thought. She sent him an image of a man in a green cloak hiding in the limbs of a tree. Another was hidden in the bushes at the base of the tree.

	*How far*, he thought back.

	She sent an image of the forest from a higher elevation. All he could see was trees however. The ability to communicate psychically with his familiar was amazing, but clearly it was not without its limits. The psi dragonling didn’t seem to be able to grasp the idea of precise distance. Couldn’t be too easy for a flying creature to relate distance to someone that walked everywhere, Richter thought. Luckily Alma wasn’t their only option.

	*Come back,* he thought.

	He raised his hand for everyone to stop. “Futen, kill the light and go invisible.” The remnant disappeared. Richter hunched low and hid behind a tree, the rest of the party spreading out and doing the same. After a minute, the flapping of wings heralded the Alma’s return.

	She landed on his shoulder. “Which way,” he asked softly. Her body straightened like a bloodhound, indicating about thirty degrees to the right of the direction they had been heading.

	“Futen.”

	“Yes, my Lord.” Futen’s disembodied voice was no more than a foot in front of his face. The remnant spoke at a low volume. Apparently, he was learning.

	“Go in that direction,” Richter said. “Stay invisible and scout until you find a man in a green cloak or you reach the end of your range. If you find someone scout around the immediate area to see if there is anyone else. After that come back and let me know how far away they are. If you don’t find anyone just come back. We will move forward and start again.”

	“Yes, my Lord.”

	Richter walked to each of his comrades and explained the situation. All readied their weapons. The only sound was the rain falling around them like a dull roar. Five minutes passed, and then ten. Richter was starting to think the man was beyond Futen’s range of travel, when a low monotone voice spoke right in front him.

	“I found a figure in the green cloak, my Lord. It appears to one man alone. I did not locate anyone else in the surrounding area. He is in the low branches of a tree approximately one hundred and twenty yards in the direction you indicated.”

	“Was he looking in this direction,” Richter asked. Futen answered in the affirmative. Richter nodded, the man must have seen the light Futen had been shining. Made sense, he would have had to be blind to miss a moving spotlight in the middle of a dark forest. When the light went out, one of the men must have run off for help, while the other kept watch.

	Richter waved everyone over and shared the information, then made a plan of attack. “We need to move quickly before it gets any lighter. Sion and Daniella, I want you to fan out in opposite directions. Go about seventy yards forward. Yoshi and I will move forward until we go the same distance. Then I’ll send Futen. When he is hovering in front of the man’s face, he will emit a bright light and loud sound. Then we move in while he is disoriented. Capture him if you can. I need to know who he is, and where the other one went.”

	Everyone nodded and moved to follow Richter’s directions. Two minutes later there was a loud bang, and the night filled with light. Stark shadows were cast by the trees, even through the downpour. There was a loud exclamation of “Gahhh!” then the sound of snapping trees limbs followed by a thud. All four of the party members were running as soon as the light flared. They crossed the remaining distance in only a few seconds and soon had weapons pointed at the man’s throat. Richter threw back the man’s hood and stared down at a somewhat familiar face. He couldn’t quite place him though. He used Analyze.

	Name: Jitol. Wood Elf. Level 9. Health 150/190. Mana 230. Stamina 180. Disposition: Friendly…

	A friendly disposition? It all clicked. This was one of the hunters from the Mist Village! Richter realized he should have deduced the truth when the other man ran off into the mist. Either these men had strong magic to counteract the mist, or the two men were hunters that Richter himself had given immunity to. He looked down at the man who was groaning at their feet. Then he looked at Jitol’s leg which was curving at a point that it was never supposed to bend. “Duuuude. This is soooo my bad!”

	Jitol just groaned again.

	It was clear they couldn’t just leave the man, but at the same time they would need to set his leg before they started moving. Sion and Daniella held him down, while Yoshi positioned himself at the man’s leg. It was possible that they could infect the man with their disease, but it was a chance they had to take. Either way, even if he was infected, he should have enough health to survive until they got him back to Sumiko or Hisako. Once everything was set, Richter gave a nod, and Yoshi straightened the bones with a sure and strong yank. Jitol screamed, and then passed out. Sion and Daniella started tying the elf’s leg into a splint. Richter cast Slow Heal. It wouldn’t fix the break, but it would restore some of the man’s lost health. Daniella had explained that it required a specific spell to heal bones, and it was well beyond her abilities. When the sprites cinched the split tight on Jitol’s leg, he groaned deeply again, but didn’t regain consciousness.

	Man, Richter thought, I owe this guy like at least a fruit basket when we get back.

	They spent some time making a stretcher. The found two stout branches, and Richter donated his cloak as the final piece. The loaded the elf, trying not to jostle him too much. Then they started walking again. Richter had Futen shine his brightest light above them. He knew that reinforcements would be coming from the village soon, and he didn’t want to be shot by mistake.

	Sure enough, less than an hour later Alma sent him an image of a large number of armed people walking in their direction. Richter called her back to him. He didn’t want an elf with an ‘itchy trigger finger’ shooting his familiar. He called a stop and again told Futen to make his light as bright as possible. The wait wasn’t too long.

	“Identify yourself,” a voice called out of the dark.

	“This is Lord Richter, Adept Yoshi, and sprites Sion and Daniella,” he said in a strong voice. “We have Jitol with us. He needs medical aid. We are with Futen. You should be able to see him.”

	It was quiet for a few moments, and then a man came into the light. Richter recognized him as well, and his name was… Yanosh. As soon as Yanosh saw his face, he breathed a sigh of relief. “It’s Lord Richter,” he called out. Jitol is hurt! Everyone come help!”

	A motley crowd of about twenty people came into the radius of Futen’s light. Dwarves in chainmail stood by wood elf archers. Men carrying clubs and axes stood in front of high elves in hide and leather armor. These were his people. There were looks of uncertainty or fear on the faces of more than a few, but that didn’t matter. They had come to fight, no, to protect their homes, even though they didn’t know what they would face. Richter’s heart swelled with pride.

	He heard his name on the lips of many of the men and women. It began as a scattered whisper, but it soon became a chant, “Lord Richter, Lord Richter, Lord Richter!” He raised his hand, and said, “I missed all of you as well! Now who brought me an ale?!”

	There were laughs all around, and everyone came closer to clasp hands, but Richter waved them back. “We were successful, but it wasn’t without cost. We have been infected by a spell. I need everyone to stay back until we are healed.” He turned to Yanosh, “Who is the fastest runner?”

	“That would be me, my Lord,” he replied.

	“I’m assuming there are still people standing guard despite all of you being here?”

	“Most definitely, my Lord,” Yanosh said with pride. “We won’t let anyone sneak up on us again!

	“I need you to run ahead. Don’t go into the village. When you are close, shout out to one of the guards and tell him to bring either Sumiko or Hisako. When they come close, tell them about the infection, but do not touch them. Tell them quietly. I don’t want to start a panic. Respectfully ask them to meet us. I won’t risk coming into the village before we are cured. And I’m sorry to ask this of all of you, but everyone here will need to be checked before entering the village.” Some of the men and women started to shuffle restlessly. “I know that must be concerning, but rest assured I think any danger is minimal. I will not however, allow any possibility of sickness into our community. Think of your friends and families that are behind the walls, and you will know I’m right.”

	Everyone nodded and spoke silently to each other. Richter had a feeling that would be the case. Fear was a natural response in anyone, but given the chance to protect the people they loved, many would find their courage. Yanosh ran off and everyone else moved away into the mists. Richter and his friends continued behind with Jitol who thankfully remained unconscious.





CHAPTER 27




	The rain had stopped while the party carried Jitol. Soon the walls of the village came into view. They weren’t just earthworks anymore. The sections of wall that stood to either side of the gate were now marbled quartz. It wasn’t much, but it made Richter happy to see that the defenses were improving. They were met well outside of walls by both Hisako, Sumiko and what looked to be all of the sprite warriors. Richter caught a look of apprehension on her face. She scanned the faces of every member of the village rescue party. When she saw Richter and the sprites pulling up the rear, her face relaxed into a smile.

	She ran forward, evidently surprising her sprite guards, who scurried to keep up. The ol’ girl still had some pep in her step! She met them before they had crossed half the remaining distance, and she ran up to Sion, embracing him despite his protests. The stretcher tipped, and Jitol woke up with a cry when he almost fell.

	With a chagrined look, the normally zen Hisako let go of Sion and with a wave of her hand, gold light surrounded the wounded wood elf’s leg. His cry cut off and was replaced by a sigh of relief. Richter looked at him, and saw that Jitol had closed his eyes, and was happily laying back to enjoy a pain free moment. A moment was all he got.

	“You do realize four sick people are carrying a healthy person now right,” Yoshi asked tersely.

	“Wha- Oh. I’m sorr-. My apologies, Lord Richter!” The wood elf started flailing around trying to stand up. His movements were so awkward that he threatened to knock over the four people carrying him. Yoshi solved that problem by just dropping his corner of the stretcher and walking around to Hisako. Intentionally helpful or not, it did let Jitol slide off to the ground. He tested his ‘new’ leg, and was apparently satisfied because he stood on his own two feet with no difficulty. The whole time he kept up a running stream of apologies and thanks.

	Richter clapped him on the shoulder laughing, “Don’t worry about it! Let’s just call it even.”

	“Uh, even for what, my Lord,” the elf asked.

	“Nothing,” Richter said with a too wide smile. “Just, say we’re even.”

	“We’re… even,” Jitol asked with an unsure tone in his voice.

	“Great,” Richter said feeling better about the whole leg breaky, near death thing. ‘What’s that Karma? I’m squeaking by on a technicality? He SAID we were even! You just don’t get it.’ Richter brought his mind back to more important things.

	“Hisako,” he said, “it is good to see you. I find myself in need of your help.”

	“I see that,” she responded wryly. “Just how did you get infected with cankerous rot?”

	“Well there was a crypt mistress and-”

	“Say no more,” she said holding up here hand. “Just remember in the future, that if you lay down with dogs, then you get up with fleas.”

	“What,” Richter asked in a surprised tone. “No, no, it was nothing like tha-”

	She cut him off again, raising her hand up to stop him. She closed her eyes, pursed her lips, and gently shook her head side to side, “Tut tut. I’m not one to judge. Let’s just fix you.”

	Richter looked at Sion incredulously. Sion just stared back as if to say, ‘what do you want me to do?’

	Hisako arranged the four adventurers around her. Then she began chanting. The air began to glow with a diffuse golden light which infused the space around her for five feet. A disc of solid gold light then appeared at their feet and began moving upward. Once it had risen above all of their heads she stopped casting. Richter rechecked his status page and smiled.

	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 18, 36%

Health: 430 Mana: 420 Stamina: 210

Strength: 29

Agility: 24

Dexterity: 34

Constitution: 25

Endurance: 21

Intelligence: 35

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 24

Luck: 15

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Bounty of Life

Psi Bond

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 39; 22% to next level

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level

Analyze Lvl 6; 7% to next level

Pierce the Veil Lvl 23; 45% to next level

Stealth Lvl 6; 14% to next level

Traps Lvl 21; 87% to next level

Trap Disarm Lvl 21; 99% to next level

Archery Lvl 10; 24% to next level

Imbue Arrow Lvl 5; 18% to next level

Focus Lvl 3; 78% to next level

Double Shot Lvl 3; 31% to next level,

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 40% to next level

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 15% to next level

Small Blades Lvl 4; 43% to next level

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level

Light Armor Lvl 8; 18% to next level

Grace in Combat Lvl 5; 38% to next level

Air Magic Lvl 6; 37% to next level

Life Magic Lvl 5; 82% to next level

Earth Magic Lvl 4; 92% to next level

Water Magic Lvl 5; 47% to next level

Dark Magic Lvl 5; 22% to next level

Light Magic Lvl 4; 48% to next level

Fire Magic Lvl 5; 9% to next level

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 14; 86% to next level

War Leader Lvl 2, 43% to next level

Enchantment Lvl 1; 44% to next level

Portal Construction Apprentice

Lore Lvl 1

Marks:

Master of Mist Village

Blood Oath

Resistances:

Air 50%

Earth 20%

Life 50%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 3 “You seem like someone worthy of my attention.”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





	He felt stronger as soon as the light finished scanning him. A quick check of Sion’s page showed he had been cured as well.

	 		 			 Name: Sion

Age: 44

Level: 12, 32% to next level

Health: 230 Mana: 240 Stamina: 140

Strength: 18

Agility: 18

Dexterity: 54

Constitution: 18

Endurance: 14

Intelligence: 24

Wisdom: 13

Charisma: 10

Luck: 12

Abilities:

Wood Craft

Concealment

Know Thyself

Skills:

Herb lore Lvl 11, 51% to next level, 96% affinity

Alchemy Lvl 6, 17% to next level, 9%4 affinity

Archery Lvl 12; 59% to next level, 96% affinity

Imbue Arrow Lvl 8, 12% to next level, 87% affinity

Double Shot Lvl 3; 32% to next level, 98% affinity

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 45% to next level, 98% affinity

Stun Shot Lvl 3; 17% to next level, 99% affinity

Tracking Lvl 5; 62% to next level, 98% affinity

Swordsmanship Lvl 9, 82% to next level, 91% affinity

Air Magic Lvl 7; 61% to next level, 95% affinity

Marks:

None

Resistances:

Types of Magic

Life 10%

Earth 10%

Light 10%

Schools of Magic

Enchantment 50%

Race: Wood Sprite

Reputation: Lvl 1 “Who are you again?”

Alignment: +2

Language: Sprite, Common Tongue





	Sumiko walked up, “I have checked everyone else. They are disease free. It is safe to return to the village.

	“It is good that you have come back,” Hisako said. “There is much to discuss. We have found one of the bugbear’s camps. We need to get ready to move against them. There have also been more monsters seen in the vicinity of your village. I take that to mean you were successful in unlocking another of your powers?”

	“I was,” Richter said, “but what does that have to do with monsters?”

	“I told you before, your growing power will not go unnoticed. Your Place of Power is awakening. You will find the lands surrounding your village to be more dangerous than before. Though you can directly access your power, all of the surrounding lands will be impacted by the reawakening of your Place of Power. Stronger monsters will be drawn to your settlement, and even existing creatures may grow more powerful. That is why we need to remove the danger of the bugbears as soon as possible. You may be facing enemies on different fronts soon.”

	“But your settlement is a much higher level than mine,” Richter protested. “Why aren’t there high-level monsters near the Hearth Tree?” He didn’t need more enemies to fight at the moment. Leveling opportunities were great and all, but enough was enough!

	She laughed without any real humor, “Oh, there are! We just constantly patrol to keep the lands around us relatively safe. If you remember, that is how you met Sion. From what you have told me, you were brought to The Land very close to the Hearth Tree. If you had started farther away… well, then you would have had a very different experience.”

	Richter thought again about his fortuitous starting point. It was becoming clear to him that the advantages he had been provided; the safe haven of the glade, Xuetrix’s advice, the Pool of Clarity, none of them had been small things. Put all together, well, he just might owe a large debt to someone out there. What would he do when they came to collect?

	“The situation is worse than you know, Hearth Mother,” Yoshi said. “We were attacked by eaters.”

	A colorful sequence of profanity spewed from Hisako’s mouth. Richter stared at her. Not just in shock, you understand, but also because he was thoroughly impressed. When the bile stopped flowing, she just stood there for a few moments. When she spoke again, there was no uncertainty in her voice.

	“If the scourge has indeed returned, then it must take precedence.” She started walking, and they all fell in step with her. She looked at Richter, “I had hoped that our two peoples could deal with the threat of the bugbears, but if eaters are now involved we will need more allies. I will send an emissary to reach out to the wood elves of the northern Forest. We have a long relationship of mutual protection. I need you to try and broker aid from some of the dwarf tribes of the Serrated Mountains. Can you do that?”

	Richter nodded. It was time he got to know the neighbors anyway.

	“Good,” she said a serious expression on her face. “The dwarves have never been enemies of my people, but neither have they been friends. They will not often involve themselves in the affairs of others unless there is a direct benefit to them.”

	“Do you mean I will need to bribe them,” he asked.

	She just arched an eyebrow at him, and then turned forward and kept walking.

	Richter shook his head. Why did it always come down to money? No that’s not the real problem, he thought. It was that it always seemed to come down to his money!

	Alma flew off as they got closer, no doubt in search of game. She had hunted constantly since they had been back above ground. Richter was sure that a squirrel hole or birds nest would have a vacancy soon.

	When they crossed into the boundaries of the village, Hisako spoke to Yoshi, “You need further healing. Sumiko! Go with Yoshi and heal him. He has internal injuries.” Forestalling any argument, Hisako also said, “I won’t hear any argument. We have many enemies. I need you to be at top form. Now go.”

	Yoshi bowed slightly and walked off with Sumiko.

	“Richter, I am going to send some of my warriors to the site where you found the eaters. Hopefully, the nest hasn’t grown too large yet. Sion. Daniella. Are you ready to travel?”

	“Yes, Hearth Mother,” she said

	“Yes, Hearth Mother,” Sion repeated.

	“Then restock and be ready to leave in an hour. I need you to lead us back,” she said. “Randolphus would like you to see him as soon as you can,” she said to Richter. “I have preparations to make, please excuse me.” She walked away then, with the stride of a determined woman who planned to do serious things. The other sprites walked on in tow.

	Richter sent Futen along to check in with the various craftsmen. He was sure the lack of Mist Workers had slowed things down. It sounded like they there was no time to waste. The progress on the wall that initially had so pleased Richter, now just seemed like too little too late. He walked through the village and saw that work on the new longhouse was progressing well. Like he had requested, the basic structure of the smithy was done as well. It had four walls and a roof anyway, and Richter took that as a good sign. Work had been started on several other buildings as well. Like he requested, they were being made out of stone. These would not be so easy to burn, and worse comes to worst, they could hold off attackers much more effectively than wood. Curiously, there were two small wooden shacks set in the center of the village, and there appeared to be guards outside of them. Richter would have walked over to figure out what was happening, but it was in the opposite direction of the Great Seal. He was fairly certain that was where he would find his chamberlain, and Hisako had implied there was some urgency.

	He walked into the Great Seal, and just stood for a moment with a smile on his face. When he had first claimed Mastery of the Mist Village, the Great Seal had only been a chipped and faded mosaic. After claiming his first power, the clear tiles representing Air had changed to a solid disc of crystal. Looking into that clear circle was like looking down in to a swirling maelstrom. Now a second change had occurred.

	The spiral of yellow tile had been replaced. In its place was a work of art. Laid into the floor was a shining representation of a tree created from pure gold. Each leaf was detailed showing the smallest veins. The tree was a backlit by an unseen sun and moved in an unfelt wind. There was no glaring light when he stared down at the newly awakened section of the Great Seal, but when he looked up at the ceiling he could see dapples of light that shifted with the limbs of the tree.

	After a time, he walked past the Great Seal into one of the side rooms. Sure enough, Randolphus was in his office hunched over a stack of papers.

	“You need to get more sun, Randy.”

	“My Lord!” He stood up quickly and bowed, “No one told me that you were back.”

	“Sit down, sit down,” Richter said. “That’s certainly what I plan to do.” He plopped into one of the chairs in front of the desk. “There is a lot that I need to tell you. It looks like we are at war. In addition, Hisako tells me we can start expecting more monster attacks. And last but not least, there is a plague of giant insects called the scourge that we need to eliminate ASAP. Before we get into ALL of that though, Hisako said there are some things you needed to tell me.”

	Randolphus eyes grew wider, and his expression grew more incredulous, as Richter had continued to speak. The last seemed to take the wind out of him though, and he dropped back into his chair. The chamberlain opened his mouth and closed it several times before speaking. These eaters certainly are well known and widely feared, Richter thought to himself. When Randolphus had composed himself, he said, “You are correct, my Lord. There are several things we need to discuss. The first however, is what you want to do about the prisoners. We can’t just continue to keep them under lock and key.”

	“Richter just looked at Randy with a befuddled expression, “Derrrr, what prisoners?”



	~ End ~





Thank you for once again joining me for a walk through my world! The adventures of Richter and Sion continue in “The Land: Alliances” which will be coming soon! As always: Peace, love and the perfect margarita!



	If you liked the book, please leave a review! If you didn’t… it’s not as crucial lol





If you love LitRPG, join the group! Just type “LitRPG” into Facebook or click the link below:

https://www.facebook.com/groups/1030147103683334/



	Like my Author page on Facebook to follow the updates on the new book!

	https://www.facebook.com/LitRPGbooks/?ref=hl





Index


	Richter’s Spells

	Earth

	 	- Barkskin: This spell will increase natural armor by +2. This is a spell of Earth Magic. Cost: 20 mana. Duration: 20 min. Range: self. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: N/A.

	- Grease: This spell will make a 10x10 foot area slick greatly increasing chance of anyone in the area falling down. This is a spell of Earth Magic. Cost: 15 mana. Duration: 5 min. Range 25 feet. Cast time: 2 seconds. Cooldown: 10 min.

	- Summon Insects: Summons a host of stinging and biting insects in a ten-foot wide circle. Causes minimal damage, but impedes concentration. This is a spell of Earth Magic. Cost: 25 mana. Duration: 5 minutes. Range 20 feet. Cast time: 1 second. Cool down: 20 minutes.



	Water

	 	- Ice Dagger: This spell will throw a dagger made of ice at your target. This is a spell of Water Magic. Cost 20 mana. Duration: 1 min. Range: 40 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: N/A.



	Air

	 	- Haste! This spell will increase the speed of the target. This is a spell of Air Magic. Cost 25 mana. Duration: 10 min. Range: 5 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: N/A.

	- Errant Wind! Increase the dodge of your party to projectiles. This spell will only work when you are outside. This is a spell of Air Magic. Cost 50 mana. Duration: 20 min. Range: 50. Cast Time: 4 seconds. Cooldown: 45 min.



	Fire

	 	- Flame! Shoot a weak gout of flame from your hand. This is a spell of Fire Magic. Cost: 10 mana. Duration: 3 seconds. Range: 5 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: N/A.



	Life

	 	- Charm! You can convince an enemy that they are your friend. In battle, they will fight for you. Casting this upon a creature lowers they regard for you after the spell wears off. This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost 60 mana. Duration: 1 hour. Range: 20 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 10 minutes.

	- Slow Heal! Restore 30 missing health over 60 seconds upon casting. This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost 20 mana. Duration: 6 seconds. Range: Touch. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 1 min.

	- Cure! Remove minor poison effects! This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost 50 mana. Duration: 1 second. Range: Touch. Cast time: 2 seconds. Cool down: 30 seconds.

	- Soul Trap: Binds the soul of the target to this plane, preventing passage to the beyond at the time of death. They will instead be pulled into any nearby empty soul stone of appropriate size. This is a spell of Life Magic. Cost: 30 mana. Duration: 2 minutes. Range: 10 feet. Cast time: 1 second. Cool down: N/A.

	- Minor Life Aura. The caster’s body is surrounded by a golden shield of pure Life energy. Any nearby death, dead or undead creatures will be discomforted. Any actual contact with the shield will cause damage to the undead. Cost: 50 mana. Duration: 15 minutes. Range: self. Cast time: 2 seconds. Cooldown: 20 minutes.

	- Courage! Improves your Fighting Spirit by +50. This is a spell of Life. Cost: 25 mana. Duration: 15 min. Range: self. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 15 min.

	- Minor Life Armor! Defense of all armor pieces increased by +1 (+3 vs. Death attacks). Cost: 30 mana. Duration: 10 min. Range: self. Cast Time: 1 seconds. Cooldown: N/A.



	Dark

	 	- Night Vision! You can see even in the deepest darkness. This is a spell of Dark Magic. Cost 5 mana. Duration: 3 hours. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: N/A.]

	- Cloying Darkness! Cast a cone of thickened darkness from your hand. Movement and Attack speed of targets decreased by 20%. All in area of effect will suffer from spell. Will not work in direct sunlight. This is a spell of Dark Magic. Cost 30 mana. Duration: 10 minutes. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cooldown: 5 minutes.

	- Troubled Sleep. Places your target in a restless sleep. He will be plagued by nightmares until awakening. Any attack or hostile action taken against target will awaken them. Area of effect five feet. This is a spell of Dark Magic. Cost: 50 mana. Duration: one hour. Range 15 feet. Cast time: 3 seconds. Cool down: 15 minutes.



	Light

	 	- Simple Light! Creates a ball of white light that will hover above your head, moving with you. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 2 mana. Duration: 10 minutes. Range: Self. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.

	- Far Light! Creates a ball of white light that can be fixed to a distant surface. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 5 mana. Duration: 10 minutes. Range: 100 yards. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.

	- Mirror! Creates a 6x3 foot reflective surface. This is a spell of Light Magic. Cost: 15 mana. Duration: 1 minute. Range: 10 feet. Cast Time: 1 second. Cool Down: N/A.





Richter’s Current Weapons and Armor

	Armor

	Sprite Helmet of Mana. Defense +5 (Max defense +7). Weight 1.3 kg. Durability 22/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Type: Light Armor. Mana +50.

	Sprite Breastplate of Brawn. Defense +7 (Max defense +12). Type: Light armor. Durability 21/60. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 6.1 kg. Strength +8

	Hardened Sprite Bracers. Defense +7 (Max defense +10). Durability 17/30. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 3.0 kg. Type: Light armor. Dexterity +7.

	Studded Sprite Gauntlets. Defense +6 (Max defense +7). Weight 2.2 kg. Durability 31/40. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Type: Light Armor. Increased climbing +10.

	Greaves of the Wood Sprite. Defense +5 (Max defense +9). Type: Light armor. Durability 28/45. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight: 2.8 kg. Movement speed increased by 10%

	Reinforced Sprite Boots. Defense +5 (Max defense +8). Durability 18/35. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight: 1.8 kg. Type: Light armor. Silence +15

	Bonus for entire set of Enhanced Sprite Armor. Defense given by each piece increased by 25%. Special Bonus: 50% less noise made while moving through forest. Special Bonus: +20% Earth Resistance

	Weapons

	High steel long sword. Damage 13-19 (Max damage 18-24). Durability 33/50. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight 2.8 kg

	Glass dagger. Damage 8-11 (Max damage 15-18). Durability 73/250. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.5 kg.

	Shadow High Steel Dagger. Damage 10-12. Durability 21/25. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.5 kg. Ignores 10% of target’s defense.

	Steel Dagger of Life. Damage 1-2 (Max Damage 8-11). Durability 1/20. Item Class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.6 kg. Bestows +1 life damage upon successful strike (+5 to Death creatures). Charges 5/20.

	Recurve bow of the Wood Sprite. Damage 14-19. Durability 35/35. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight: 3.8 kg. Traits: + 8 Dexterity. + 5% accuracy. Provides the skill: Focus.

	Sprite Arrows of Nature. Quantity 20. Durability 4/4. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Accuracy +1. Damage +1.

	Arrow of Dispelling. Will dispel active enchantments on target.

	Arrow of Flame. Will do additional 10-12 damage on impact. Chance to cause Burn.

	Arrow of Poison. Chance to Poison target, doing additional 2-4 damage for 10 seconds.

	Arrow of Freeze. Will do additional 7-9 damage on impact. Chance to cause Freeze.

	Arrow of Piercing. Will ignore up to 66% of opponent’s armor.

	Arrow of Confusion. Target may attack anyone near, including possibly allies.

	Misc

	Belt of Strength: Durability 20/20. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 1.1 kg. Traits: Increase Strength by +4.

	Necklace of Scry Defense. Will block all but God level scrying spells. You will not be able to be seen by divination, tracking or detection spells. Passive action. Durability 200/200. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.4 kg

	Bracelet of Health. Durability 10/10. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Traits: Increase maximum Health by +40.

	Rings

	Ring of Hidden Dangers. +25% to trap detection. Passive ability. Durability 15/15. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight 0.1 kg

	Ring of Flowing Thought. Durability 25/25. Item class: Rare. Quality: Superb. Weight 0.1 kg. +20% mana regeneration

	Minor ring of healing. Will heal 30 health on wearer. Cool down 10 minutes. Can be used twice per day. Durability 8/8. Item class: Common. Quality: Average. Weight: 0.1 kg

	Ring of Mana: Durability 9/9. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Traits: Increase maximum Mana by +20.

	Ring of Health: Durability 11/11. Item class: Uncommon. Quality: Above Average. Weight: 0.1 kg. Traits: Increase maximum Health by +30 x 4





	Richter’s Skill Rank Bonuses

	 	- Herb Lore:



	 	Novice: Notice low level herbs and be able to pick them. Can detect one useful traits from picked herbs

	Initiate: Can detect two traits from picked herbs. Can avoid one negative trait when ingesting

	Apprentice: Can detect three traits from picked herbs. Can avoid two negative traits when ingesting



	 	- Pierce the Veil



	 	Novice: Can see hidden traps

	Initiate: Can see hidden compartments



	 	- Trade



	 	Novice: Can “smell” a deal

	Initiate: 5% better prices, buying and selling

	Apprentice: 10% better prices, buying and selling. Can find black markets.



	 	- Portal Construction



	 	Novice: Can travel only between two points on the same ley line.

	Initiate: can create portals to allow travel between any two points on the same type of ley line.

	Apprenctice: Can create a portal with multiple exit points. This can only be built at a Place of Power. The number of destination points is determined by the number of ley lines present.





	 		 			 Name: Richter

Age: 24

Level: 18, 36%

Health: 430 Mana: 420 Stamina: 210

Strength: 29

Agility: 24

Dexterity: 34

Constitution: 25

Endurance: 21

Intelligence: 35

Wisdom: 21

Charisma: 24

Luck: 15

Abilities:

Limitless

Gift of Tongues

Fast Learner

Bounty of Life

Psi Bond

Skills:

Herb Lore Lvl 39; 22% to next level

Alchemy Lvl 1; 0% to next level

Analyze Lvl 6; 7% to next level

Pierce the Veil Lvl 23; 45% to next level

Stealth Lvl 6; 14% to next level

Traps Lvl 21; 87% to next level

Trap Disarm Lvl 21; 99% to next level

Archery Lvl 10; 24% to next level

Imbue Arrow Lvl 5; 18% to next level

Focus Lvl 3; 78% to next level

Double Shot Lvl 3; 31% to next level,

Drill Shot Lvl 2; 40% to next level

Swordsmanship Lvl 2; 15% to next level

Small Blades Lvl 4; 43% to next level

Unarmed Combat Lvl 1; 10% to next level

Pressure Points Lvl 1; 15% to next level

Light Armor Lvl 8; 18% to next level

Grace in Combat Lvl 5; 38% to next level

Air Magic Lvl 6; 37% to next level

Life Magic Lvl 5; 82% to next level

Earth Magic Lvl 4; 92% to next level

Water Magic Lvl 5; 47% to next level

Dark Magic Lvl 5; 22% to next level

Light Magic Lvl 4; 48% to next level

Fire Magic Lvl 5; 9% to next level

Map Making Lvl MAX

Trade Lvl 14; 86% to next level

War Leader Lvl 2, 43% to next level

Enchantment Lvl 1; 44% to next level

Portal Construction Apprentice

Lore Lvl 1

Marks:

Master of Mist Village

Blood Oath

Resistances:

Air 50%

Earth 20%

Life 50%

Mental 15%

Spiritual 15%

Race: Human (Chaos Seed)

Reputation: Lvl 3 “You seem like someone worthy of my attention.”

Alignment: Neutral

Language: All





		 			 Name: Alma

Level: 7, 31%

Health: 170 Mana: 170 Stamina: 170

(Unused level points: 0)

Abilities:

Psi Bond – Lvl 1, points to next level: 1

Psi Blast – Lvl 1, points to next level: 1

Brain Drain – Lvl 4, points to next level: 4

Can use:

Air Magic

Life Magic

Resistances:

Mental: 100%

Air: 50%

Race: Psi Dragonling





